10-K 1 nvda-2019x10k.htm FY2019 10-K
Table of Contents
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
____________________________________________________________________________________________
FORM 10-K
[x] ANNUAL  REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
 For the fiscal year ended January 27, 2019
OR
[_] TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
Commission file number: 0-23985
 
  
NVIDIA CORPORATION
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware 94-3177549
(State or other jurisdiction of (I.R.S. Employer
Incorporation or Organization) Identification No.)
2788 San Tomas Expressway
Santa Clara, California 95051
(408) 486-2000
(Address, including zip code, and telephone number, including area code, of principal executive offices)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Name of each exchange on which registered
Common Stock, $0.001 par value per share The Nasdaq Global Select Market
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:
None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.    Yes ý No o
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.    Yes o No ý
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to
such filing requirements for the past 90 days.    Yes ý No o
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405
of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit
such files).    Yes ý No o
Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K (§ 229.405 of this chapter) is not contained herein,
and will not be contained, to the best of registrant’s knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in Part III of
this Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K.    o
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or
an emerging growth company. See definitions of “large accelerated filer”, “accelerated filer”, “smaller reporting company”, and "emerging growth
company" in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer xAccelerated filer
o Non-accelerated filer o  Smaller reporting company oEmerging growth company o
    
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any
new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.    o
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act).    Yes o No ý 
The aggregate market value of the voting stock held by non-affiliates of the registrant as of July 27, 2018 was approximately $146.66 billion (based
on the closing sales price of the registrant's common stock as reported by the Nasdaq Global Select Market on July 27, 2018). This calculation
excludes 26 million shares held by directors and executive officers of the registrant. This calculation does not exclude shares held by such
organizations whose ownership exceeds 5% of the registrant's outstanding common stock that have represented to the registrant that they are
registered investment advisers or investment companies registered under section 8 of the Investment Company Act of 1940.
The number of shares of common stock outstanding as of February 15, 2019 was 606 million.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of the registrant's Proxy Statement for its 2019 Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission
pursuant to Regulation 14A not later than 120 days after the end of the fiscal year covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K are incorporated by
reference into Part III, Items 10-14 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION
TABLE OF CONTENTS
  Page
  
PART I 
 
Item 1. 
Business  4
 
Item 1A. 
Risk Factors  12
 
Item 1B. 
Unresolved Staff Comments  19
 
Item 2. 
Properties  19
 
Item 3. 
Legal Proceedings  20
 
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures  20
  
PART II 
 
Item 5. 
Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases
of Equity Securities  20
 
Item 6. 
Selected Financial Data 23
 
Item 7. 
Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations  23
 
Item 7A. 
Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk  34
 
Item 8. 
Financial Statements and Supplementary Data  35
 
Item 9. 
Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure  35
 
Item 9A. 
Controls and Procedures  35
 
Item 9B. 
Other Information  36
  
PART III 
 
Item 10. 
Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance  36
 
Item 11. 
Executive Compensation  37
 
Item 12. 
Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters 37
 
Item 13. 
Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 37
 
Item 14. 
Principal Accounting Fees and Services  37
  
PART IV 
 
Item 15. 
Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules  38
 
Signatures  78
2
Table of Contents
WHERE YOU CAN FIND MORE INFORMATION
Investors and others should note that we announce material financial information to our investors using our investor
relations website, press releases, SEC filings and public conference calls and webcasts. We also use the following
social media channels as a means of disclosing information about the company, our products, our planned financial
and other announcements and attendance at upcoming investor and industry conferences, and other matters and for
complying with our disclosure obligations under Regulation FD:
NVIDIA Twitter Account (https://twitter.com/nvidia)
NVIDIA Company Blog (http://blogs.nvidia.com)
NVIDIA Facebook Page (https://www.facebook.com/nvidia)
NVIDIA LinkedIn Page (http://www.linkedin.com/company/nvidia)
NVIDIA Instagram Page (https://www.instagram.com/nvidia)
In addition, investors and others can view NVIDIA videos on YouTube.
The information we post through these social media channels may be deemed material. Accordingly, investors should
monitor these accounts and the blog, in addition to following our press releases, SEC filings and public conference calls
and webcasts. This list may be updated from time to time. The information we post through these channels is not a part
of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. These channels may be updated from time to time on NVIDIA's investor relations
website.
Forward-Looking Statements
This Annual Report on Form 10-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the
Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, which are
subject to the “safe harbor” created by those sections. Forward-looking statements are based on our management's
beliefs and assumptions and on information currently available to our management. In some cases, you can identify
forward-looking statements by terms such as “may,” “will,” “should,” “could,” “goal,” “would,” “expect,” “plan,”
“anticipate,” “believe,” “estimate,” “project,” “predict,” “potential” and similar expressions intended to identify forward-
looking statements. These statements involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors, which may
cause our actual results, performance, time frames or achievements to be materially different from any future results,
performance, time frames or achievements expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. We discuss many
of these risks, uncertainties and other factors in this Annual Report on Form 10-K in greater detail under the heading
“Risk Factors.” Given these risks, uncertainties and other factors, you should not place undue reliance on these
forward-looking statements. Also, these forward-looking statements represent our estimates and assumptions only as
of the date of this filing. You should read this Annual Report on Form 10-K completely and with the understanding that
our actual future results may be materially different from what we expect. We hereby qualify our forward-looking
statements by these cautionary statements. Except as required by law, we assume no obligation to update these
forward-looking statements publicly, or to update the reasons actual results could differ materially from those
anticipated in these forward-looking statements, even if new information becomes available in the future.
All references to “NVIDIA,” “we,” “us,” “our” or the “Company” mean NVIDIA Corporation and its subsidiaries.
In addition, statements that “we believe” and similar statements reflect our beliefs and opinions on the relevant subject.
These statements are based upon information available to us as of the filing date of this Annual Report on Form 10-K ,
and while we believe such information forms a reasonable basis for such statements, such information may be limited
or incomplete, and our statements should not be read to indicate that we have conducted an exhaustive inquiry into, or
review of, all potentially available relevant information. These statements are inherently uncertain and investors are
cautioned not to unduly rely upon these statements.
© 2019 NVIDIA Corporation. All rights reserved. NVIDIA, the NVIDIA logo, GeForce, Quadro, Tegra, Tesla, CUDA,
GeForce Experience, GeForce NOW, GeForce RTX, Jetson, NVIDIA Clara, NVIDIA DGX, NVIDIA DRIVE, NVIDIA
GameWorks, NVIDIA GRID, NVIDIA HGX, NVIDIA RTX, NVLink and SHIELD are trademarks and/or registered
trademarks of NVIDIA Corporation in the United States and/or other countries. Other company and product names may
be trademarks of the respective companies with which they are associated. Features, pricing, availability, and
specifications are subject to change without notice.
3
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
Our Company
Starting with a focus on PC graphics, NVIDIA invented the graphics processing unit, or GPU, to solve some of the most
complex problems in computer science. We have extended our focus in recent years to the revolutionary field of
artificial intelligence, or AI. Fueled by the sustained demand for better 3D graphics and the scale of the gaming market,
NVIDIA has evolved the GPU into a computer brain at the intersection of virtual reality, or VR, high performance
computing, or HPC, and AI.
The GPU was initially used to simulate human imagination, enabling the virtual worlds of video games and films. Today,
it also simulates human intelligence, enabling a deeper understanding of the physical world. Its parallel processing
capabilities, supported by up to thousands of computing cores, are essential to running deep learning algorithms. This
form of AI, in which software writes itself by learning from data, can serve as the brain of computers, robots and self-
driving cars that can perceive and understand the world. GPU-powered deep learning continues to be adopted by
thousands of enterprises to deliver services and features that would have been impossible with traditional coding.
NVIDIA has a platform strategy, bringing together hardware, system software, programmable algorithms, libraries,
systems, and services to create unique value for the markets we serve. While the requirements of these end markets
are diverse, we address them with a unified underlying architecture leveraging our GPUs and Compute Unified Device
Architecture, or CUDA, as the fundamental building blocks. The programmable nature of our architecture allows us to
support several multi-billion dollar end markets with the same underlying technology by using a variety of software
stacks developed either internally or by third party developers and partners. The large and growing number of
developers across our platforms strengthens our ecosystem and increases the value of our platform to our customers.
Innovation is at our core. We have invested over $17 billion in research and development since our inception, yielding
inventions that are essential to modern computing. Our invention of the GPU in 1999 defined modern computer
graphics and established NVIDIA as the leader in visual computing. With our introduction of the CUDA programming
model in 2006, we opened the parallel processing capabilities of the GPU for general purpose computing. This
approach significantly accelerates the performance of the most demanding applications in HPC in fields such as
aerospace, bio-science research, mechanical and fluid simulations, and energy exploration. Today, our GPUs power
the fastest supercomputers across the world. In addition, the massively parallel compute architecture of our GPUs and
associated software have proven to be well suited for deep learning and are now expanding into machine learning,
powering the era of AI. As the laws of physics have begun to slow down Moore’s Law, we continue to deliver GPU
performance improvements ahead of Moore’s Law, giving the industry a path forward.
Gamers choose NVIDIA GPUs to enjoy immersive, increasingly cinematic virtual worlds. GPUs also help underpin the
world’s fastest growing spectator sport, eSports, which attracts hundreds of millions of viewers to watch top-quality
gaming. A rapidly growing new genre of Battle Royale games, such as Fortnite, is also expanding the gaming market.
Researchers use our GPUs to accelerate a wide range of important applications, from simulating viruses to exploring
the origins of the universe. With support for more than 550 applications - including the top 15 HPC applications -
NVIDIA GPUs enable some of the most promising areas of discovery, from weather prediction to materials science and
from wind tunnel simulation to genomics. In 2018, NVIDIA GPUs powered the top two supercomputers in the world,
located at Oak Ridge and Lawrence Livermore National Laboratories in the United States, as well as the top
supercomputers in Europe and Japan. Five of the six finalists for the Gordon Bell Prize, awarded by the Association for
Computing Machinery for outstanding achievement in the field of computing for applications in science, engineering
and large-scale data science, did their work on the NVIDIA-powered top-two supercomputers.
The world’s leading cloud service providers use our GPUs to enable, accelerate or enrich the services they deliver to
billions of end-users, including search, social networking, online shopping, live video, translation, AI assistants,
navigation, and cloud computing.
A rapidly growing number of enterprises and startups use our GPUs to facilitate deep learning that meets, and in
several cases surpasses, human perception, in fields ranging from radiology to precision agriculture. For example, the
transportation industry is turning to our GPUs and AI to enable autonomous vehicles, or AVs, with several hundred
companies and organizations working with NVIDIA’s DRIVE platform.
4
Table of Contents
Professional designers use our GPUs to create visual effects in movies and design products ranging from soft drink
bottles to commercial aircraft.
Headquartered in Santa Clara, California, NVIDIA was incorporated in California in April 1993 and reincorporated in
Delaware in April 1998.
Our Businesses
Our two reportable segments - GPU and Tegra Processor - are based on a single underlying architecture. Our GPU
product brands are aimed at specialized markets including GeForce for gamers; Quadro for designers; Tesla and DGX
for AI data scientists and big data researchers; and GRID for cloud-based visual computing users. Our Tegra brand
integrates an entire computer onto a single chip, and incorporates GPUs and multi-core CPUs to drive supercomputing
for autonomous robots, drones, and cars, as well as for game consoles and mobile gaming and entertainment devices.
GPU ·GeForce for PC gaming and mainstream PCs
 ·GeForce NOW for cloud-based game-streaming service
 ·Quadro for design professionals working in computer-aided design, video editing, special effects,
and other creative applications
 ·Tesla for AI utilizing deep learning and accelerated computing, leveraging the parallel computing
capabilities of GPUs for general purpose computing
 ·GRID to provide the power of NVIDIA graphics through the cloud and datacenters
 ·DGX for AI scientists, researchers and developers
Tegra
Processor·Tegra processors are primarily designed to enable branded platforms - DRIVE and SHIELD
 ·DRIVE AGX automotive supercomputers and software stacks that provide self-driving
capabilities
 ·Clara AGX for intelligent medical instruments
 ·SHIELD devices and services designed to harness the power of mobile-cloud to revolutionize
home entertainment, AI and gaming
 ·Jetson AGX is a power-efficient AI computing platform for robotics and other embedded use
Our Markets
We specialize in markets in which GPU-based visual computing and accelerated computing platforms can provide
tremendous throughput for applications. These platforms incorporate processors, systems software, programmable
algorithms, systems, and services to deliver value that is unique in the marketplace. From our proprietary processors,
we have created platforms that address four large markets where our expertise is critical: Gaming, Professional
Visualization, Datacenter, and Automotive.
Gaming
Computer gaming is the largest entertainment industry. Many factors propel computer gaming’s growth, including new
high production value games and franchises, the rise of competitive online gaming, eSports, and the rise of virtual and
augmented reality.
Our GPUs enhance the gaming experience by improving the visual quality of graphics, increasing the frame rate for
smoother gameplay and improving realism by incorporating the behavior of light and physical objects. These can be
enjoyed independently or together to extend the gaming experience across platforms.
Our gaming platforms utilize sophisticated 3D software and algorithms, including our GameWorks libraries that provide
special effects for games. We further enhance gaming with GeForce Experience, our gaming application that optimizes
the PC user’s settings for each title and enables players to record and share gameplay. It has been downloaded by
more than 100 million users.
To enable VR, we provide developers with a suite of software libraries called VRWorks. VRWorks allows developers to
create fully immersive experiences by enabling physically realistic visuals, sound, touch interactions, and simulated
environments. VR requires advanced high-performance GPUs as the engine to simulate complete immersion.
Our products for the gaming market include GeForce RTX and GeForce GTX GPUs for PC gaming, SHIELD devices
for gaming and streaming, GeForce NOW for cloud-based gaming, as well as platforms and development services for
specialized console gaming devices.
5
Table of Contents
Professional Visualization
We serve the Professional Visualization market by working closely with independent software vendors to optimize their
offerings for NVIDIA GPUs. Our GPU computing solutions enhance productivity and introduce new capabilities for
critical parts of the workflow for such major industries as automotive, media and entertainment, architectural
engineering, oil and gas, and medical imaging.
Designers who build the products we use every day need the images that they view digitally to mirror reality. This
requires simulating the physical behavior of light and materials, or physically-based rendering, an emerging trend in
professional design. Our DesignWorks software delivers this to designers and enables an architect designing a building
with a computer-aided design package to interact with the model in real time, view it in greater detail, and generate
photorealistic renderings for the client. It also allows an automotive designer to create a highly realistic 3D image of a
car, which can be viewed from all angles, reducing reliance on costly, time-consuming full-scale clay models.
Just as VR is becoming more important in gaming, it is also being incorporated in a growing number of enterprise
applications, including within medicine, architecture, product design, and retail. Virtual car showrooms, surgical training,
architectural walkthroughs, and bringing historical scenes to life all deploy this technology, powered by our GPUs.
Visual computing is vital to productivity in many environments, including design and manufacturing and digital content
creation. Design and manufacturing includes computer-aided design, architectural design, consumer-products
manufacturing, medical instrumentation, and aerospace. Digital content creation includes professional video editing and
post production, special effects for films, and broadcast-television graphics.
Our brand for this market is Quadro for workstations. Quadro GPUs enhance the productivity of designers by improving
performance and adding functionality, such as photorealistic rendering, high color fidelity, and advanced scalable
display capabilities. During fiscal year 2019, we introduced the NVIDIA RTX platform, making it possible to render film-
quality, photorealistic objects and environments with physically accurate shadows, reflections and refractions using ray
tracing in real-time.
Datacenter
The NVIDIA accelerated computing platform addresses AI and HPC applications. The platform consists of our energy
efficient GPUs, our CUDA programming language, specific libraries such as cuDNN and TensorRT, and innovations
such as NVLink, which enables application scalability across multiple GPUs.
In the field of AI, NVIDIA’s platform accelerates both deep learning and machine learning workloads. Deep learning is a
computer science approach where neural networks are trained to recognize patterns from massive amounts of data in
the form of images, sounds and text - in some instances better than humans. Machine learning is a related approach
that leverages algorithms as well as data to learn how to make determinations or predictions, often used in data
science. HPC, also referred to as scientific computing, uses numerical computational approaches to solve large and
complex problems. For both AI and HPC applications, the NVIDIA accelerated computing platform greatly increases the
performance and power efficiency of high-performance computers and datacenters, as GPUs excel at parallel
workloads. For example, an NVIDIA GPU-accelerated machine learning cluster for data science is 1/8 the cost, 1/15
the space, and 1/18 the power of a traditional CPU-based cluster.
We are engaged with thousands of organizations working on AI in a multitude of industries, from automating tasks such
as reading medical images, to enabling fraud detection in financial services, to optimizing oil exploration and drilling.
These organizations include the world’s leading cloud services companies such as Amazon, Baidu, and Facebook,
which are infusing AI in applications that enable highly accurate voice recognition and real-time translation; enterprises
that are increasingly turning to AI to improve products and services; and startups seeking to implement AI in
transformative ways across multiple industries. We have partnered with industry leaders such as IBM, Microsoft,
Oracle, and SAP to bring AI to enterprise users. We also have partnerships in healthcare and manufacturing, among
others, to accelerate the adoption of AI.
To enable deep learning and machine learning, we provide a family of GPUs designed to speed up training and
inferencing of neural networks. They are available in industry standard servers from every major computer maker
worldwide, including Cisco, Dell, HP, Inspur, and Lenovo; from every major cloud service provider such as Alicloud,
Amazon Web Services, Baidu Cloud, Google Cloud, IBM Cloud, Microsoft Azure, and Oracle Cloud; as well as in our
DGX AI supercomputer, a purpose-built system for deep learning and GPU accelerated applications. DGX delivers
performance equal to hundreds of conventional servers, comes fully integrated with hardware, software, development
tools, support for AI frameworks, and runs popular accelerated applications. We also offer the NVIDIA GPU Cloud, or
NGC, a comprehensive catalog of easy-to-use, optimized software stacks across a range of domains including
scientific computing, deep learning, and machine learning. With NGC,
6
Table of Contents
AI developers, researchers and data scientists can get started with the development of AI and HPC applications and
deploy them on DGX systems, NGC-ready workstations or servers from our systems partners, or with NVIDIA’s cloud
partners such as Amazon, Google Cloud, Microsoft Azure, or Oracle Cloud.
GPUs also increase the speed of applications used in such fields as aerospace, bio-science research, mechanical and
fluid simulations, and energy exploration. They have already had a significant impact on scientific discovery, including
improving heart surgery, mapping human genome folds, seismic modeling, and weather simulations.
Accelerated computing is recognized as the path forward for computing amid the slowing of Moore’s Law. The
proportion of supercomputers utilizing accelerators has grown sharply over the past five years, now accounting for a
significant proportion of both the total systems on the TOP500 list, which ranks the 500 most powerful commercially
available computer systems, and the list’s total floating-point operations per second. Tesla GPU accelerators power
many of the world’s fastest supercomputers, including the U.S. Department of Energy’s new generation of
supercomputers, Summit and Sierra, at Oak Ridge and Lawrence Livermore National Laboratories, Europe’s fastest
supercomputer - Piz Daint - in Switzerland, and Japan’s fastest supercomputer, ABCI.
We also serve the datacenter market with GRID for virtualized graphics. GRID makes it possible to run graphics-
intensive applications remotely on a server in the datacenter. Applications include accelerating virtual desktop
infrastructures and delivering graphics-intensive applications from the cloud for industries such as manufacturing,
healthcare, and educational institutions, among others.
Automotive
NVIDIA’s Automotive market is comprised of cockpit infotainment solutions, AV platforms, and associated development
agreements. Leveraging our technology leadership in AI and building on our long-standing automotive relationships, we
are delivering a full solution for the AV market under the DRIVE brand. NVIDIA has demonstrated multiple applications
of AI within the car. AI can drive the car itself as a pilot, in either partial or fully autonomous mode. AI can also be a co-
pilot, assisting the human driver in creating a safer driving experience.
NVIDIA is working with several hundred partners in the automotive ecosystem including automakers, truck makers, tier-
one suppliers, sensor manufacturers, automotive research institutions, HD mapping companies, and startups to
develop and deploy AI systems for self-driving vehicles. Our unified AI computing architecture starts with training deep
neural networks using our Tesla GPUs, and then running them within the vehicle on the NVIDIA DRIVE computing
platform. The platform consists of high-performance, energy efficient hardware - DRIVE AGX, and open, modular
software - including DRIVE AV for autonomous driving and DRIVE IX for in-vehicle AI assistance. In addition, we offer a
scalable simulation solution, NVIDIA DRIVE Constellation, for testing and validating a self-driving platform before
commercial deployment. This end-to-end, software-defined approach allows cars to receive over-the-air updates to add
new features and capabilities throughout the life of a vehicle.
NVIDIA DRIVE can perceive and understand in real-time what's happening around the vehicle, precisely locate itself on
an HD map, and plan a safe path forward. This advanced self-driving car platform combines deep learning, sensor
fusion, and surround vision to change the driving experience. Our DRIVE platform scales from a palm-sized, energy-
efficient module for automated highway-driving capabilities to a configuration with multiple systems aimed at enabling
driverless cars. Our Xavier SoC, which started shipping in 2018, enables vehicles to use deep neural networks to
process data from multiple cameras and sensors. It powers the DRIVE AutoPilot, the first commercially available Level
2+ automated driving system, combining the DRIVE AV self-driving solution with the DRIVE IX cockpit software,
including a visualization system for allowing the driver to see what the car sees and plans to do.
Business Strategies
NVIDIA’s key strategies that shape our overall business approach include:
Advancing the GPU computing platform. The massive parallel processing capabilities of NVIDIA GPUs can solve
complex problems in significantly less time and with lower power consumption than alternative computational
approaches. Indeed, GPUs can help solve problems that were previously deemed unsolvable. We work to deliver
continued GPU performance leaps that outpace Moore’s Law by leveraging innovation across the architecture, chip
design, system, and software layers. Our strategy is to target markets where GPUs deliver order-of-magnitude
performance advantages relative to legacy approaches. Our target markets so far include gaming, professional
visualization, datacenter, and automotive. While the requirements of these end markets are diverse, we address them
with a unified underlying architecture leveraging our GPUs and CUDA as the fundamental building blocks. The
programmable nature of our architecture allows us to make leveraged investments in R&D: we can support several
multi-billion dollar end markets with the same underlying technology
7
Table of Contents
by using a variety of software stacks developed either internally or by third party developers and partners. We utilize
this platform approach in each of our target markets.
Extending our technology and platform leadership in AI. We provide a complete, end-to-end GPU computing
platform for deep learning and machine learning, addressing both training and inferencing. This includes GPUs, our
CUDA programming language, algorithms, libraries, and system software. GPUs are uniquely suited to AI, and we will
continue to add AI-specific features to our GPU architecture to further extend our leadership position. Our AI technology
leadership is reinforced by our large and expanding ecosystem in a virtuous cycle. Our GPU platforms are available
from virtually every major server maker and cloud service provider, as well as on our own AI supercomputer. There are
over 1.2 million developers worldwide using CUDA and our other software tools to help deploy our technology in our
target markets. We evangelize AI through partnerships with hundreds of universities and more than 3,600 startups
through our Inception program. Additionally, our Deep Learning Institute provides instruction on the latest techniques on
how to design, train, and deploy neural networks in applications using our accelerated computing platform.
Extending our technology and platform leadership in visual computing. We believe that visual computing is
fundamental to the continued expansion and evolution of computing. We apply our research and development
resources to extending our leadership in visual computing, enabling us to enhance the user experience for consumer
entertainment and professional visualization applications. Our technologies are instrumental in driving gaming forward,
as developers leverage our libraries and algorithms to create near-cinematic and VR experiences. Our close
collaboration with game developers allows us to deliver an optimized gaming experience on our GeForce platform. Our
GeForce Experience gaming application further enhances each gamer’s experience by optimizing their PC’s settings,
as well as enabling the recording and sharing of gameplay. We also enable interactive graphics applications - such as
games, movie and photo editing and design software - to be accessed by almost any device, almost anywhere, through
our cloud platforms such as GRID for enterprise and GeForce NOW for gaming.
Advancing the leading autonomous vehicle platform. We believe the advent of AV will soon revolutionize the
transportation industry. In our view, AI is the key technology enabler of this opportunity, as the algorithms required for
autonomous driving - such as perception, localization, and planning - are too complex for legacy hand-coded
approaches, and will run on multiple trained neural networks instead. Therefore, we have provided a full functionally
safe AI-based hardware and software solution for the AV market under the DRIVE brand, which we are bringing to
market through our partnerships with automotive original equipment manufacturers, or OEMs, tier-1 suppliers, and
start-ups. Our AV solution also includes the GPU-based hardware required to train the neural networks before their in-
vehicle deployment, as well as to re-simulate their operation prior to any over-the-air software updates. We believe our
comprehensive, top-to-bottom and end-to-end approach will enable the transportation industry to solve the complex
problems arising from the shift to autonomous driving.
Leveraging our intellectual property. We believe our intellectual property is a valuable asset that can be accessed by
our customers and partners through licenses and development agreements when they desire to build such capabilities
directly into their own products, or have us do so through a custom development. Such license and development
arrangements can further enhance the reach of our technology.
Sales and Marketing
Our sales strategy involves working with end customers and various industry ecosystems through our partner network.
Our worldwide sales and marketing strategy is key to achieving our objective of providing markets with our high-
performance and efficient GPU and embedded system-on-a-chip, or SOC, platforms. Our sales and marketing teams,
located across our global markets, work closely with end customers in each industry. Our partner network incorporates
each industry's respective OEMs, original device manufacturers, or ODMs, system builders, add-in board
manufacturers, or AIBs, retailers/distributors, internet and cloud service providers, automotive manufacturers and tier-1
automotive suppliers, mapping companies, start-ups, and other ecosystem participants.
Members of our sales team have technical expertise and product and industry knowledge. We also employ a team of
application engineers to assist our partner network in designing, testing, and qualifying system designs that incorporate
our platforms. We believe that the depth and quality of our design support are key to improving our partner network’s
time-to-market, maintaining a high level of customer satisfaction, and fostering relationships that encourage our end
customers and partner network to use the next generation of our products within each platform.
To encourage the development of applications optimized for our GPUs, we seek to establish and maintain strong
relationships in the software development community. Engineering and marketing personnel engage with key software
developers to promote and discuss our platforms, as well as to ascertain individual product requirements and solve
technical problems. Our developer program makes our products available to developers prior to launch in order to
encourage the development of AI frameworks, Software Development Kits, and Application Programming Interfaces, or
APIs, for software applications and game titles that are optimized for our platforms. Our Deep Learning Institute
provides in-person and online training
8
Table of Contents
for developers in industries and organizations around the world to build AI and accelerated computing applications that
leverage our GPU and CUDA platforms. We now have over 700 thousand registered developers across our platforms,
including accelerated computing, gaming, deep learning, autonomous machines, and others.
As NVIDIA’s business has evolved from a focus primarily on gaming products to broader markets, and from chips to
platforms and complete systems, so, too, have our avenues to market. Thus, in addition to sales to customers in our
partner network, certain of our platforms are also sold through e-tail channels, or direct to cloud service providers and
enterprise customers.
Backlog
Our sales are primarily made pursuant to standard purchase orders. The quantity of products purchased by our
customers as well as our shipment schedules are subject to revisions that reflect changes in both the customers'
requirements and in manufacturing availability. Our industry is characterized by relatively short lead time orders and
delivery schedules, thus, we believe that only a small portion of our backlog is non-cancelable and that the dollar
amount associated with the non-cancelable portion is not significant.
Seasonality
Our GPU and Tegra processor platforms serve many markets from consumer PC gaming to enterprise workstations to
government and cloud service provider datacenters, although a majority of our revenue stems from the consumer
industry. Our consumer products have typically seen stronger revenue in the second half of our fiscal year. However,
there can be no assurance that this trend will continue; for example, in fiscal year 2019 second half revenue was
weaker than the first half.
Manufacturing
We do not directly manufacture semiconductors used for our products. Instead, we utilize a fabless manufacturing
strategy, whereby we employ world-class suppliers for all phases of the manufacturing process, including wafer
fabrication, assembly, testing, and packaging. This strategy uses the expertise of industry-leading suppliers that are
certified by the International Organization for Standardization in such areas as fabrication, assembly, quality control and
assurance, reliability, and testing. Additionally, we can avoid many of the significant costs and risks associated with
owning and operating manufacturing operations. While we may directly procure certain raw materials used in the
production of our products, such as substrates and a variety of components, our suppliers are responsible for
procurement of the majority of the raw materials used in the production of our products. As a result, we can focus our
resources on product design, additional quality assurance, marketing, and customer support.
We utilize industry-leading suppliers, such as Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company Limited and Samsung
Electronics Co. Ltd, to produce our semiconductor wafers. We then utilize independent subcontractors, such as
Advanced Semiconductor Engineering, Inc., Amkor Technology, BYD Auto Co. Ltd., Hon Hai Precision Industry Co.,
Ltd., JSI Logistics Ltd., King Yuan Electronics Co., Ltd., and Siliconware Precision Industries Company Ltd. to perform
assembly, testing, and packaging of most of our products and platforms. We purchase substrates from IbidenCo. Ltd.,
Kinsus Interconnect Technology Corporation, and Unimicron Technology Corporation, and memory from Micron
Technology, Samsung Semiconductor, Inc., and SK Hynix.
We typically receive semiconductor products from our subcontractors, perform incoming quality assurance and
configuration, and then ship the semiconductors to contract equipment manufacturers, or CEMs, distributors,
motherboard and AIB customers from our third-party warehouse in Hong Kong. Generally, these manufacturers
assemble and test the boards based on our design kit and test specifications, and then ship our products to retailers,
system builders, or OEMs as motherboard and AIB solutions.
We also utilize industry-leading contract manufacturers, or CMs, such as BYD and Hon Hai Precision Industry Co., and
ODMs such as Quanta Computer and Wistron Corporation, to manufacture some of our products for sale directly to
end customers. In those cases, key elements such as the GPU, SOC and memory are often consigned by us to the
CMs, who are responsible for the procurement of other components used in the production process.
Working Capital
We focus considerable attention on managing our inventories and other working-capital-related items. We manage
inventories by communicating with our customers and partners and then using our industry experience to forecast
demand on a platform-by-platform basis. We then place manufacturing orders for our products that are based on
forecasted demand. We generally maintain substantial inventories of our products because the semiconductor industry
is characterized by short lead time orders and quick delivery schedules. A substantial amount of our inventories is
maintained as semi-finished products that can be leveraged across a wide range of our processors to balance our
customer demands.
9
Table of Contents
Our existing cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities balances increased by 4% to $7.42 billion at the end of
fiscal year 2019 compared with the end of fiscal year 2018.
Competition
The market for our products is intensely competitive and is characterized by rapid technological change and evolving
industry standards. We believe that the principal competitive factors in this market are performance, breadth of product
offerings, access to customers and partners and distribution channels, software support, conformity to industry
standard APIs, manufacturing capabilities, processor pricing, and total system costs. We believe that our ability to
remain competitive will depend on how well we are able to anticipate the features and functions that customers and
partners will demand and whether we are able to deliver consistent volumes of our products at acceptable levels of
quality and at competitive prices. We expect competition to increase from both existing competitors and new market
entrants with products that may be less costly than ours, or may provide better performance or additional features not
provided by our products. In addition, it is possible that new competitors or alliances among competitors could emerge
and acquire significant market share.
A significant source of competition comes from companies that provide or intend to provide GPUs, embedded SOCs,
and accelerated and AI computing processor products. Some of our competitors may have greater marketing, financial,
distribution and manufacturing resources than we do and may be more able to adapt to customer or technological
changes.
Our current competitors include:
•suppliers or licensors of discrete and integrated GPUs and accelerated computing solutions, including chipsets
that incorporate 3D graphics, or HPC or accelerated computing functionality as part of their solutions or
platforms, such as Advanced Micro Devices, or AMD, Intel Corporation, or Intel, and Xilinx, Inc.; and
•suppliers of SOC products that are embedded into automobiles, autonomous machines, and gaming devices,
such as Ambarella, Inc., AMD, Broadcom Inc., Intel, Qualcomm Incorporated, Renesas Electronics Corporation,
Samsung, Texas Instruments Incorporated, and Xilinx Inc.
Patents and Proprietary Rights
We rely primarily on a combination of patents, trademarks, trade secrets, employee and third-party nondisclosure
agreements, and licensing arrangements to protect our intellectual property in the United States and internationally. Our
currently issued patents have expiration dates from February 2019 to February 2038. We have numerous patents
issued, allowed, and pending in the United States and in foreign jurisdictions. Our patents and pending patent
applications primarily relate to our products and the technology used in connection with our products. We also rely on
international treaties, organizations, and foreign laws to protect our intellectual property. The laws of certain foreign
countries in which our products are or may be manufactured or sold, including various countries in Asia, may not
protect our products or intellectual property rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States. This decreased
protection makes the possibility of piracy of our technology and products more likely. We continuously assess whether
and where to seek formal protection for particular innovations and technologies based on such factors as:
•the location in which our products are manufactured;
•our strategic technology or product directions in different countries;
•the degree to which intellectual property laws exist and are meaningfully enforced in different jurisdictions; and
•the commercial significance of our operations and our competitors' operations in particular countries and regions.
We have also licensed technology from third parties for incorporation in some of our products and for defensive
reasons, and expect to continue to enter into such license agreements.
Employees
As of January 27, 2019, we had 13,277 employees, 9,486 of whom were engaged in research and development and
3,791 of whom were engaged in sales, marketing, operations, and administrative positions.
Environmental Regulatory Compliance
To date, we have not incurred significant expenses related to environmental regulatory compliance matters.
10
Table of Contents
Executive Officers of the Registrant
The following sets forth certain information regarding our executive officers, their ages and positions as of February 15,
2019:
Name  Age Position
Jen-Hsun Huang  55 President and Chief Executive Officer
Colette M. Kress  51 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Ajay K. Puri  64 Executive Vice President, Worldwide Field Operations
Debora Shoquist  64 Executive Vice President, Operations
Timothy S. Teter  52 Executive Vice President and General Counsel
Jen-Hsun Huang co-founded NVIDIA in 1993 and has served as our President, Chief Executive Officer and a member
of the Board of Directors since our inception. From 1985 to 1993, Mr. Huang was employed at LSI Logic Corporation, a
computer chip manufacturer, where he held a variety of positions including as Director of Coreware, the business unit
responsible for LSI's SOC. From 1983 to 1985, Mr. Huang was a microprocessor designer for Advanced Micro Devices,
Inc., a semiconductor company. Mr. Huang holds a B.S.E.E. degree from Oregon State University and an M.S.E.E.
degree from Stanford University.
Colette M. Kress joined NVIDIA in 2013 as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Prior to NVIDIA, Ms.
Kress most recently served as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of the Business Technology and
Operations Finance organization at Cisco Systems, Inc., a networking equipment company, since 2010. At Cisco, Ms.
Kress was responsible for financial strategy, planning, reporting and business development for all business segments,
engineering and operations. From 1997 to 2010 Ms. Kress held a variety of positions at Microsoft Corporation, a
software company, including, beginning in 2006, Chief Financial Officer of the Server and Tools division, where Ms.
Kress was responsible for financial strategy, planning, reporting and business development for the division. Prior to
joining Microsoft, Ms. Kress spent eight years at Texas Instruments Incorporated, a semiconductor company, where she
held a variety of finance positions. Ms. Kress holds a B.S. degree in Finance from University of Arizona and an M.B.A.
degree from Southern Methodist University.
Ajay K. Puri joined NVIDIA in 2005 as Senior Vice President, Worldwide Sales and became Executive Vice President,
Worldwide Field Operations in 2009. Prior to NVIDIA, he held positions in sales, marketing, and general management
over a 22-year career at Sun Microsystems, Inc., a computing systems company. Mr. Puri previously held marketing,
management consulting, and product development positions at Hewlett-Packard Company, an information technology
company, Booz Allen Hamilton Inc., a management and technology consulting company, and Texas Instruments
Incorporated. Mr. Puri holds a B.S.E.E. degree from the University of Minnesota, an M.S.E.E. degree from the
California Institute of Technology and an M.B.A. degree from Harvard Business School.
Debora Shoquist joined NVIDIA in 2007 as Senior Vice President of Operations and in 2009 became Executive Vice
President of Operations. Her role has since expanded with responsibility added for Facilities in 2013, and for
Information Technology in 2015. Prior to NVIDIA, Ms. Shoquist served from 2004 to 2007 as Executive Vice President
of Operations at JDS Uniphase Corp., a provider of communications test and measurement solutions and optical
products for the telecommunications industry. She served from 2002 to 2004 as Senior Vice President and General
Manager of the Electro-Optics business at Coherent, Inc., a manufacturer of commercial and scientific laser equipment.
Previously, she worked at Quantum Corp., a data protection company, as President of the Personal Computer Hard
Disk Drive Division, and at Hewlett-Packard Corp. Ms. Shoquist holds a B.S. degree in Electrical Engineering from
Kansas State University and a B.S. degree in Biology from Santa Clara University.
Timothy S. Teter joined NVIDIA in 2017 as Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary and became
Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary in February 2018. Prior to NVIDIA, Mr. Teter spent more than
two decades at the law firm of Cooley LLP. He was most recently a partner at Cooley, where he focused on litigating
patent and technology related matters. Prior to attending law school, he worked as an engineer at Lockheed Missiles
and Space Company. Mr. Teter holds a B.S. degree in Mechanical Engineering from the University of California at
Davis and a J.D. degree from Stanford Law School.
Available Information
Our annual reports on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K and, if applicable,
amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended, are available free of charge on or through our web site, http://www.nvidia.com, as soon as reasonably
practicable after we electronically file such material with, or furnish it to, the Securities and Exchange Commission, or
the SEC. The SEC’s website, http://www.sec.gov, contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other
information regarding
11
Table of Contents
issuers that file electronically with the SEC. Our web site and the information on it or connected to it are not a part of
this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
In evaluating NVIDIA and our business, the following factors should be considered in addition to the other information in
this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Before you buy our common stock, you should know that making such an investment
involves risks including, but not limited to, the risks described below. Any one of the following risks could harm our
business, financial condition, results of operations or reputation, which could cause our stock price to decline, and you
may lose all or a part of your investment. Additional risks, trends and uncertainties not presently known to us or that we
currently believe are immaterial may also harm our business, financial condition, results of operations or reputation.
Risks Related to Our Business, Industry and Partners
If we fail to meet the evolving needs of our markets, or identify new products, services or technologies, our
revenue and financial results may be adversely impacted.
We have created GPU-based visual and accelerated computing platforms that address four large markets: Gaming,
Professional Visualization, Datacenter, and Automotive. These markets often experience rapid technological change,
changes in customer requirements, new product introductions and enhancements, and evolving industry standards.
Our success depends on our ability to identify these emerging industry changes and to develop new (or enhance our
existing) products, services and technologies that meet the evolving needs of these markets. Such activities may
require considerable technical, financial, compliance, sales and marketing investments. We currently devote significant
resources to the development of technologies and business offerings in markets where we have a limited operating
history, such as the automotive and datacenter markets, which presents additional risks to our business. We must also
continue to develop the infrastructure needed to appropriately scale our business in these areas, including customer
service and customer support. We also must meet customer safety and compliance standards, which are subject to
change. Additionally, we continue to make considerable investments in research and development, which may not
produce significant revenue for several years, if at all. If our investments are unsuccessful and we fail to develop new
products, services and technologies, or if we focus on technologies that do not become widely adopted, our business,
revenue, financial condition and results of operations could be adversely affected. We cannot assure you that our
strategic direction will result in innovative products and technologies that provide value to our customers, partners and
ultimately, our shareholders. If we fail to anticipate the changing needs of our target markets and emerging technology
trends, or if we do not appropriately adapt that strategy as market conditions evolve, in a timely manner to exploit
potential market opportunities, our business will be harmed.
Competition in our current and target markets could prevent us from growing our revenue.
Our target markets remain extremely competitive, and we expect competition to intensify as current competitors expand
their product and/or service offerings, industry standards continue to evolve, customer needs change and new
competitors enter these markets. Our competitors’ products, services and technologies may be less costly, or may offer
superior functionality or better features, than ours, which may result, among other things, in lower than expected selling
prices for our products. In addition, some of our competitors operate and maintain their own fabrication facilities, have
longer operating histories, larger customer bases, more comprehensive intellectual property, or IP, portfolios and patent
protections, and greater financial, sales, marketing and distribution resources than we do. These competitors may be
able to more effectively identify and capitalize upon opportunities in new markets and end user customer trends, quickly
transition their products, including semiconductor products, to increasingly smaller line width geometries, and obtain
sufficient foundry capacity and packaging materials, which could harm our business. If we are unable to successfully
compete in our target markets, respond to changes in our target markets or introduce new offerings to meet the needs
of this competitive environment, including in significant international markets such as China, demand for our products,
services and technologies could decrease, which would cause our revenue to decline and cause our results of
operations to suffer. In addition, the competitive landscape in our target markets has changed and may continue to
evolve due to a trend toward consolidation, which could lead to fewer customers, partners, or suppliers, any of which
could negatively affect our financial results.
System security and data protection breaches, as well as cyber-attacks, could disrupt our operations, reduce
our expected revenue and increase our expenses, which could adversely affect our stock price and damage
our reputation.
Security breaches, computer malware and cyber-attacks have become more prevalent and sophisticated in recent
years. These threats are constantly evolving, making it increasingly difficult to successfully defend against them or
implement adequate preventative measures. These attacks have occurred on our systems in the past and are expected
to occur in the future. Experienced computer programmers, hackers and employees may penetrate our security
controls and misappropriate or compromise our confidential information, or that of our employees or third parties.
These attacks may
12
Table of Contents
create system disruptions or cause shutdowns. These hackers may also develop and deploy viruses, worms and other
malicious software programs that attack or otherwise exploit security vulnerabilities in our products, including consumer
and automotive products, where we utilize over-the-air updates to improve functionality over time. For portions of our IT
infrastructure, including business management and communication software products, we rely on products and
services provided by third parties. These providers may also experience breaches and attacks to their products which
may impact our systems. Data security breaches may also result from non-technical means, such as actions by an
employee with access to our systems. To defend against security threats, both to our internal systems and those of our
customers, we must continuously engineer more secure products and enhance security and reliability features, which
may result in increased expenses.
Actual or perceived breaches of our security measures or the accidental loss, inadvertent disclosure or unapproved
dissemination of proprietary information or sensitive or confidential data about us, our partners, our customers or third
parties could expose us and the parties affected to a risk of loss or misuse of this information, resulting in litigation and
potential liability, paying damages, regulatory inquiries or actions, damage to our brand and reputation or other harm to
our business. Our efforts to prevent and overcome these challenges could increase our expenses and may not be
successful. We may experience interruptions, delays, cessation of service and loss of existing or potential customers.
Such disruptions could adversely impact our ability to fulfill orders and interrupt other critical functions. Delayed sales,
lower margins or lost customers as a result of these disruptions could adversely affect our financial results, stock price
and reputation.
If our products contain significant defects, we could incur significant expenses to remediate such defects, our
reputation could be damaged, and we could lose market share.
Our products are complex and may contain defects or security vulnerabilities, or experience failures or unsatisfactory
performance due to any number of issues in design, fabrication, packaging, materials and/or use within a system.
These risks may increase as our products are introduced into new devices, markets, technologies and applications,
including into the automotive market, or as new versions are released. Some errors in our products or services may
only be discovered after a product or service has been shipped or used by customers or the end users of such product.
Undiscovered vulnerabilities in our products or services could expose our customers or end users to hackers or other
unscrupulous third parties who develop and deploy viruses, worms and other malicious software programs that could
attack our products or services. Failure of our products to perform to specifications, or other product defects, could lead
to substantial damage to the products we sell directly to customers, the end product in which our device has been
integrated by OEMs, ODMs, AIBs and Tier 1 automotive suppliers, and to the user of such end product. Any such
defect may cause us to incur significant warranty, support and repair or replacement costs, write off the value of related
inventory, cause us to lose market share, and divert the attention of our engineering personnel from our product
development efforts to find and correct the issue. In addition, an error or defect in new products or releases or related
software drivers after commencement of commercial shipments could result in failure to achieve market acceptance or
loss of design wins, harm our relationships with customers and partners and harm consumers’ perceptions of our
brand. Also, we may be required to reimburse our customers, partners or consumers, including costs to repair or
replace products in the field. A product recall, including automotive recalls or a recall due to a bug in our products, or a
significant number of product returns could be expensive, damage our reputation, harm our ability to attract new
customers, result in the shifting of business to our competitors and result in litigation against us, such as product liability
suits. If a product liability claim is brought against us, the cost of defending the claim could be significant and would
divert the efforts of our technical and management personnel, and harm our business. Further, our business liability
insurance may be inadequate or future coverage may be unavailable on acceptable terms, which could adversely
impact our financial results.
We depend on third parties and their technology to manufacture, assemble, test and/or package our products,
which reduces our control over product quantity and quality, manufacturing yields, development,
enhancement and product delivery schedule and could harm our business.
We do not manufacture the silicon wafers used for our GPUs and Tegra processors and do not own or operate a wafer
fabrication facility. Instead, we are dependent on industry-leading foundries, such as Taiwan Semiconductor
Manufacturing Company Limited and Samsung Electronics Co. Ltd., to manufacture our semiconductor wafers using
their fabrication equipment and techniques. Similarly, we do not directly assemble, test or package our products, but
instead rely on independent subcontractors. We do not have long-term commitment contracts with these foundries or
subcontractors. As a result, we face several significant risks which could have an adverse effect on our ability to meet
customer demand and/or negatively impact our business operations, gross margin, revenue and/or financial results,
including:
•a lack of guaranteed supply of wafers and other components and potential higher wafer and component prices
due to supply constraints;
•a failure by our foundries to procure raw materials or to provide or allocate adequate or any manufacturing or test
capacity for our products;
13
Table of Contents
•a failure to develop, obtain or successfully implement high quality, leading-edge process technologies, including
transitions to smaller geometry process technologies such as advanced process node technologies and memory
designs needed to manufacture our products profitably or on a timely basis;
•loss of a supplier and additional expense and/or production delays as a result of qualifying a new foundry or
subcontractor and commencing volume production or testing in the event of a loss of or a decision to add or
change a supplier;
•a lack of direct control over delivery schedules or product quantity and quality; and
•delays in product shipments, shortages, a decrease in product quality and/or higher expenses in the event our
subcontractors or foundries prioritize our competitors’ orders over our orders or otherwise.
In addition, low manufacturing yields could have an adverse effect on our ability to meet customer demand, increase
manufacturing costs, harm customer or partner relationships, and/or negatively impact our business operations, gross
margin, revenue and/or financial results. Manufacturing yields for our products are a function of product design, which
is developed largely by us, and process technology, which typically is proprietary to the foundry. Low yields may result
from either product design or process technology failure. We do not know whether a yield problem will exist until our
design is actually manufactured by the foundry. As a result, yield problems may not be identified until well into the
manufacturing process and require us and the foundry to cooperate to resolve the problem.
We also rely on third-party software development tools to assist us in the design, simulation and verification of new
products or product enhancements, and to bring such new products and enhancements to market in a timely manner.
In the past, we have experienced delays in the introduction of products and enhancements as a result of the inability of
then available software development tools to fully simulate the complex features and functionalities of our products.
The design requirements necessary to meet consumer demands for more features and greater functionality from our
products may exceed the capabilities of available software development tools. If we miss design cycles or lose design
wins due to the unavailability of such software development tools, we could lose market share and our revenues could
decline. If we fail to achieve design wins for our products, our business will be harmed.
For our products that we do not sell directly to consumers, achieving design wins is an important success factor.
Achieving design wins may involve a lengthy process in pursuit of a customer opportunity and depend on our ability to
anticipate features and functionality that customers and consumers will demand. Failure to obtain a particular design
win may prevent us from obtaining design wins in subsequent generations of a particular product. This could result in
lost revenue and could weaken our position in future competitive bid selection processes.
Unanticipated changes in industry standards could render our products incompatible with products developed by major
hardware manufacturers and software developers. Further, if our products are not in compliance with prevailing industry
standards, including safety standards, our customers may not incorporate our products into their design strategies.
Winning a product design does not guarantee sales to a customer or that we will realize as much revenue as
anticipated, if any.
Business disruptions could harm our business, lead to a decline in revenues and increase our costs.
Our worldwide operations could be disrupted by earthquakes, telecommunications failures, power or water shortages,
outages at cloud service providers, tsunamis, floods, hurricanes, typhoons, fires, extreme weather conditions, cyber-
attacks, terrorist attacks, medical epidemics or pandemics and other natural or man-made disasters, catastrophic
events or climate change. The occurrence of any of these disruptions could harm our business and result in significant
losses, a decline in revenue and an increase in our costs and expenses. Any of these business disruptions could
require substantial expenditures and recovery time in order to fully resume operations. Our corporate headquarters,
and a portion of our research and development activities, are located in California, and other critical business
operations, finished goods inventory, and some of our suppliers are located in Asia, near major earthquake faults
known for seismic activity. In addition, a large portion of our current datacenter capacity is located in California, making
our operations vulnerable to natural disasters or other business disruptions occurring in these geographical areas. The
manufacture of product components, the final assembly of our products and other critical operations are concentrated
in certain geographic locations, including Taiwan, China, and Korea. Geopolitical change or changes in government
regulations and policies in the United States or abroad also may result in changing regulatory requirements, trade
policies, import duties and economic disruptions that could impact our operating strategies, product demand, access to
global markets, hiring, and profitability. In particular, revisions to laws or regulations or their interpretation and
enforcement could result in increased taxation, trade sanctions, the imposition of import duties or tariffs, restrictions and
controls on imports or exports, or other retaliatory actions, which could have an adverse effect on our business plans.
For example, regulations to implement the Export Control Reform Act of 2018 could have an adverse effect on our
business plans. Catastrophic events can also have an impact on third-party vendors who provide us critical
infrastructure services for IT and research and development systems and personnel. Our operations
14
Table of Contents
could be harmed if manufacturing, logistics or other operations in these locations are disrupted for any reason,
including natural disasters, high heat events or water shortages, information technology system failures, military actions
or economic, business, labor, environmental, public health, regulatory or political issues. The ultimate impact on us, our
third-party foundries and other suppliers and our general infrastructure of being located near major earthquake faults
and being consolidated in certain geographical areas is unknown. In the event a major earthquake or other disaster or
catastrophic event affects us or the third-party systems on which we rely, our business could be harmed as a result of
declines in revenue, increases in expenses, substantial expenditures and time spent to fully resume operations.
If we fail to estimate customer demand properly, our financial results could be harmed.
We manufacture our GPUs and Tegra processors based on estimates of customer demand and requirements. We sell
many of our products through a channel model, and our channel customers sell to retailers, distributors, and/or end
customers. As a result, the decisions made by our channel partners, retailers, and distributors in response to changing
market conditions and the changing demand for our products could impact our financial results. In order to have shorter
shipment lead times and quicker delivery schedules for our customers, we may build inventories for anticipated periods
of growth which do not occur, may build inventory anticipating demand that does not materialize, or may build inventory
to serve what we believe is pent-up demand. Such decisions may and have resulted in prolonged channel sell-through,
as we experienced with our mid-range gaming GPUs in fiscal year 2019. In estimating demand, we make multiple
assumptions, any of which may prove to be incorrect. Situations that may result in excess or obsolete inventory include:
•changes in business and economic conditions, including downturns in our target markets and/or overall
economy;
•changes in consumer confidence caused by changes in market conditions, including changes in the credit
market;
•a sudden and significant decrease in demand for our products;
•a higher incidence of inventory obsolescence because of rapidly changing technology or customer requirements;
•our introduction of new products resulting in lower demand for older products;
•less demand than expected for newly-introduced products; or
•increased competition, including competitive pricing actions.
The cancellation or deferral of customer purchase orders could result in our holding excess inventory, which could
adversely affect our gross margins. In addition, because we often sell a substantial portion of our products in the last
month of each quarter, we may not be able to reduce our inventory purchase commitments in a timely manner in
response to customer cancellations or deferrals. We could be required to write-down our inventory to the lower of cost
or market or write-off excess inventory, and we could experience a reduction in average selling prices if we incorrectly
forecast product demand, any of which could harm our financial results.
Conversely, if we underestimate our customers' demand for our products, our foundry partners may not have adequate
lead-time or capacity to increase production and we may not be able to obtain sufficient inventory to fill customers'
orders on a timely basis. We may also face supply constraints caused by natural disasters or other events. In such
cases, even if we are able to increase production levels to meet customer demand, we may not be able to do so in a
cost-effective or timely manner. If we fail to fulfill our customers' orders on a timely basis, or at all, our customer
relationships could be damaged, we could lose revenue and market share and our reputation could be damaged.
We are subject to risks and uncertainties associated with international operations, which may harm our
business.
We conduct our business worldwide and we have offices in various countries outside of the United States. Our
semiconductor wafers are manufactured, assembled, tested and packaged by third parties located outside of the
United States. We also generate a significant portion of our revenue from sales outside the United States. We allocate
revenue to individual countries based on the location to which the products are initially billed even if our customers’
revenue is attributable to end customers that are located in a different location. Revenue from sales outside of the
United States accounted for 87% of total revenue for each of fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017. Revenue from billings
to China, including Hong Kong, was 24% of our revenue for fiscal year 2019, even if our customers' revenue is
attributable to end customers that are located in a different location. Additionally, as of January 27, 2019, approximately
46% of our employees were located outside of the United States. The global nature of our business subjects us to a
number of risks and uncertainties, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and
results of operations, including:
•international economic and political conditions, including as a result of the United Kingdom's vote to withdraw
from the European Union, and other political tensions between countries in which we do business;
•unexpected changes in, or impositions of, legislative or regulatory requirements, including changes in tax laws;
•differing legal standards with respect to protection of intellectual property and employment practices;
15
Table of Contents
•local business and cultural factors that differ from our normal standards and practices, including business
practices that we are prohibited from engaging in by the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and other anticorruption
laws and regulations;
•exporting or importing issues related to export or import restrictions, including deemed export restrictions, tariffs,
quotas and other trade barriers and restrictions; 
•disruptions of capital and trading markets and currency fluctuations; and
•increased costs due to imposition of climate change regulations, such as carbon taxes, fuel or energy taxes, and
pollution limits.
If our sales outside of the United States are delayed or cancelled because of any of the above factors, our revenue may
be negatively impacted.
If we are unable to attract, retain and motivate our executives and key employees, we may not be able to
execute our business strategy effectively.
To be competitive and execute our business strategy successfully, we must attract, retain and motivate our executives
and key employees. The market for highly skilled workers and leaders in our industry is extremely competitive. In
particular, hiring qualified executives, scientists, engineers, technical staff and research and development personnel is
critical to our business. Additionally, changes in immigration and work permit laws and regulations or the administration
or interpretation of such laws or regulations could impair our ability to attract and retain highly qualified employees. If
we are less successful in our recruiting efforts, or if we cannot retain key employees, our ability to develop and deliver
successful products and services may be adversely affected. Additionally, competition for personnel results in
increased costs in the form of cash and stock-based compensation. The interpretation and application of employment
related laws to our workforce practices may result in increased operating costs and less flexibility in how we meet our
workforce needs. Effective succession planning is also important to our long-term success. Failure to ensure effective
transfer of knowledge and smooth transitions involving key employees could hinder our strategic planning and
execution.
We may not be able to realize the potential financial or strategic benefits of business acquisitions or strategic
investments and we may not be able to successfully integrate acquisition targets, which could hurt our ability
to grow our business, develop new products or sell our products.
We have in the past acquired and invested in, and may continue to acquire and invest in, other businesses that offer
products, services and technologies that we believe will help expand or enhance our existing products, strategic
objectives and business. The risks associated with past or future acquisitions or investments could impair our ability to
grow our business, develop new products or sell our products, and ultimately could have a negative impact on our
growth or our financial results. Given that our resources are limited, our decision to pursue a transaction has
opportunity costs; accordingly, if we pursue a particular transaction, we may need to forgo the prospect of entering into
other transactions that could help us achieve our strategic objectives. Additional risks related to acquisitions or strategic
investments include, but are not limited to:
•difficulty in combining the technology, products, operations or workforce of the acquired business with our
business;
•diversion of capital and other resources, including management’s attention;
•assumption of liabilities and incurring amortization expenses, impairment charges to goodwill or write-downs of
acquired assets;
•difficulty in realizing a satisfactory return, if at all;
•difficulty in obtaining regulatory, other approvals or financing;
•failure and costs associated with the failure to consummate a proposed acquisition or other strategic investment;
•legal proceedings initiated as a result of an acquisition or investment;
•uncertainties and time needed to realize the benefits of an acquisition or strategic investment, if at all;
•the need to later divest acquired assets if an acquisition does not meet our expectations;
•potential failure of our due diligence processes to identify significant issues with the acquired assets or company;
and
•impairment of relationships with, or loss of our or our target’s, employees, vendors and customers, as a result of
our acquisition or investment.
16
Table of Contents
Risks Related to Regulatory, Legal, Our Common Stock and Other Matters
Actions to adequately protect our IP rights could result in substantial costs to us and our ability to compete
could be harmed if we are unsuccessful in doing so or if we are prohibited from making or selling our
products.
We have in the past, currently are, and may in the future become involved in lawsuits or other legal proceedings
alleging patent infringement or other intellectual property rights violations by us, our employees or parties that we have
agreed to indemnify for certain claims of infringement. An unfavorable ruling in any such intellectual property related
litigation could include significant damages, invalidation of a patent or family of patents, indemnification of customers,
payment of lost profits, or, when it has been sought, injunctive relief. Claims that our products or processes infringe the
IP rights of others, regardless of their merit, could cause us to incur significant costs to respond to, defend, and resolve
such claims, and they may also divert the efforts and attention of management and technical personnel.
We may commence litigation or other legal proceedings in order to protect our intellectual property rights. Such
proceedings may increase our operating expenses, which could negatively impact our operating results. Further, we
could be subject to countersuits as a result of our initiation of litigation. If infringement claims are made against us or
our products are found to infringe a third party’s patent or intellectual property, we or one of our indemnitees may have
to seek a license to the third party’s patent or other intellectual property rights. However, we may not be able to obtain
licenses at all or on terms acceptable to us particularly from our competitors. If we or one of our indemnitees is unable
to obtain a license from a third party for technology that we use or that is used in one of our products, we could be
subject to substantial liabilities or have to suspend or discontinue the manufacture and sale of one or more of our
products. We may also have to make royalty or other payments, or cross license our technology. If these arrangements
are not concluded on commercially reasonable terms, our business could be negatively impacted. Furthermore, the
indemnification of a customer or other indemnitee may increase our operating expenses which could negatively impact
our operating results.
Our success depends in part on protecting our intellectual property. To accomplish this, we rely primarily on a
combination of patents, trademarks, trade secrets, employee and third-party nondisclosure agreements, licensing
arrangements, and the laws of the countries in which we operate to protect our intellectual property in the United States
and internationally. We may be required to spend significant resources to monitor and protect our intellectual property
rights, and even with significant expenditures we may not be able to protect our intellectual property rights that are
valuable to our business. The laws of certain foreign countries may not protect our products or intellectual property
rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States. This makes the possibility of piracy of our technology and
products more likely. In addition, the theft or unauthorized use or publication of our trade secrets and other confidential
business information could harm our competitive position and reduce acceptance of our products; as a result, the value
of our investment in research and development, product development, and marketing could be reduced. We
continuously assess whether and where to seek formal protection for existing and new innovations and technologies,
but cannot be certain whether our applications for such protections will be approved, and, if approved, whether we will
be able to enforce such protections.
Our operating results have in the past fluctuated and may in the future fluctuate, and if our operating results
are below the expectations of securities analysts or investors, our stock price could decline.
Our operating results have in the past fluctuated and may in the future continue to fluctuate due to numerous factors.
Therefore, investors should not rely on quarterly comparisons of our results of operations as an indication of our future
performance.
Factors, other than those described elsewhere in these risk factors, that could affect our results of operations in the
future include, but are not limited to:
•our ability to achieve volume production of our next-generation products;
•our inability to adjust spending to offset revenue shortfalls due to the multi-year development cycle for some of
our products and services;
•fluctuations in the demand for our products related to cryptocurrencies;
•changes in the timing of product orders due to unexpected delays in the introduction of our partners’ products;
•our ability to cover the manufacturing and design costs of our products through competitive pricing;
•our ability to comply and continue to comply with our customers’ contractual obligations;
•product rates of return in excess of that forecasted or expected due to quality issues;
•our ability to secure appropriate safety certifications and meet industry safety standards;
•supply constraints for and changes in the cost of the other components incorporated into our products
•inventory write-downs;
17
Table of Contents
•our ability to continue generating revenue from our partner network, including by generating sales within our
partner network and ensuring our products are incorporated into our partners product ecosystems, and our
partner network’s ability to sell products that incorporate our GPUs and Tegra processors;
•the inability of certain of our customers to make required payments to us, and our ability to obtain credit
insurance over the purchasing credit extended to these customers;
•customer bad debt write-offs;
•any unanticipated costs associated with environmental liabilities;
•unexpected costs related to our ownership of real property;
•changes in financial accounting standards or interpretations of existing standards; and
•general macroeconomic or industry events and factors affecting the overall market and our target markets.
Any one or more of the factors discussed above could prevent us from achieving our expected future financial results.
Any such failure to meet our expectations or the expectations of our investors or security analysts could cause our
stock price to decline or experience substantial price volatility.
Privacy concerns relating to our products and services could damage our reputation, deter current and
potential users from using our products and services, result in liability, or result in legal or regulatory
proceedings.
Our products and services may provide us with access to sensitive, confidential or personal data or information that is
subject to privacy and security laws and regulations. Concerns about our practices with regard to the collection, use,
retention, security or disclosure of personal information or other privacy-related matters, even if unfounded, could
damage our reputation and adversely affect our operating results. The theft, loss, or misuse of personal data collected,
used, stored, or transferred by us to run our business or by one of our partners could result in significantly increased
security costs, damage to our reputation, regulatory proceedings, disruption of our business activities or increased
costs related to defending legal claims.
Worldwide regulatory authorities are considering and have approved various legislative proposals concerning data
protection, which continue to evolve and apply to our business. For example, the European Union adopted the General
Data Protection Regulation, or GDPR, which requires companies to meet new requirements beginning in May 2018
regarding the handling of personal data, including its use, protection and the ability of persons whose data is stored to
correct or delete such data about themselves. Failure to meet GDPR requirements could result in penalties of up to 4%
of worldwide revenue. In addition, the interpretation and application of consumer and data protection laws in the United
States, Europe and elsewhere are often uncertain and fluid, and may be interpreted and applied in a manner that is
inconsistent with our data practices. If so, we may be ordered to change our data practices and/or be fined. Complying
with these changing laws has caused, and could continue to cause, us to incur substantial costs, which could have an
adverse effect on our business and results of operations. Further, failure to comply with existing or new rules may result
in significant penalties or orders to stop the alleged noncompliant activity.
We may have exposure to additional tax liabilities and our operating results may be adversely impacted by
higher than expected tax rates.
As a multinational corporation, we are subject to income taxes as well as non-income based taxes, such as payroll,
sales, use, value-added, net worth, property and goods and services taxes, in both the United States and various
foreign jurisdictions. Our domestic and international tax liabilities are subject to the allocation of revenue and expenses
in different jurisdictions. Significant judgment is required in determining our worldwide provision for income taxes and
other tax liabilities. Further, changes in United States federal, and state or international tax laws applicable to
multinational corporations or other fundamental law changes may materially impact our tax expense and cash flows, as
we experienced in fiscal year 2018 with the passage of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, or TCJA.
Our future effective tax rate may be affected by such factors as changes in tax laws, changes in our business or
statutory rates, changes in jurisdictions in which our profits are determined to be earned and taxed, changes in
available tax credits, the resolution of issues arising from tax audits, changes in United States generally accepted
accounting principles, adjustments to income taxes upon finalization of tax returns, increases in expenses not
deductible for tax purposes, changes in the valuation of our deferred tax assets and liabilities and in deferred tax
valuation allowances, changing interpretation of existing laws or regulations, the impact of accounting for stock-based
compensation and the recognition of excess tax benefits and tax deficiencies within the income tax provision in the
period in which they occur, the impact of accounting for business combinations, shifts in the amount of earnings in the
United States compared with other regions in the world and overall levels of income before tax, changes in our
international organization, as well as the expiration of statute of limitations and settlements of audits. Any changes in
our effective tax rate may reduce our net income.
18
Table of Contents
Our business is exposed to the risks associated with litigation, investigations and regulatory proceedings.
We currently and may in the future face legal, administrative and regulatory proceedings, claims, demands and/or
investigations involving shareholder, consumer, competition and/or other issues relating to our business on a global
basis. For example, multiple securities litigation claims have recently been filed against us and certain of our officers
based on the dissemination of allegedly false and misleading statements related to channel inventory and the impact of
cryptocurrency mining on GPU demand. In addition, a stockholder, purporting to act on behalf of the Company, filed a
derivative lawsuit seeking to assert claims on behalf of the Company against the members of our board of directors and
certain officers based on the dissemination of allegedly false and misleading statements related to channel inventory
and the impact of cryptocurrency mining on GPU demand.
Litigation and regulatory proceedings are inherently uncertain, and adverse rulings could occur, including monetary
damages, or an injunction stopping us from manufacturing or selling certain products, engaging in certain business
practices, or requiring other remedies, such as compulsory licensing of patents. An unfavorable outcome or settlement
may result in a material adverse impact on our business, results of operations, financial position, and overall trends. In
addition, regardless of the outcome, litigation can be costly, time-consuming, and disruptive to our operations.
In addition, the laws and regulations our business is subject to are complex, and change frequently. We may be
required to incur significant expense to comply with, or remedy violations of, these regulations.
Delaware law and provisions in our certificate of incorporation, our bylaws and our agreement with Microsoft
Corporation could delay or prevent a change in control.
Our status as a Delaware corporation and the anti-takeover provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law may
discourage, delay, or prevent a change in control by prohibiting us from engaging in a business combination with an
interested shareholder for a period of three years after the person becomes an interested shareholder, even if a change
of control would be beneficial to our existing shareholders. In addition, our certificate of incorporation and bylaws
contain provisions that could make it more difficult for a third party to acquire a majority of our outstanding voting stock.
These provisions include the following:
•the ability of our Board of Directors to create and issue preferred stock without prior shareholder approval;
•the prohibition of shareholder action by written consent;
•advance notice requirements for director nominations and shareholder proposals;
•the ability of our Board of Directors to increase or decrease the number of directors without shareholder approval;
•a super-majority voting requirement to amend some provisions in our certificate of incorporation and bylaws;
•the inability of our shareholders to call special meetings of shareholders; and
•the ability of our Board of Directors to make, amend or repeal our bylaws.
On March 5, 2000, we entered into an agreement with Microsoft in which we agreed to develop and sell graphics chips
and to license certain technology to Microsoft and its licensees for use in the Xbox. Under the agreement, if an
individual or corporation makes an offer to purchase shares equal to or greater than 30% of the outstanding shares of
our common stock, Microsoft may have first and last rights of refusal to purchase the stock. The Microsoft provision and
the other factors listed above could also delay or prevent a change in control of NVIDIA. These provisions could also
discourage proxy contests and make it more difficult for shareholders to elect directors of their choosing and to cause
us to take other corporate actions they desire.
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
Not applicable.
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
Our headquarters complex is located in Santa Clara, California. It includes ten leased commercial buildings totaling
981,389 square feet, and real property that we own totaling 1,257,346 square feet. Our owned property consists of two
commercial buildings on 36 acres of land. In addition, we also lease datacenter space in Santa Clara, California.
Outside of Santa Clara, California, we lease facilities in Austin, Texas and a number of regional facilities in other U.S.
locations that are used as research and development centers and/or sales and administrative offices. Outside of the
United States, we own a building in Hyderabad, India, that is being used primarily as a research and development
center. We also lease facilities in various international locations that are used as research and development centers
and/or sales and
19
Table of Contents
administrative offices. These leased facilities are located primarily in Asia and Europe. In addition, we also lease
datacenter space in various locations around the world.
We believe that we currently have sufficient facilities to conduct our operations for the next twelve months. For
additional information regarding obligations under leases, refer to Note 12 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial
Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K under the subheading “Lease Obligations,” which
information is hereby incorporated by reference.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
Please see Note 12 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K for a discussion of our legal proceedings.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
Not Applicable.
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Our common stock is traded on the Nasdaq Global Select Market under the symbol NVDA. Public trading of our
common stock began on January 22, 1999. Prior to that, there was no public market for our common stock. As of
February 15, 2019, we had approximately 317 registered shareholders, not including those shares held in street or
nominee name.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
Beginning August 2004, our Board of Directors authorized us to repurchase our stock.
Since the inception of our share repurchase program, we have repurchased an aggregate of 260 million shares for a
total cost of $7.08 billion through January 27, 2019. All shares delivered from these repurchases have been placed into
treasury stock.
In November 2018, the Board authorized an additional $7.00 billion under our share repurchase program and extended
it through the end of December 2022. As of January 27, 2019, we were authorized to repurchase additional shares of
our common stock up to $7.24 billion.
We intend to return $3.00 billion to shareholders by the end of fiscal year 2020, including $700 million of share
repurchases we made in the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2019.
The repurchases can be made in the open market, in privately negotiated transactions, or in structured share
repurchase programs, and can be made in one or more larger repurchases, in compliance with Rule 10b-18 of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, subject to market conditions, applicable legal requirements, and other
factors. The program does not obligate NVIDIA to acquire any particular amount of common stock and the program
may be suspended at any time at our discretion.
20
Table of Contents
The following table presents details of our share repurchase transactions during the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2019:
PeriodTotal Number of
Shares
Purchased (In
thousands)  Average Price
Paid per ShareTotal Number of
Shares Purchased as
Part of Publicly
Announced Program
(In thousands)Approximate Dollar
Value of Shares that
May Yet Be
Purchased Under the
Program (In billions)
October 29, 2018 -
November 25, 2018123 $ 195.72 123 $ 7.94
November 26, 2018 -
December 23, 20183,304 $ 142.05 3,304 $ 7.47
December 24, 2018 -
January 27, 20191,777 $ 129.87 1,777 $ 7.24
Total 5,204   5,204
Transactions Related to our 1.00% Convertible Senior Notes Due 2018 and Note Hedges
During fiscal year 2019, we issued an aggregate of 714 thousand shares of our common stock upon settlement of $16
million in principal amount of 1.00% Convertible Senior Notes Due 2018, or the Convertible Notes, submitted for
conversion. In connection with these conversions, we exercised a portion of our Note Hedges to acquire an equal
number of shares of our common stock. The counterparty to the Note Hedges may be deemed an “affiliated purchaser”
and may have purchased the shares of our common stock deliverable to us upon this exercise of our option. Refer to
Note 11 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K
for further discussion regarding the Convertible Notes and the Note Hedges.
Restricted Stock Unit Share Withholding
We also withhold common stock shares associated with net share settlements to cover tax withholding obligations upon
the vesting of restricted stock unit awards under our employee equity incentive program. During fiscal year 2019, we
withheld approximately 4 million shares at a total cost of $1.03 billion through net share settlements. Refer to Note 3 of
the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for further
discussion regarding our equity incentive plans.
21
Table of Contents
Stock Performance Graphs 
The following graph compares the cumulative total shareholder return for our common stock, the S&P 500 Index, and
the Nasdaq 100 Index for the five years ended January 27, 2019. The graph assumes that $100 was invested on
January 26, 2014 in our common stock and in each of the S&P 500 Index and the Nasdaq 100 Index. Our common
stock is a component of each of the presented indices. Total return assumes reinvestment of dividends in each of the
indices indicated. Total return is based on historical results and is not intended to indicate future performance.
*$100 invested on 1/26/14 in stock and in indices, including reinvestment of dividends.
The S&P 500 index is proprietary to and are calculated, distributed and marketed by S&P Opco, LLC (a subsidiary of
S&P Dow Jones Indices LLC), its affiliates and/or its licensors and has been licensed for use. S&P® and S&P 500®,
among other famous marks, are registered trademarks of Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC, and Dow Jones®
is a registered trademark of Dow Jones Trademark Holdings LLC. © 2016 S&P Dow Jones Indices LLC, its affiliates
and/or its licensors. All rights reserved.
 1/26/2014 1/25/2015 1/31/2016 1/29/2017 1/28/2018 1/27/2019
NVIDIA Corporation $ 100.00$ 135.49$ 194.78$ 750.36 $1,639.87$1,082.30
S&P 500 $ 100.00$ 111.92$ 108.84$ 127.84 $ 158.41$ 151.70
Nasdaq 100 $ 100.00$ 119.26$ 124.52$ 150.83 $ 207.18$ 208.13
22
Table of Contents
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA 
The following selected financial data should be read in conjunction with our financial statements and the notes thereto,
and with Item 7, “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.” The
Consolidated Statements of Income data for fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017 and the Consolidated Balance Sheets
data as of January 27, 2019 and January 28, 2018 have been derived from and should be read in conjunction with our
audited consolidated financial statements and the notes thereto included in Part IV, Item 15 in this Annual Report on
Form 10-K. We operate on a 52- or 53-week year, ending on the last Sunday in January. Fiscal years 2019, 2018,
2017, and 2015 were 52-week years and fiscal year 2016 was a 53-week year.
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018  January 29,
2017  January 31,
2016 (A)  January 25,
2015
Consolidated Statements of Income Data: (In millions, except per share data)
Revenue $ 11,716  $ 9,714  $ 6,910  $ 5,010  $ 4,682
Income from operations $ 3,804  $ 3,210  $ 1,934  $ 747  $ 759
Net income $ 4,141  $ 3,047  $ 1,666  $ 614  $ 631
Net income per share:      
Basic $ 6.81  $ 5.09  $ 3.08  $ 1.13  $ 1.14
Diluted $ 6.63  $ 4.82  $ 2.57  $ 1.08  $ 1.12
Weighted average shares used in per share
computation:      
Basic 608  599  541  543  552
Diluted 625  632  649  569  563
 Year Ended
 January 27,
 2019 (B,C)January 28,
 2018 (B,C)  January 29,
 2017 (B,C)  January 31,
2016 (B)  January 25,
2015
Consolidated Balance Sheets Data: (In millions, except per share data)
Cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities $ 7,422 $ 7,108  $ 6,798  $ 5,037  $ 4,623
Total assets $ 13,292 $ 11,241  $ 9,841  $ 7,370  $ 7,201
Debt obligations $ 1,988 $ 2,000  $ 2,779  $ 1,413  $ 1,384
Convertible debt conversion obligation $ — $ — $ 31 $ 87 $ —
Total shareholders’  equity $ 9,342 $ 7,471  $ 5,762  $ 4,469  $ 4,418
Cash dividends declared and paid per common
share (D) $ 0.610 $ 0.570  $ 0.485  $ 0.395  $ 0.340
 
(A)In fiscal year 2016, we began the wind down of our Icera modem operations. As a result, our income from operations for fiscal year 2016
included $131 million of restructuring and other charges.
(B)In fiscal year 2014, we issued Convertible Notes in the aggregate principal amount of $1.50 billion. The Convertible Notes first became
convertible as of February 1, 2016 and matured on December 1, 2018. Refer to Note 11 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
(C)In fiscal year 2017, we issued $1.00 billion of the Notes Due 2021, and $1.00 billion of the Notes Due 2026. Interest on the Notes is payable on
March 16 and September 16 of each year, beginning on March 16, 2017. Refer to Note 11 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
(D)In November 2012, we initiated a quarterly dividend payment of $0.075 per share, or $0.30 per share on an annual basis. In May 2015, we
increased the quarterly cash dividend to $0.0975 per share, or $0.39 per share on an annual basis. In November 2015, we increased the
quarterly cash dividend to $0.115 per share, or $0.46 per share on an annual basis. In November 2016, we increased the quarterly cash
dividend to $0.14 per share, or $0.56 per share on an annual basis. In November 2017, we increased the quarterly cash dividend to $0.15 per
share, or $0.60 per share on an annual basis. In November 2018, we increased the quarterly cash dividend to $0.16 per share, or $0.64 per
share on an annual basis.
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS
OF OPERATIONS 
The following discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations should be read in conjunction
with “Item 1A. Risk Factors”, “Item 6. Selected Financial Data”, our Consolidated Financial Statements and related
Notes thereto, as well as other cautionary statements and risks described elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-
K, before deciding to purchase, hold or sell shares of our common stock. 
23
Table of Contents
Overview
Our Company and Our Businesses
Starting with a focus on PC graphics, NVIDIA invented the GPU to solve some of the most complex problems in
computer science. We have extended our focus in recent years to the revolutionary field of AI. Fueled by the sustained
demand for better 3D graphics and the scale of the gaming market, NVIDIA has evolved the GPU into a computer brain
at the intersection of VR, HPC, and AI.
Our two reportable segments - GPU and Tegra Processor - are based on a single underlying architecture. From our
proprietary processors, we have created platforms that address four large markets where our expertise is critical:
Gaming, Professional Visualization, Datacenter, and Automotive.
Our GPU product brands are aimed at specialized markets including GeForce for gamers; Quadro for designers; Tesla
and DGX for AI data scientists and big data researchers; and GRID for cloud-based visual computing users. Our Tegra
brand integrates an entire computer onto a single chip, and incorporates GPUs and multi-core CPUs to drive
supercomputing for autonomous robots, drones, and cars, as well as for game consoles and mobile gaming and
entertainment devices.
Headquartered in Santa Clara, California, NVIDIA was incorporated in California in April 1993 and reincorporated in
Delaware in April 1998.
Recent Developments, Future Objectives and Challenges
Fiscal Year 2019 Summary
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018  Change
 ($ in millions, except per share data)
Revenue $ 11,716 $ 9,714 Up 21%
Gross margin 61.2% 59.9% Up 130 bps
Operating expenses $ 3,367 $ 2,612 Up 29%
Income from operations $ 3,804 $ 3,210 Up 19%
Net income $ 4,141 $ 3,047 Up 36%
Net income per diluted share $ 6.63 $ 4.82 Up 38%
Revenue for fiscal year 2019 increased 21% year over year, reflecting growth in each of our market platforms - gaming,
professional visualization, datacenter, and automotive. GPU business revenue was $10.17 billion, up 25% from a year
earlier. Tegra Processor business revenue - which includes automotive, SOC modules for gaming platforms, and
embedded edge AI platforms - was $1.54 billion, up slightly from a year ago.
Gaming revenue was $6.25 billion, up 13% from a year ago driven by growth in gaming GPUs. Gaming GPU growth
was fueled by Turing-based GPUs for desktops and by gaming notebooks based on our Max-Q technology. We
experienced significant volatility in our Gaming revenue during fiscal year 2019. We believe demand for our desktop
gaming GPU products used by end users for cryptocurrency mining and its after-effects have distorted trends in
Gaming revenue. We also believe that deteriorating macroeconomic conditions, particularly in China have impacted
consumer demand for our GeForce gaming GPU products. In addition, sales of certain high-end GeForce gaming
GPUs using our new Turing architecture that we released during fiscal year 2019 were lower than we expected for the
launch of a new architecture. As a result, during a portion of fiscal year 2019, we shipped a higher amount of desktop
gaming GPU products relative to where end user demand turned out to be and subsequently compensated by shipping
a lower amount of desktop gaming GPU products relative to end user demand to allow the channel to work down that
inventory. For fiscal year 2020, we expect our Gaming revenue to be slightly down compared to fiscal year 2019, with
expected growth from sales of Turing-based GPU products and notebook GPU products partially offsetting decreases
that we believe were caused by the previously-noted factors.
Professional visualization revenue was $1.13 billion, up 21% from a year earlier driven by strength across both desktop
and mobile workstation products.
Datacenter revenue was $2.93 billion, up 52% from a year ago, led by strong sales of our Volta architecture-based
products, including NVIDIA Tesla V100 and DGX systems. Toward the end of fiscal year 2019, we believe that
customers across broad-based vertical markets and geographies became increasingly cautious due to economic
uncertainty, and a number of
24
Table of Contents
Datacenter deals did not close. While we believe the pause is temporary, our visibility remains relatively low and we do
not expect a meaningful recovery in the Datacenter market until later in fiscal year 2020.
Automotive revenue of $641 million was up 15% from a year earlier, driven by infotainment modules, production DRIVE
platforms, and development agreements with automotive companies.
OEM and IP revenue was $767 million, down 1% from a year ago, driven by the absence of Intel licensing revenue,
which concluded in the first quarter of fiscal year 2018. Revenue from cryptocurrency-specific products in fiscal years
2019 and 2018 was $306 million and $273 million, respectively. We expect revenue from cryptocurrency-specific
products to be negligible going forward.
Gross margin for fiscal year 2019 was 61.2%, compared with 59.9% a year earlier, which reflects our continued shift
toward higher-value platforms, which more than offset the impact of approximately $128 million in charges for excess
DRAM and other components we recorded in the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2019 and a charge of $57 million we
recorded during the third quarter of fiscal year 2019 related to prior architecture components and chips.
Operating expenses for fiscal year 2019 were $3.37 billion, up 29% from a year earlier, reflecting primarily employee
additions and increases in employee compensation and other related costs, including infrastructure costs.
Income from operations for fiscal year 2019 was $3.80 billion, up 19% from a year earlier. Net income and net income
per diluted share for fiscal year 2019 were $4.14 billion and $6.63, respectively, up 36% and 38%, respectively, from a
year earlier, fueled primarily by revenue growth and improved gross margin, as well as the impact of the U.S. tax reform
benefit.
During fiscal year 2019, we returned $1.95 billion to shareholders through a combination of $1.58 billion in share
repurchases and $371 million in quarterly cash dividends. We intend to return $3.00 billion to shareholders by the end
of fiscal year 2020, including $700 million of share repurchases we made in the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2019.
Cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities were $7.42 billion as of January 27, 2019, compared with $7.11
billion as of January 28, 2018. The increase was primarily related to the increase in net income, partially offset by
changes in working capital and the increases in stock repurchases, dividends and taxes paid related to restricted stock
units.
GPU Business
During fiscal year 2019, for gaming, we announced NVIDIA RTX - a computer graphics technology using our Turing
architecture that produces movie-quality images in real time using ray tracing and AI. During the year, we released
many new GeForce RTX desktop gaming GPU products, including RTX 2080Ti, 2080, 2070 and 2060, as well as many
new Max-Q GeForce gaming notebook GPU products - the most recent of which are powered by RTX GPUs.
For our professional visualization platform, we announced the Quadro GV100 GPU with RTX technology, making real-
time ray tracing possible on professional design and content creation applications. We also unveiled the Quadro RTX
series, which is designed to revolutionize the workflow of designers and artists on the desktop, and announced the
NVIDIA CUDA-accelerated REDCODE RAW decode SDK, enabling developers and studios to edit 8K video.
For our datacenter platform, we unveiled many advances to our deep learning computing platform - including NVIDIA
Tesla V100 GPUs with 32GB memory, NVIDIA NVSwitch GPU interconnect fabric, the NVIDIA DGX-2 and HGX-2 for AI
and HPC, the NVIDIA RTX Server, and TensorRT 4 AI inference accelerator software. In addition, we introduced
RAPIDS, an open-source GPU-acceleration platform for data science and machine learning, launched the NVIDIA T4
cloud GPU and NVIDIA TensorRT Hyperscale Inference Platform for advanced acceleration in hyperscale datacenters,
announced GPU acceleration for Kubernetes to facilitate enterprise inference deployment on multi-cloud GPU clusters,
and announced that five of the world’s seven fastest supercomputers are powered by NVIDIA GPUs.
Tegra Processor Business
During fiscal year 2019, for the automotive market, we introduced the NVIDIA DRIVE AutoPilot Level 2+ automated
driving system, announced NVIDIA DRIVE AGX design wins with Toyota, Volvo Cars and Isuzu Motors, and announced
that Daimler and Bosch have selected NVIDIA’s DRIVE platform to bring automated and driverless vehicles to city
streets. We also began production of our Xavier single-chip autopilot SOC, started shipping the NVIDIA DRIVE AGX
Xavier developer kit, and introduced the NVIDIA DRIVE Constellation server with DRIVE Sim software to safely test
drive autonomous vehicles over billions of miles in virtual reality by leveraging NVIDIA GPUs and NVIDIA DRIVE
Pegasus.
In addition, we launched the NVIDIA Jetson AGX Xavier module to help build the next-generation of autonomous
machines and announced that Yamaha Motor Co. will use NVIDIA to power its upcoming lineup of autonomous
machines.
25
Table of Contents
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
Management’s discussion and analysis of financial condition and results of operations are based upon our consolidated
financial statements, which have been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the
United States, or U.S. GAAP. The preparation of these financial statements requires us to make estimates and
judgments that affect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenue, cost of revenue, expenses and related
disclosure of contingencies. On an on-going basis, we evaluate our estimates, including those related to revenue
recognition, inventories, income taxes, goodwill, cash equivalents and marketable securities, stock-based
compensation, and litigation, investigation and settlement costs and other contingencies. We base our estimates on
historical experience and on various other assumptions that are believed to be reasonable under the circumstances,
the results of which form the basis for making judgments about the carrying values of assets and liabilities.
We believe the following critical accounting policies affect our significant judgments and estimates used in the
preparation of our consolidated financial statements. Our management has discussed the development and selection of
these critical accounting policies and estimates with the Audit Committee of our Board of Directors. The Audit
Committee has reviewed our disclosures relating to our critical accounting policies and estimates in this Annual Report
on Form 10-K.
Revenue Recognition
We derive our revenue from product sales, including hardware and systems, license and development arrangements,
and software licensing. We determine revenue recognition through the following steps: (1) identification of the contract
with a customer; (2) identification of the performance obligations in the contract; (3) determination of the transaction
price; (4) allocation of the transaction price to the performance obligations in the contract; and (5) recognition of
revenue when, or as, we satisfy a performance obligation.
Product Sales Revenue
Revenue from product sales is recognized upon transfer of control of promised products to customers in an amount
that reflects the consideration we expect to receive in exchange for those products. Revenue is recognized net of
allowances for returns, customer programs and any taxes collected from customers.
For products sold with a right of return, we record a reduction to revenue by establishing a sales return allowance for
estimated product returns at the time revenue is recognized, based primarily on historical return rates. However, if
product returns for a fiscal period are anticipated to exceed historical return rates, we may determine that additional
sales return allowances are required to properly reflect our estimated exposure for product returns.
Our customer programs involve rebates, which are designed to serve as sales incentives to resellers of our products in
various target markets, and marketing development funds, or MDFs, which represent monies paid to our partners that
are earmarked for market segment development and are designed to support our partners’ activities while also
promoting NVIDIA products. We account for customer programs as a reduction to revenue and accrue for potential
rebates and MDFs based on the amount we expect to be claimed by customers.
License and Development Arrangements
Our license and development arrangements with customers typically require significant customization of our intellectual
property components. As a result, we recognize the revenue from the license and the revenue from the development
services as a single performance obligation over the period in which the development services are performed. We
measure progress to completion based on actual cost incurred to date as a percentage of the estimated total cost
required to complete each project. If a loss on an arrangement becomes probable during a period, we record a
provision for such loss in that period.
Software Licensing
Our software licenses provide our customers with a right to use the software when it is made available to the customer.
Customers may purchase either perpetual licenses or subscriptions to licenses, which differ mainly in the duration over
which the customer benefits from the software. Software licenses are frequently sold along with post-contract customer
support, or PCS. For such arrangements, we allocate revenue to the software license and PCS on a relative
standalone selling price basis by maximizing the use of observable inputs to determine the standalone selling price for
each performance obligation. Revenue from software licenses is recognized up front when the software is made
available to the customer. PCS revenue is recognized ratably over the service period, or as services are performed.
Refer to Note 1 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K for additional information.
26
Table of Contents
Inventories
Inventory cost is computed on an adjusted standard basis, which approximates actual cost on an average or first-in,
first-out basis. We charge cost of sales for inventory provisions to write down our inventory to the lower of cost or net
realizable value or to completely write off obsolete or excess inventory. Most of our inventory provisions relate to the
write-off of excess quantities of products, based on our inventory levels and future product purchase commitments
compared to assumptions about future demand and market conditions.
Situations that may result in excess or obsolete inventory include changes in business and economic conditions,
changes in market conditions, sudden and significant decreases in demand for our products, inventory obsolescence
because of changing technology and customer requirements, failure to estimate customer demand properly, or
unexpected competitive pricing actions by our competition. In addition, cancellation or deferral of customer purchase
orders could result in our holding excess inventory.
The overall net effect on our gross margin from inventory provisions and sales of items previously written down was an
unfavorable impact of 2.0% in fiscal year 2019 and insignificant in fiscal years 2018 and 2017. The higher amount of
charges we took to cost of sales for inventory provisions during fiscal year 2019 were primarily related to excess
DRAM, other components, and prior architecture components and chips, whereas the charges we took during fiscal
years 2018 and 2017 were primarily related to the write-off of excess quantities of GPU and Tegra products whose
inventory levels were higher than our updated forecasts of future demand for those products. As a fabless
semiconductor company, we must make commitments to purchase inventory based on forecasts of future customer
demand. In doing so, we must account for our third-party manufacturers' lead times and constraints. We also adjust to
other market factors, such as product offerings and pricing actions by our competitors, new product transitions, and
macroeconomic conditions - all of which may impact demand for our products.
Refer to the Gross Profit and Gross Margin discussion below in this Management's Discussion and Analysis for further
discussion.
Income Taxes
We recognize federal, state and foreign current tax liabilities or assets based on our estimate of taxes payable or
refundable in the current fiscal year by tax jurisdiction. We recognize federal, state and foreign deferred tax assets or
liabilities, as appropriate, for our estimate of future tax effects attributable to temporary differences and carryforwards;
and we record a valuation allowance to reduce any deferred tax assets by the amount of any tax benefits that, based
on available evidence and judgment, are not expected to be realized.
Our calculation of deferred tax assets and liabilities is based on certain estimates and judgments and involves dealing
with uncertainties in the application of complex tax laws. Our estimates of deferred tax assets and liabilities may
change based, in part, on added certainty or finality to an anticipated outcome, changes in accounting standards or tax
laws in the United States, or foreign jurisdictions where we operate, or changes in other facts or circumstances. In
addition, we recognize liabilities for potential United States and foreign income tax contingencies based on our estimate
of whether, and the extent to which, additional taxes may be due. If we determine that payment of these amounts is
unnecessary or if the recorded tax liability is less than our current assessment, we may be required to recognize an
income tax benefit or additional income tax expense in our financial statements accordingly.
As of January 27, 2019, we had a valuation allowance of $562 million related to state and certain foreign deferred tax
assets that management determined are not likely to be realized due to projections of future taxable income and
potential utilization limitations of tax attributes acquired as a result of stock ownership changes. To the extent realization
of the deferred tax assets becomes more-likely-than-not, we would recognize such deferred tax asset as an income tax
benefit during the period.
We recognize the benefit from a tax position only if it is more-likely-than-not that the position would be sustained upon
audit based solely on the technical merits of the tax position. Our policy is to include interest and penalties related to
unrecognized tax benefits as a component of income tax expense.
The TCJA, which was enacted in December 2017, significantly changed U.S. tax law, including a reduction of the U.S.
federal corporate income tax rate from 35% to 21%, a requirement for companies to pay a one-time transition tax on
the earnings of certain foreign subsidiaries that were previously tax deferred, and the creation of new taxes (global
intangible low-taxed income, or GILTI) on certain foreign-source earnings. As a fiscal year-end taxpayer, certain
provisions of the TCJA began to impact us in the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2018, while other provisions impacted us
beginning in fiscal year 2019. The SEC had provided guidance in Staff Accounting Bulletin No. 118, Income Tax
Accounting Implications of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (SAB 118), which allowed companies to record provisional
amounts during a measurement period up to one year
27
Table of Contents
from the enactment date. As of January 27, 2019, we completed our accounting for all of the enactment-date income
tax effects of the TCJA and elected to account for GILTI in deferred taxes. Refer to Note 13 of the Notes to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information
specific to accounting for income taxes and the impacts from the enactment of the TCJA.
Goodwill
Goodwill is subject to our annual impairment test during the fourth quarter of our fiscal year, or earlier, if indicators of
potential impairment exist, using either a qualitative or a quantitative assessment. Our impairment review process
compares the fair value of the reporting unit in which the goodwill resides to its carrying value. We have identified two
reporting units, GPU and Tegra Processor, for the purposes of completing our goodwill analysis. Goodwill assigned to
the GPU and Tegra Processor reporting units as of January 27, 2019 was $210 million and $408 million, respectively.
Determining the fair value of a reporting unit requires us to make judgments and involves the use of significant
estimates and assumptions. We also make judgments and assumptions in allocating assets and liabilities to each of
our reporting units. We base our fair value estimates on assumptions we believe to be reasonable but that are
unpredictable and inherently uncertain.
During the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2019, we used the qualitative assessment to test goodwill for impairment for
each reporting unit and concluded there was no impairment.
Refer to Note 5 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on Form
10-K for additional information.
Cash Equivalents and Marketable Securities
Cash equivalents consist of financial instruments which are readily convertible into cash and have original maturities of
three months or less at the time of acquisition. Marketable securities consist of highly liquid debt investments with
maturities greater than three months when purchased. We measure our cash equivalents and marketable securities at
fair value. The fair values of our financial assets are determined using quoted market prices of identical assets or
quoted market prices of similar assets from active markets. All of our available-for-sale debt investments are subject to
a periodic impairment review. We record a charge to earnings when a decline in fair value is significantly below cost
basis and judged to be other-than-temporary, or have other indicators of impairments.
We performed an impairment review of our debt investment portfolio as of January 27, 2019. We concluded that our
debt investments were appropriately valued and that no other-than-temporary impairment charges were necessary on
our portfolio of available-for-sale debt investments as of January 27, 2019.
Refer to Notes 7 and 8 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report
on Form 10-K for additional information.
Stock-based Compensation
Our stock-based compensation expense is associated with restricted stock units, or RSUs, performance stock units
that are based on our corporate financial performance targets, or PSUs, performance stock units that are based on
market conditions, or market-based PSUs, and our employee stock purchase plan. The number of PSUs and market-
based PSUs that will ultimately be awarded is contingent on the Company’s level of achievement compared with the
corporate financial performance target established by our Compensation Committee in the beginning of each fiscal
year.
Refer to Notes 1 and 3 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report
on Form 10-K for additional information.
Litigation, Investigation and Settlement Costs
From time to time, we are involved in legal actions and/or investigations by regulatory bodies. We are aggressively
defending our current litigation matters. However, there are many uncertainties associated with any litigation or
investigations, and we cannot be certain that these actions or other third-party claims against us will be resolved
without costly litigation, fines and/or substantial settlement payments. If that occurs, our business, financial condition
and results of operations could be materially and adversely affected. If information becomes available that causes us to
determine that a loss in any of our pending litigation, investigations or settlements is probable, and we can reasonably
estimate the loss associated with such events, we will record the loss in accordance with U.S. GAAP. However, the
actual liability in any such litigation or investigation may be materially different from our estimates, which could require
us to record additional costs.
28
Table of Contents
Results of Operations
The following table sets forth, for the periods indicated, certain items in our Consolidated Statements of Income
expressed as a percentage of revenue. 
  Year Ended
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018  January 29,
2017
Revenue 100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 %
Cost of revenue 38.8 40.1  41.2
Gross profit 61.2 59.9  58.8
Operating expenses:   
Research and development 20.3 18.5  21.2
Sales, general and administrative 8.5 8.4  9.6
Total operating expenses 28.7 26.9  30.8
Income from operations 32.5 33.0  28.0
Interest income 1.2 0.7  0.8
Interest expense (0.5) (0.6) (0.8)
Other, net 0.1 (0.2) (0.4)
Total other income (expense) 0.8 (0.1) (0.4)
Income before income tax expense 33.3 32.9  27.6
Income tax expense (benefit) (2.1) 1.5  3.5
Net income 35.3 % 31.4 % 24.1 %
Revenue
Revenue by Reportable Segments
 Year Ended  Year Ended
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018$
Change%
Change  January 28,
2018  January 29,
2017  $
Change  %
Change
 ($ in millions)  ($ in millions)
GPU $ 10,175 $ 8,137 $2,038 25 % $ 8,137  $ 5,822  $2,315  40 %
Tegra
Processor 1,541 1,534 7 — % 1,534  824  710  86 %
All Other — 43 (43) (100)% 43 264  (221) (84)%
Total $ 11,716 $ 9,714 $2,002 21 % $ 9,714  $ 6,910  $2,804  41 %
GPU Business. GPU business revenue increased by 25% in fiscal year 2019 compared to fiscal year 2018. This
increase was due primarily to 18% growth in sales of GeForce GPU products for gaming, driven by initial sales of
Turing-based GPUs for desktops and by high-performance notebooks based on our Max-Q technology. Datacenter
revenue, including Tesla, GRID and DGX, increased 52%, reflecting strong sales of our Volta architecture products,
including NVIDIA Tesla V100 and DGX systems. Revenue from Quadro GPUs for professional visualization increased
21% due primarily to higher sales across desktop and mobile workstation products. Our PC OEM revenue decreased
by 1% driven by the absence of Intel licensing revenue in fiscal year 2019. Revenue from cryptocurrency-specific
products in fiscal years 2019 and 2018 was $306 million and $273 million, respectively. We expect cryptocurrency-
related revenue to be negligible going forward.
GPU business revenue increased by 40% in fiscal year 2018 compared to fiscal year 2017 led by growth in gaming,
datacenter and professional visualization. Revenue from sales of GeForce GPU products for gaming increased over
20%, reflecting continued strong demand for our Pascal-based GPU products. Datacenter revenue, including Tesla,
GRID and DGX, increased 133%, reflecting strong demand from hyperscale and cloud customers for deep learning
training and accelerated GPU computing as well as demand for HPC, DGX AI supercomputing and GRID virtualization
platforms. Revenue from Quadro GPUs for professional visualization increased by 12% due primarily to higher sales in
both high-end desktop and mobile
29
Table of Contents
workstation products. Revenue from GeForce GPU products for mainstream PC OEMs increased by over 90% due
primarily to strong demand for GPU products targeted for cryptocurrency mining.
Tegra Processor Business.  Tegra Processor business revenue was up slightly in fiscal year 2019 compared to fiscal
year 2018. This was driven by an increase of over 15% in automotive revenue, primarily from infotainment modules,
production DRIVE PX platforms, and development agreements with automotive companies, offset by a decline of
approximately 15% in SOC modules for gaming platforms and related development services.
Tegra Processor business revenue increased by 86% in fiscal year 2018 compared to fiscal year 2017. This was driven
by an increase of over 300% in revenue from SOC modules for gaming platforms and development services, and an
increase of 15% in automotive revenue, primarily from infotainment modules, DRIVE PX platforms and development
agreements for self-driving cars.
All Other. Our patent license agreement with Intel concluded in the first quarter of fiscal year 2018. For fiscal year
2018, we recognized related revenue of $43 million, down from $264 million for fiscal year 2017.
Concentration of Revenue
Revenue from sales to customers outside of the United States accounted for 87% of total revenue for each of fiscal
years 2019, 2018, and 2017. Revenue by geographic region is allocated to individual countries based on the location to
which the products are initially billed even if the revenue is attributable to end customers in a different location.
No single customer represented more than 10% of total revenue for fiscal years 2019 and 2018. In fiscal year 2017, we
had one customer that represented 12% of our total revenue.
Gross Profit and Gross Margin
Gross profit consists of total revenue, net of allowances, less cost of revenue. Cost of revenue consists primarily of the
cost of semiconductors purchased from subcontractors, including wafer fabrication, assembly, testing and packaging,
board and device costs, manufacturing support costs, including labor and overhead associated with such purchases,
final test yield fallout, inventory and warranty provisions, memory and component costs, and shipping costs. Cost of
revenue also includes development costs for license and service arrangements and stock-based compensation related
to personnel associated with manufacturing.
Our overall gross margin was 61.2%, 59.9%, and 58.8% for fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. The
increase in fiscal year 2019 reflects our continued shift toward higher-value platforms, which more than offset the
impact of approximately $128 million in charges for excess DRAM and other components we recorded in the fourth
quarter of fiscal year 2019 and a charge of $57 million we recorded during the third quarter of fiscal year 2019 related
to prior architecture components and chips. The increase in fiscal year 2018 was driven primarily by a favorable shift in
mix, the growth of our GeForce gaming GPU revenue, and the growth of our datacenter revenue for cloud, deep
learning, AI, and graphics virtualization. The increase in fiscal year 2018 was partially offset by the conclusion of our
patent license agreement with Intel in the first quarter of fiscal year 2018.
Inventory provisions totaled $270 million, $48 million, and $62 million for fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017,
respectively. Sales of inventory that was previously written-off or written-down totaled $41 million, $35 million, and $51
million for fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. As a result, the overall net effect on our gross margin was an
unfavorable impact of 2.0% in fiscal year 2019 and insignificant in fiscal years 2018 and 2017.
A discussion of our gross margin results for each of our reportable segments is as follows:
GPU Business. The gross margin of our GPU business increased during fiscal year 2019 when compared to fiscal
year 2018, primarily due to strong sales of high-end GeForce gaming GPUs and revenue growth in Datacenter,
including Tesla, GRID and DGX, for cloud, deep learning, AI, and graphics virtualization. The gross margin of our
GPU business increased during fiscal year 2018 when compared to fiscal year 2017 primarily due to strong sales
of our GeForce gaming GPU products and revenue growth in datacenter, including Tesla, GRID and DGX, for
cloud, deep learning, AI, and graphics virtualization.
Tegra Processor Business. The gross margin of our Tegra Processor business increased during fiscal year 2019
when compared to fiscal year 2018, primarily due to a favorable mix shift. The gross margin of our Tegra Processor
business increased during fiscal year 2018 when compared to fiscal year 2017, primarily due to revenue growth in
gaming development platforms and automotive.
30
Table of Contents
Operating Expenses
 Year Ended Year Ended
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018  $
Change%
ChangeJanuary 28,
2018January 29,
2017$
Change  %
Change
 ($ in millions) ($ in millions)
Research and
development
expenses $ 2,376  $ 1,797  $ 579 32%$ 1,797 $ 1,463 $ 334  23 %
% of net revenue 20.3% 18.5%   18.5% 21.2%   
Sales, general
and
administrative
expenses 991  815  176 22% 815 663 152  23 %
% of net revenue 8.5% 8.4%   8.4% 9.6%   
Restructuring
and other
charges —  —  — —% — 3 (3) (100)%
% of net revenue —% —%   —% —%   
Total
operating
expenses $ 3,367  $ 2,612  $ 755 29%$ 2,612 $ 2,129 $ 483  23 %
Research and Development
Research and development expenses increased by 32% in fiscal year 2019 compared to fiscal year 2018 and
increased by 23% in fiscal year 2018 compared to fiscal year 2017, driven primarily by employee additions and
increases in employee compensation and other related costs, including infrastructure costs and stock-based
compensation expense.
Sales, General and Administrative
Sales, general and administrative expenses increased by 22% in fiscal year 2019 compared to fiscal year 2018 and
increased by 23% in fiscal year 2018 compared to fiscal year 2017, driven primarily by employee additions and
increases in employee compensation and other related costs, including infrastructure costs and stock-based
compensation expense.
Total Other Income (Expense)
Interest Income and Interest Expense
Interest income consists of interest earned on cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities. Interest income was
$136 million, $69 million, and $54 million in fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. The increase in interest
income was primarily due to higher average invested balances and higher rates from our floating rate securities and the
purchase of new securities.
Interest expense is primarily comprised of coupon interest and debt discount amortization related to the 2.20% Notes
Due 2021 and 3.20% Notes Due 2026 issued in September 2016, and the Convertible Notes issued in December 2013.
Interest expense was $58 million, $61 million, and $58 million in fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively.
Other, Net
Other, net, consists primarily of realized or unrealized gains and losses from non-affiliated investments, losses on early
debt conversions of the Convertible Notes, and the impact of changes in foreign currency rates. Other, net, was $14
million of income during fiscal year 2019, consisting primarily of $12 million unrealized gains from non-affiliated
investments. Other, net, was $22 million and $25 million of expense in fiscal years 2018 and 2017, respectively,
consisting primarily of $19 million and $21 million of losses recognized from early conversions of the Convertible
Notes during fiscal years 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Income Taxes
The TCJA, which was enacted in December 2017, significantly changed U.S. tax law, including a reduction of the U.S.
federal corporate income tax rate from 35% to 21%, a requirement for companies to pay a one-time transition tax on
the earnings of certain foreign subsidiaries that were previously tax deferred and the creation of new taxes (GILTI) on
certain foreign-source earnings. As a fiscal year-end taxpayer, certain provisions of the TCJA began to impact us in the
fourth quarter of fiscal year 2018, while other provisions impacted us beginning in fiscal year 2019.
31
Table of Contents
We recognized income tax benefit of $245 million for fiscal year 2019, and income tax expense of $149 million and
$239 million for fiscal years 2018, and 2017, respectively. Our annual effective tax rate was (6.3)%, 4.7%, and 12.5%
for fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. The decrease in our effective tax rate in fiscal year 2019 as
compared to fiscal years 2018 and 2017 was primarily due to a decrease in the U.S. statutory tax rate from 33.9% to
21%, the finalization of the enactment-date income tax effects of the TCJA, higher U.S federal research tax credits and
excess tax benefits related to stock-based compensation in fiscal year 2019.
The decrease in our effective tax rate in fiscal year 2018 as compared to fiscal year 2017 was primarily due to the
provisional impact of the tax law changes and recognition of excess tax benefits related to stock-based compensation.
Our effective tax rate for fiscal year 2019 was lower than the U.S. federal statutory rate of 21% due primarily to income
earned in jurisdictions, including British Virgin Islands, Hong Kong, China, Taiwan and United Kingdom, where the tax
rate was lower than the U.S. federal statutory tax rates, the finalization of the enactment-date income tax effects of the
TCJA, favorable recognition of U.S. federal research tax credits, and excess tax benefits related to stock-based
compensation.
Our effective tax rate for fiscal years 2018 and 2017 was lower than the blended U.S. federal statutory rate of 33.9% for
fiscal year 2018 and 35% for fiscal year 2017 due primarily to income earned in jurisdictions, including British Virgin
Islands, Hong Kong, China, Taiwan and United Kingdom, where the tax rate was lower than the U.S. federal statutory
tax rates, favorable recognition of U.S. federal research tax credits, the provisional impact of the tax law changes in
2018, and excess tax benefits related to stock-based compensation.
In fiscal year 2018 and the first nine months of fiscal year 2019, we recorded provisional amounts for certain
enactment-date effects of the TCJA by applying the SEC guidance in SAB 118 because we had not yet completed our
accounting for these effects. Furthermore, under U.S. GAAP, we can make an accounting policy election to either treat
taxes due on the GILTI as a current period expense or factor such amounts into our measurement of deferred taxes.
Because we were still evaluating the GILTI provisions as of January 28, 2018, we recorded no GILTI-related deferred
balances. After further evaluation, we elected to account for GILTI deferred taxes. As of January 27, 2019, we
completed our accounting for all of the enactment-date income tax effects of the TCJA and recognized a reduction of
$368 million to the provisional amount recorded at January 28, 2018, primarily relating to the effects of electing to
account for GILTI in deferred taxes.
Refer to Note 13 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K for additional information.
Liquidity and Capital Resources 
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018
 (In millions)
Cash and cash equivalents $ 782$ 4,002
Marketable securities 6,640 3,106
Cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities $ 7,422$ 7,108
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018January 29,
2017
 (In millions)
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 3,743 $ 3,502$ 1,672
Net cash provided by (used in) investing activities $ (4,097) $ 1,278$ (793)
Net cash provided by (used in) financing activities $ (2,866) $ (2,544)$ 291
As of January 27, 2019, we had $7.42 billion in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities, an increase of $314
million from the end of fiscal year 2018. Our investment policy requires the purchase of highly rated fixed income
securities, the diversification of investment types and credit exposures, and certain limits on our portfolio duration.
Cash provided by operating activities increased in fiscal year 2019 compared to fiscal year 2018, primarily due to
higher net income, partially offset by changes in working capital. Cash provided by operating activities increased in
fiscal year 2018 compared to fiscal year 2017, primarily due to higher net income and changes in working capital.
32
Table of Contents
Cash used in investing activities increased in fiscal year 2019 compared to fiscal year 2018, due to higher purchases
and lower sales of marketable securities, partially offset by higher maturities of marketable securities. Cash provided by
investing activities for fiscal year 2018 increased from fiscal year 2017, primarily due to a reduction in purchases of
marketable securities, partially offset by the purchase of our previously-financed Santa Clara campus building.
Cash used in financing activities increased in fiscal year 2019 compared to fiscal year 2018, due to higher share
repurchases and higher tax payments related to employee stock plans, partially offset by lower repayments of
Convertible Notes. Cash used in financing activities in fiscal year 2018 increased from fiscal year 2017, primarily due to
cash provided from the issuance of $2.00 billion of Notes in fiscal year 2017 as well as higher repayments of
Convertible Notes, tax payments related to employee stock plans, share repurchases and dividend payments in fiscal
year 2018.
Liquidity
Our primary sources of liquidity are our cash and cash equivalents, our marketable securities, and the cash generated
by our operations. As of January 27, 2019 and January 28, 2018, we had $7.42 billion and $7.11 billion, respectively, in
cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities. Our marketable securities consist of debt securities issued by the
U.S. government and its agencies, highly rated corporations and financial institutions, asset-backed issuers, mortgage-
backed securities by government-sponsored enterprises, and foreign government entities. These marketable securities
are denominated in United States dollars. Refer to Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates in Part II, Item 7,
Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk in Part II, Item 7A and Note 7 of the Notes to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
As a result of the TCJA, substantially all of our cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities held outside of the
United States as of January 27, 2019 are available for use in the United States without incurring additional U.S. federal
income taxes. Refer to Note 13 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual
Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
Capital Return to Shareholders
We previously announced our plan to return $1.25 billion to shareholders in fiscal year 2019 and an additional $3.00
billion by the end of fiscal year 2020 - some of which would begin in the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2019. During fiscal
year 2019, we repurchased a total of 9 million shares for $1.58 billion, including $700 million of the $3.00 billion, and
paid $371 million in cash dividends.
We intend to return the remaining $2.30 billion of the $3.00 billion to shareholders by the end of fiscal year 2020
through a combination of share repurchases and cash dividends.
In November 2018, the Board authorized an additional $7.00 billion under our share repurchase program and extended
it through the end of December 2022. As of January 27, 2019, we were authorized to repurchase additional shares of
our common stock up to $7.24 billion.
In November 2018, we also announced a 7% increase in our quarterly cash dividend to $0.16 per share from $0.15 per
share.
Our cash dividend program and the payment of future cash dividends under that program are subject to our Board's
continuing determination that the dividend program and the declaration of dividends thereunder are in the best interests
of our shareholders. Refer to Note 14 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K for further discussion.
Notes Due 2021 and Notes Due 2026
In fiscal year 2017, we issued $1.00 billion of the Notes Due 2021 and $1.00 billion of the Notes Due 2026, collectively,
the Notes. The net proceeds from the Notes were $1.98 billion, after deducting debt discounts and issuance costs.
Revolving Credit Facility
We have a Credit Agreement under which we may borrow up to $575 million for general corporate purposes and can
obtain revolving loan commitments up to $425 million. As of January 27, 2019, we had not borrowed any amounts
under this agreement.
Commercial Paper
We have a $575 million commercial paper program to support general corporate purposes. As of January 27, 2019, we
had not issued any commercial paper.
33
Table of Contents
Refer to Note 11 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K for further discussion.
Operating Capital and Capital Expenditure Requirements
In fiscal year 2019, we began construction on a 750 thousand square foot building on our Santa Clara campus, which is
currently targeted for completion in fiscal year 2022. We believe that our existing cash balances and anticipated cash
flows from operations will be sufficient to meet our operating requirements for at least the next twelve months.
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements
As of January 27, 2019, we had no material off-balance sheet arrangements as defined by applicable SEC regulations.
Contractual Obligations
The following table summarizes our contractual obligations as of January 27, 2019:
 Payment Due By Period
Contractual Obligations TotalLess than
1 Year  1-3 Years 4-5 YearsMore than
5 Years  All Other
 (In millions)
Long-term debt (1) $ 2,302$ 54 $ 1,100$ 64$ 1,084 $ —
Inventory purchase obligations 912 912 — — — —
Transition tax payable (2) 384 33 67 96 188 —
Uncertain tax positions, interest
and penalties (3) 163 — — — — 163
Operating leases 683 100 187 131 265 —
Capital purchase obligations 258 192 66 — — —
Total contractual obligations $ 4,702$ 1,291 $ 1,420$ 291$ 1,537 $ 163
(1) Represents the aggregate principal amount of $2.00 billion and anticipated interest payments of $302 million for the Notes. Refer to Note 11
of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
(2) Represents our remaining tax payable of the one-time transition tax that resulted from enactment of the TCJA in fiscal year 2018. As of
January 27, 2019, we have paid the first installment of $33 million. The remaining will be payable in seven annual installments. The next
installment of $33 million is classified as a current income tax payable. The installment amounts are equal to 8% of the total liability,
payable in fiscal years 2019 through 2023, 15% in fiscal year 2024, 20% in fiscal year 2025 and 25% in fiscal year 2026. Refer to Note 13
of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, for additional information
about the one-time transition tax.
(3) Represents unrecognized tax benefits of $163 million which consists of $142 million and the related interest and penalties of $21 million
recorded in non-current income tax payable as of January 27, 2019. We are unable to reasonably estimate the timing of any potential tax
liability or interest/penalty payments in individual years due to uncertainties in the underlying income tax positions and the timing of the
effective settlement of such tax positions.
Adoption of New and Recently Issued Accounting Pronouncements
Refer to Note 1 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K for a discussion of adoption of new and recently issued accounting pronouncements.
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
Investment and Interest Rate Risk
We are exposed to interest rate risk related to our floating and fixed-rate investment portfolio and outstanding debt. The
investment portfolio is managed consistent with our overall liquidity strategy in support of both working capital needs
and strategic growth of our businesses.
As of January 27, 2019, we performed a sensitivity analysis on our floating and fixed rate financial investments.
According to our analysis, parallel shifts in the yield curve of plus or minus 0.5% would result in a decrease in fair value
for these investments of $8 million, or an increase in fair value for these investments of $7 million, respectively.
In fiscal year 2017, we issued $1.00 billion of the Notes Due 2021 and $1.00 billion of the Notes Due 2026. We carry
the Notes at face value less unamortized discount on our Consolidated Balance Sheets. As the Notes bear interest at a
fixed rate, we have no financial statement risk associated with changes in interest rates. Refer to Note 11 of the Notes
to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional
information.
34
Table of Contents
Foreign Exchange Rate Risk
We consider our direct exposure to foreign exchange rate fluctuations to be minimal. Gains or losses from foreign
currency remeasurement are included in other income or expense and to date have not been significant. The impact of
foreign currency transaction gain or loss included in determining net income was not significant for fiscal years 2019,
2018, and 2017.
Sales and arrangements with third-party manufacturers provide for pricing and payment in United States dollars, and,
therefore, are not subject to exchange rate fluctuations. Increases in the value of the United States’ dollar relative to
other currencies would make our products more expensive, which could negatively impact our ability to compete.
Conversely, decreases in the value of the United States’ dollar relative to other currencies could result in our suppliers
raising their prices in order to continue doing business with us. Additionally, we have international operations and incur
expenditures in currencies other than U.S. dollars. Our operating expenses benefit from a stronger dollar and are
adversely affected by a weaker dollar.
We use foreign currency forward contracts to mitigate the impact of foreign currency exchange rate movements on our
operating expenses. We designate these contracts as cash flow hedges and assess the effectiveness of the hedge
relationships on a spot to spot basis. Gains or losses on the contracts are recorded in accumulated other
comprehensive income or loss, and then reclassified to operating expense when the related operating expenses are
recognized in earnings or ineffectiveness should occur.
We also use foreign currency forward contracts to mitigate the impact of foreign currency movements on monetary
assets and liabilities that are denominated in currencies other than U.S. dollar. These forward contracts were not
designated for hedge accounting treatment. Therefore, the change in fair value of these contracts is recorded in other
income or expense and offsets the change in fair value of the hedged foreign currency denominated monetary assets
and liabilities, which is also recorded in other income or expense.
Refer to Note 10 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K for additional information.
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
The information required by this Item is set forth in our Consolidated Financial Statements and Notes thereto included
in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. 
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND
FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE
None. 
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
Controls and Procedures
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Based on their evaluation as of January 27, 2019, our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief
Financial Officer, has concluded that our disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or the Exchange Act) were effective to provide reasonable assurance.
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Our management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting, as
such term is defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). Under the supervision and with the participation of our
management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, we conducted an evaluation of the
effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as of January 27, 2019 based on the criteria set forth in
Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission. Based on our evaluation under the criteria set forth in Internal Control — Integrated Framework, our
management concluded that our internal control over financial reporting was effective as of January 27, 2019.
The effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as of January 27, 2019 has been audited by
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, as stated in its report which is
included herein.
35
Table of Contents
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There were no changes in our internal control over financial reporting during our last fiscal quarter that have materially
affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.
Inherent Limitations on Effectiveness of Controls
Our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, does not expect that our disclosure
controls and procedures or our internal controls, will prevent all error and all fraud. A control system, no matter how well
conceived and operated, can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system
are met. Further, the design of a control system must reflect the fact that there are resource constraints, and the
benefits of controls must be considered relative to their costs. Because of the inherent limitations in all control systems,
no evaluation of controls can provide absolute assurance that all control issues and instances of fraud, if any, within
NVIDIA have been detected.
ITEM 9B.  OTHER INFORMATION
None.
PART III 
Certain information required by Part III is omitted from this report because we will file with the SEC a definitive proxy
statement pursuant to Regulation 14A, or the 2019 Proxy Statement, no later than 120 days after the end of fiscal year
2019, and certain information included therein is incorporated herein by reference.
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Identification of Directors
Information regarding directors required by this item will be contained in our 2019 Proxy Statement under the caption
“Proposal 1 - Election of Directors,” and is hereby incorporated by reference.
Identification of Executive Officers
Reference is made to the information regarding executive officers appearing under the heading “Executive Officers of
the Registrant” in Part I of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, which information is hereby incorporated by reference.
Identification of Audit Committee and Financial Experts
Information regarding our Audit Committee required by this item will be contained in our 2019 Proxy Statement under
the captions “Report of the Audit Committee of the Board of Directors” and “Information About the Board of Directors
and Corporate Governance,” and is hereby incorporated by reference.
Material Changes to Procedures for Recommending Directors
Information regarding procedures for recommending directors required by this item will be contained in our 2019 Proxy
Statement under the caption “Information About the Board of Directors and Corporate Governance,” and is hereby
incorporated by reference.
Compliance with Section 16(a) of the Exchange Act
Information regarding compliance with Section 16(a) of the Exchange Act required by this item will be contained in our
2019 Proxy Statement under the caption “Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership Reporting Compliance,” and is hereby
incorporated by reference.
Code of Conduct
Information regarding our Code of Conduct required by this item will be contained in our 2019 Proxy Statement under
the caption “Information About the Board of Directors and Corporate Governance - Code of Conduct,” and is hereby
incorporated by reference. The full text of our Code of Conduct and Financial Team Code of Conduct are published on
the Investor Relations portion of our website, under Corporate Governance, at www.nvidia.com. The contents of our
website are not a part of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. 
36
Table of Contents
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
Information regarding our executive compensation required by this item will be contained in our 2019 Proxy Statement
under the captions “Executive Compensation”, “Compensation Committee Interlocks and Insider Participation”,
“Director Compensation” and “Compensation Committee Report,” and is hereby incorporated by reference.
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND
RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
Ownership of NVIDIA Securities
Information regarding ownership of NVIDIA securities required by this item will be contained in our 2019 Proxy
Statement under the caption “Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management,” and is hereby
incorporated by reference.
Equity Compensation Plan Information
Information regarding our equity compensation plans required by this item will be contained in our 2019 Proxy
Statement under the caption "Equity Compensation Plan Information," and is hereby incorporated by reference.
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR
INDEPENDENCE
Information regarding related transactions and director independence required by this item will be contained in our
2019 Proxy Statement under the captions “Review of Transactions with Related Persons” and “Information About the
Board of Directors and Corporate Governance - Independence of the Members of the Board of Directors,” and is
hereby incorporated by reference.
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTING FEES AND SERVICES
Information regarding accounting fees and services required by this item will be contained in our 2019 Proxy Statement
under the caption “Fees Billed by the Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm,” and is hereby incorporated by
reference. 
37
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS, FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULE
    Page
(a)1. Financial Statements  
   Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 39
   Consolidated Statements of Income for the years ended January 27, 2019, January 28, 2018, and
January 29, 2017 41
   Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended January 27, 2019,
January 28, 2018, and January 29, 2017 42
   Consolidated Balance Sheets as of January 27, 2019 and January 28, 2018 43
   Consolidated Statements of Shareholders’ Equity for the years ended January 27, 2019, January
28, 2018, and January 29, 2017 44
   Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended January 27, 2019, January 28, 2018,
and January 29, 2017 45
   Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements 47
 2. Financial Statement Schedule  
   Schedule II Valuation and Qualifying Accounts for the years ended January 27, 2019, January 28,
2018, and January 29, 2017 74
 3. Exhibits  
   The exhibits listed in the accompanying index to exhibits are filed or incorporated by reference as
a part of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. 75
38
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM 
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors of NVIDIA Corporation
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of NVIDIA Corporation and its subsidiaries as of
January 27, 2019 and January 28, 2018, and the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income,
shareholders’ equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended January 27, 2019, including the
related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the index appearing under Item 15(a)(2) (collectively referred to
as the “consolidated financial statements”). We also have audited the Company's internal control over financial
reporting as of January 27, 2019, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013)
issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the
financial position of the Company as of January 27, 2019 and January 28, 2018, and the results of its operations and its
cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended January 27, 2019 in conformity with accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States of America. Also in our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material
respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of January 27, 2019, based on criteria established in
Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company's management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining effective
internal control over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial
reporting, included in Management's Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting appearing under Item
9A. Our responsibility is to express opinions on the Company’s consolidated financial statements and on the
Company's internal control over financial reporting based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with
the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with
respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of
the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of
material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was
maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material
misstatement of the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that
respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and
disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used
and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated
financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting included obtaining an understanding of
internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating
the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits also included
performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits
provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding
the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies
and procedures that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the
transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of
management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely
detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on
the financial statements.
39
Table of Contents
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become
inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may
deteriorate.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
San Jose, California
February 21, 2019
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 2004.  
40
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
(In millions, except per share data)
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018  January 29,
2017
Revenue $ 11,716 $ 9,714 $ 6,910
Cost of revenue 4,545 3,892 2,847
Gross profit 7,171 5,822 4,063
Operating expenses      
Research and development 2,376 1,797 1,463
Sales, general and administrative 991 815 663
Restructuring and other charges — — 3
Total operating expenses 3,367 2,612 2,129
Income from operations 3,804 3,210 1,934
Interest income 136 69 54
Interest expense (58) (61) (58)
Other, net 14 (22) (25)
Total other income (expense) 92 (14) (29)
Income before income tax 3,896 3,196 1,905
Income tax expense (benefit) (245) 149 239
Net income $ 4,141 $ 3,047 $ 1,666
     
Net income per share:     
Basic $ 6.81 $ 5.09 $ 3.08
Diluted $ 6.63 $ 4.82 $ 2.57
     
Weighted average shares used in per share computation:     
Basic 608 599 541
Diluted 625 632 649
     
Cash dividends declared and paid per common share $ 0.610 $ 0.570 $ 0.485
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
41
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(In millions)
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018  January 29,
2017
     
Net income $ 4,141 $ 3,047 $ 1,666
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax     
Available-for-sale debt securities:     
Net unrealized gain (loss) 10 (5) (17)
Reclassification adjustments for net realized gain included in
net income 1 1 1
Net change in unrealized gain (loss) 11 (4) (16)
Cash flow hedges:     
Net unrealized gain (loss) 6 (1) 2
Reclassification adjustments for net realized gain (loss)
included in net income (11) 3 2
Net change in unrealized gain (loss) (5) 2 4
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax 6 (2) (12)
Total comprehensive income $ 4,147 $ 3,045 $ 1,654
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
42
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In millions, except par value)
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018
ASSETS   
Current assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 782 $ 4,002
Marketable securities 6,640 3,106
Accounts receivable, net 1,424 1,265
Inventories 1,575 796
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 136 86
Total current assets 10,557 9,255
Property and equipment, net 1,404 997
Goodwill 618 618
Intangible assets, net 45 52
Other assets 668 319
Total assets $ 13,292$ 11,241
   
LIABILITIES AND SHAREHOLDERS' EQUITY
Current liabilities:   
Accounts payable $ 511 $ 596
Accrued and other current liabilities 818 542
Convertible short-term debt — 15
Total current liabilities 1,329 1,153
Long-term debt 1,988 1,985
Other long-term liabilities 633 632
Total liabilities 3,950 3,770
Commitments and contingencies - see Note 12
Shareholders’ equity:   
Preferred stock, $.001 par value; 2 shares authorized; none issued — —
Common stock, $.001 par value; 2,000 shares authorized; 945 shares
issued and 606 outstanding as of January 27, 2019; 932 shares issued and
606 outstanding as of January 28, 2018 1 1
Additional paid-in capital 6,051 5,351
Treasury stock, at cost (339 shares in 2019 and 326 shares in 2018) (9,263) (6,650)
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (12) (18)
Retained earnings 12,565 8,787
Total shareholders' equity 9,342 7,471
Total liabilities and shareholders' equity $ 13,292$ 11,241
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
43
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF SHAREHOLDERS’ EQUITY
 Common Stock
Outstanding Additional Treasury  Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive Retained  Total
Shareholders'
(In millions, except per share data) Shares Amount Paid-in
Capital  Stock   Income (Loss)  Earnings   Equity
Balances, January 31, 2016539 $ 1 $ 4,170 $(4,048 ) $ (4)$4,350  $ 4,469
Retained earnings adjustment due to adoption of an
accounting standard related to stock-based
compensation — — — — — 353  353
Other comprehensive loss — — — — (12) — (12)
Net income — — — — — 1,666  1,666
Issuance of common stock in exchange for warrants 44 — (1) — — — (1)
Convertible debt conversion 23 — (6) — — — (6)
Issuance of common stock from stock plans 20 — 167 — — — 167
Tax withholding related to vesting of restricted stock
units (3) — — (177) — — (177)
Share repurchase (15) — — (739) — — (739)
Exercise of convertible note hedges (23) — 75 (75) — — —
Cash dividends declared and paid ($0.485 per
common share) — — — — — (261) (261)
Stock-based compensation — — 248 — — — 248
Reclassification of convertible debt conversion
obligation — — 55 — — — 55
Balances, January 29, 2017585 1 4,708 (5,039 ) (16) 6,108  5,762
Retained earnings adjustment due to adoption of an
accounting standard related to income tax
consequences of an intra-entity transfer of an asset — — — — — (27) (27)
Other comprehensive loss — — — — (2) — (2)
Net income — — — — — 3,047  3,047
Issuance of common stock in exchange for warrants 13 — — — — — —
Convertible debt conversion 33 — (7) — — — (7)
Issuance of common stock from stock plans 18 — 138 — — — 138
Tax withholding related to vesting of restricted stock
units (4) — — (612) — — (612)
Share repurchase (6) — — (909) — — (909)
Exercise of convertible note hedges (33) — 90 (90) — — —
Cash dividends declared and paid ($0.570 per
common share) — — — — — (341) (341)
Stock-based compensation — — 391 — — — 391
Reclassification of convertible debt conversion
obligation — — 31 — — — 31
Balances, January 28, 2018 606 1 5,351 (6,650 ) (18) 8,787  7,471
Retained earnings adjustment due to adoption of new
revenue accounting standard — — — — — 8 8
Other comprehensive loss — — — — 6 — 6
Net income — — — — — 4,141  4,141
Convertible debt conversion 1 — — — — — —
Issuance of common stock from stock plans 13 — 137 — — — 137
Tax withholding related to vesting of restricted stock
units (4) — — (1,032 ) — — (1,032 )
Share repurchase (9) — — (1,579 ) — — (1,579 )
Exercise of convertible note hedges (1) — 2 (2) — — —
Cash dividends declared and paid ($0.610 per
common share) — — — — — (371) (371)
Stock-based compensation — — 561 — — — 561
Balances, January 27, 2019 606 $ 1 $ 6,051 $(9,263 ) $ (12)$12,565  $ 9,342
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
44
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In millions)
   Year Ended
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018January 29,
2017
Cash flows from operating activities:     
Net income $ 4,141  $ 3,047 $ 1,666
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating
activities:     
Stock-based compensation expense 557  391 247
Depreciation and amortization 262  199 187
Deferred income taxes (315) (359) 197
Loss on early debt conversions — 19 21
Other (45) 20 33
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:     
Accounts receivable (149) (440) (321)
Inventories (776) — (375)
Prepaid expenses and other assets (55) 21 (18)
Accounts payable (135) 90 184
Accrued and other current liabilities 256  33 (135)
Other long-term liabilities 2 481 (14)
Net cash provided by operating activities 3,743  3,502 1,672
Cash flows from investing activities:     
Proceeds from maturities of marketable securities 7,232  1,078 969
Proceeds from sales of marketable securities 428  863 1,546
Purchases of marketable securities (11,148 ) (36) (3,134 )
Purchases of property and equipment and intangible assets (600) (593) (176)
Investment in non-af filiates (9) (36) (5)
Proceeds from sale of long-lived assets and investments — 2 7
Net cash provided by (used in) investing activities (4,097 ) 1,278 (793)
Cash flows from financing activities:     
Proceeds from issuance of debt — — 1,988
Payments related to repurchases of common stock(1,579 ) (909) (739)
Repayment of Convertible Notes (16) (812) (673)
Dividends paid (371) (341) (261)
Proceeds related to employee stock plans 137  139 167
Payments related to tax on restricted stock units (1,032 ) (612) (176)
Other (5) (9) (15)
Net cash provided by (used in) financing activities (2,866 ) (2,544 ) 291
Change in cash and cash equivalents (3,220 ) 2,236 1,170
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of period 4,002  1,766 596
Cash and cash equivalents at end of period $ 782  $ 4,002 $ 1,766
45
Table of Contents
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018January 29,
2017
Supplemental disclosures of cash flow information:    
Cash paid for income taxes, net $ 61 $ 22 $ 14
Cash paid for interest $ 55 $ 55 $ 13
    
Non-cash investing and financing activity:    
Assets acquired by assuming related liabilities $ 76 $ 36 $ 16
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
46
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 1 - Organization and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Our Company
Headquartered in Santa Clara, California, NVIDIA was incorporated in California in April 1993 and reincorporated in
Delaware in April 1998.
All references to “NVIDIA,” “we,” “us,” “our” or the “Company” mean NVIDIA Corporation and its subsidiaries.
Fiscal Year
We operate on a 52- or 53-week year, ending on the last Sunday in January. Fiscal years 2019, 2018 and 2017 were
52-week years.
Reclassifications
Certain prior fiscal year balances have been reclassified to conform to the current fiscal year presentation.
Principles of Consolidation
Our consolidated financial statements include the accounts of NVIDIA Corporation and our wholly-owned subsidiaries.
All intercompany balances and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation.
Use of Estimates
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires management to make estimates and
assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosures of contingent assets and liabilities
at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reporting period.
Actual results could differ materially from our estimates. On an on-going basis, we evaluate our estimates, including
those related to revenue recognition, cash equivalents and marketable securities, accounts receivable, inventories,
income taxes, goodwill, stock-based compensation, litigation, investigation and settlement costs, restructuring and
other charges, and other contingencies. These estimates are based on historical facts and various other assumptions
that we believe are reasonable.
Revenue Recognition
We derive our revenue from product sales, including hardware and systems, license and development arrangements,
and software licensing. We determine revenue recognition through the following steps: (1) identification of the contract
with a customer; (2) identification of the performance obligations in the contract; (3) determination of the transaction
price; (4) allocation of the transaction price to the performance obligations in the contract; and (5) recognition of
revenue when, or as, we satisfy a performance obligation.
Product Sales Revenue
Revenue from product sales is recognized upon transfer of control of promised products to customers in an amount
that reflects the consideration we expect to receive in exchange for those products. Revenue is recognized net of
allowances for returns, customer programs and any taxes collected from customers.
For products sold with a right of return, we record a reduction to revenue by establishing a sales return allowance for
estimated product returns at the time revenue is recognized, based primarily on historical return rates. However, if
product returns for a fiscal period are anticipated to exceed historical return rates, we may determine that additional
sales return allowances are required to properly reflect our estimated exposure for product returns.
Our customer programs involve rebates, which are designed to serve as sales incentives to resellers of our products in
various target markets, and marketing development funds, or MDFs, which represent monies paid to our partners that
are earmarked for market segment development and are designed to support our partners’ activities while also
promoting NVIDIA products. We account for customer programs as a reduction to revenue and accrue for potential
rebates and MDFs based on the amount we expect to be claimed by customers.
47
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
License and Development Arrangements
Our license and development arrangements with customers typically require significant customization of our intellectual
property components. As a result, we recognize the revenue from the license and the revenue from the development
services as a single performance obligation over the period in which the development services are performed. We
measure progress to completion based on actual cost incurred to date as a percentage of the estimated total cost
required to complete each project. If a loss on an arrangement becomes probable during a period, we record a
provision for such loss in that period.
Software Licensing
Our software licenses provide our customers with a right to use the software when it is made available to the customer.
Customers may purchase either perpetual licenses or subscriptions to licenses, which differ mainly in the duration over
which the customer benefits from the software. Software licenses are frequently sold along with post-contract customer
support, or PCS. For such arrangements, we allocate revenue to the software license and PCS on a relative
standalone selling price basis by maximizing the use of observable inputs to determine the standalone selling price for
each performance obligation. Revenue from software licenses is recognized up front when the software is made
available to the customer. PCS revenue is recognized ratably over the service period, or as services are performed.
Advertising Expenses
We expense advertising costs in the period in which they are incurred. Advertising expenses for fiscal years 2019,
2018, and 2017 were $21 million, $25 million, and $17 million, respectively. 
Product Warranties
We generally offer a limited warranty to end-users that ranges from one to three years for products in order to repair or
replace products for any manufacturing defects or hardware component failures. Cost of revenue includes the
estimated cost of product warranties that are calculated at the point of revenue recognition. Under limited
circumstances, we may offer an extended limited warranty to customers for certain products. We also accrue for known
warranty and indemnification issues if a loss is probable and can be reasonably estimated.
Stock-based Compensation
We use the closing trading price of our common stock on the date of grant, minus a dividend yield discount, as the fair
value of awards of restricted stock units, or RSUs, and performance stock units that are based on our corporate
financial performance targets, or PSUs. We use a Monte Carlo simulation on the date of grant to estimate the fair value
of performance stock units that are based on market conditions, or market-based PSUs. The compensation expense
for RSUs and market-based PSUs is recognized using a straight-line attribution method over the requisite employee
service period while compensation expense for PSUs is recognized using an accelerated amortization model. We
estimate the fair value of shares to be issued under our employee stock purchase plan, or ESPP, using the Black-
Scholes model at the commencement of an offering period in March and September of each year. Stock-based
compensation for our ESPP is expensed using an accelerated amortization model. Additionally, we estimate forfeitures
annually based on historical experience and revise the estimates of forfeiture in subsequent periods if actual forfeitures
differ from those estimates.
Litigation, Investigation and Settlement Costs
From time to time, we are involved in legal actions and/or investigations by regulatory bodies. There are many
uncertainties associated with any litigation or investigation, and we cannot be certain that these actions or other third-
party claims against us will be resolved without litigation, fines and/or substantial settlement payments. If information
becomes available that causes us to determine that a loss in any of our pending litigation, investigations or settlements
is probable, and we can reasonably estimate the loss associated with such events, we will record the loss in
accordance with U.S. GAAP. However, the actual liability in any such litigation or investigation may be materially
different from our estimates, which could require us to record additional costs.
Foreign Currency Remeasurement
We use the United States dollar as our functional currency for all of our subsidiaries. Foreign currency monetary assets
and liabilities are remeasured into United States dollars at end-of-period exchange rates. Non-monetary assets and
liabilities such as property and equipment, and equity are remeasured at historical exchange rates. Revenue and
expenses are remeasured at average exchange rates in effect during each period, except for those expenses related to
the previously noted balance sheet amounts, which are remeasured at historical exchange rates. Gains or losses from
foreign currency
48
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
remeasurement are included in other income or expense in our Consolidated Statements of Income and to date have
not been significant.
Income Taxes
We recognize federal, state and foreign current tax liabilities or assets based on our estimate of taxes payable or
refundable in the current fiscal year by tax jurisdiction. We recognize federal, state and foreign deferred tax assets or
liabilities, as appropriate, for our estimate of future tax effects attributable to temporary differences and carryforwards;
and we record a valuation allowance to reduce any deferred tax assets by the amount of any tax benefits that, based
on available evidence and judgment, are not expected to be realized.
Our calculation of deferred tax assets and liabilities is based on certain estimates and judgments and involves dealing
with uncertainties in the application of complex tax laws. Our estimates of deferred tax assets and liabilities may
change based, in part, on added certainty or finality to an anticipated outcome, changes in accounting standards or tax
laws in the United States, or foreign jurisdictions where we operate, or changes in other facts or circumstances. In
addition, we recognize liabilities for potential United States and foreign income tax contingencies based on our estimate
of whether, and the extent to which, additional taxes may be due. If we determine that payment of these amounts is
unnecessary or if the recorded tax liability is less than our current assessment, we may be required to recognize an
income tax benefit or additional income tax expense in our financial statements accordingly.
As of January 27, 2019, we had a valuation allowance of $562 million related to state and certain foreign deferred tax
assets that management determined are not likely to be realized due to projections of future taxable income and
potential utilization limitations of tax attributes acquired as a result of stock ownership changes. To the extent realization
of the deferred tax assets becomes more-likely-than-not, we would recognize such deferred tax asset as an income tax
benefit during the period.
We recognize the benefit from a tax position only if it is more-likely-than-not that the position would be sustained upon
audit based solely on the technical merits of the tax position. Our policy is to include interest and penalties related to
unrecognized tax benefits as a component of income tax expense.
The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, or TCJA, which was enacted in December 2017, significantly changes U.S. tax law,
including a reduction of the U.S. federal corporate income tax rate from 35% to 21%, a requirement for companies to
pay a one-time transition tax on the earnings of certain foreign subsidiaries that were previously tax deferred, and the
creation of new taxes (global intangible low-taxed income, or GILTI) on certain foreign-source earnings. As a fiscal
year-end taxpayer, certain provisions of the TCJA began to impact us in the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2018, while
other provisions impacted us beginning in fiscal year 2019. The Securities and Exchange Commission, or the SEC, had
provided guidance in Staff Accounting Bulletin No. 118, Income Tax Accounting Implications of the Tax Cuts and Jobs
Act (SAB 118), which allowed companies to record provisional amounts during a measurement period up to one year
from the enactment date. As of January 27, 2019, we completed our accounting for all of the enactment-date income
tax effects of the TCJA and elected to account for GILTI in deferred taxes. Refer to Note 13 of these Notes to the
Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information.
Net Income Per Share
Basic net income per share is computed using the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the
period. Diluted net income per share is computed using the weighted average number of common and potentially
dilutive shares outstanding during the period, using the treasury stock method. Under the treasury stock method, the
effect of equity awards outstanding is not included in the computation of diluted net income per share for periods when
their effect is anti-dilutive. Additionally, we issued convertible notes with a net settlement feature that required us, upon
conversion, to settle the principal amount of debt for cash and the conversion premium for cash or shares of our
common stock. Our Convertible Notes, Note Hedges, and related Warrants contained various conversion features,
which are further described in Note 11 of these Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements. The potentially dilutive
shares resulting from the Convertible Notes and Warrants under the treasury stock method were included in the
calculation of diluted income per share when their inclusion was dilutive. However, the Note Hedges were not included
in the calculation of diluted net income per share unless actually exercised, as their pre-exercised effect would have
been anti-dilutive under the treasury stock method.
49
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
Cash and Cash Equivalents
We consider all highly liquid investments that are readily convertible into cash and have an original maturity of three
months or less at the time of purchase to be cash equivalents.
Marketable Securities
Marketable securities consist of highly liquid debt investments with maturities of greater than three months when
purchased. We generally classify our marketable securities at the date of acquisition as available-for-sale. These debt
securities are reported at fair value with the related unrealized gains and losses included in accumulated other
comprehensive income or loss, a component of shareholders’ equity, net of tax. The fair value of interest-bearing debt
securities includes accrued interest. Any unrealized losses which are considered to be other-than-temporary
impairments are recorded in the other income or expense, net, section of our Consolidated Statements of Income.
Realized gains and losses on the sale of marketable securities are determined using the specific-identification method
and recorded in the other income or expense, net, section of our Consolidated Statements of Income.
All of our available-for-sale debt investments are subject to a periodic impairment review. We record a charge to
earnings when a decline in fair value is significantly below cost basis and judged to be other-than-temporary or have
other indicators of impairments. If the fair value of an available-for-sale debt instrument is less than its amortized cost
basis, an other-than-temporary impairment is triggered in circumstances where (1) we intend to sell the instrument,
(2) it is more likely than not that we will be required to sell the instrument before recovery of its amortized cost basis, or
(3) a credit loss exists where we do not expect to recover the entire amortized cost basis of the instrument. In these
situations, we recognize an other-than-temporary impairment in earnings equal to the entire difference between the
debt instruments’ amortized cost basis and its fair value. For available-for-sale debt instruments that are considered
other-than-temporarily impaired due to the existence of a credit loss, if we do not intend to sell and it is not more likely
than not that we will not be required to sell the instrument before recovery of its remaining amortized cost basis
(amortized cost basis less any current-period credit loss), we separate the amount of the impairment into the amount
that is credit related and the amount due to all other factors. The credit loss component is recognized in earnings while
loss related to all other factors is recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income or loss.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
The carrying value of cash equivalents, accounts receivable, accounts payable and accrued liabilities approximate their
fair values due to their relatively short maturities as of January 27, 2019 and January 28, 2018. Marketable securities
are comprised of available-for-sale securities that are reported at fair value with the related unrealized gains or losses
included in accumulated other comprehensive income or loss, a component of shareholders’ equity, net of tax. Fair
value of the marketable securities is determined based on quoted market prices. Derivative instruments are recognized
as either assets or liabilities and are measured at fair value. The accounting for changes in the fair value of a derivative
depends on the intended use of the derivative and the resulting designation. For derivative instruments designated as
fair value hedges, the gains or losses are recognized in earnings in the periods of change together with the offsetting
losses or gains on the hedged items attributed to the risk being hedged. For derivative instruments designated as cash-
flow hedges, the effective portion of the gains or losses on the derivatives is initially reported as a component of other
comprehensive income or loss and is subsequently recognized in earnings when the hedged exposure is recognized in
earnings. For derivative instruments not designated for hedge accounting, changes in fair value are recognized in
earnings.
Concentration of Credit Risk
Financial instruments that potentially subject us to concentrations of credit risk consist primarily of cash equivalents,
marketable securities, and accounts receivable. Our investment policy requires the purchase of highly-rated fixed
income securities, the diversification of investment type and credit exposures, and includes certain limits on our
portfolio duration. Accounts receivable from significant customers, those representing 10% or more of total accounts
receivable, aggregated approximately 19% of our accounts receivable balance from one customer as of January 27,
2019 and 28% of our account receivable balance from two customers as of January 28, 2018. We perform ongoing
credit evaluations of our customers’ financial condition and maintain an allowance for potential credit losses. This
allowance consists of an amount identified for specific customers and an amount based on overall estimated exposure.
Our overall estimated exposure excludes amounts covered by credit insurance and letters of credit.
50
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
Accounts Receivable
We maintain an allowance for doubtful accounts receivable for estimated losses resulting from the inability of our
customers to make required payments. We determine this allowance by identifying amounts for specific customer
issues as well as amounts based on overall estimated exposure. Factors impacting the allowance include the level of
gross receivables, the financial condition of our customers and the extent to which balances are covered by credit
insurance or letters of credit.
Inventories
Inventory cost is computed on an adjusted standard basis, which approximates actual cost on an average or first-in,
first-out basis. Inventory costs consist primarily of the cost of semiconductors purchased from subcontractors, including
wafer fabrication, assembly, testing and packaging, manufacturing support costs, including labor and overhead
associated with such purchases, final test yield fallout, and shipping costs, as well as the cost of purchased memory
products and other component parts. We charge cost of sales for inventory provisions to write down our inventory to
the lower of cost or net realizable value or to completely write off obsolete or excess inventory. Most of our inventory
provisions relate to the write-off of excess quantities of products, based on our inventory levels and future product
purchase commitments compared to assumptions about future demand and market conditions. Once inventory has
been written-off or written-down, it creates a new cost basis for the inventory that is not subsequently written-up.
Property and Equipment
Property and equipment are stated at cost. Depreciation of property and equipment is computed using the straight-line
method based on the estimated useful lives of the assets, generally three to five years. Once an asset is identified for
retirement or disposition, the related cost and accumulated depreciation or amortization are removed, and a gain or
loss is recorded. The estimated useful lives of our buildings are up to thirty years. Depreciation expense includes the
amortization of assets recorded under capital leases. Leasehold improvements and assets recorded under capital
leases are amortized over the shorter of the expected lease term or the estimated useful life of the asset.
Goodwill
Goodwill is subject to our annual impairment test during the fourth quarter of our fiscal year, or earlier if indicators of
potential impairment exist.  For the purposes of completing our impairment test, we perform either a qualitative or a
quantitative analysis on a reporting unit basis. 
Qualitative factors include industry and market considerations, overall financial performance, and other relevant events
and factors affecting the reporting units.
Our quantitative impairment test considers both the income approach and the market approach to estimate a reporting
unit’s fair value. The income and market valuation approaches consider a number of factors that include, but are not
limited to, prospective financial information, growth rates, residual values, discount rates and comparable multiples
from publicly traded companies in our industry and require us to make certain assumptions and estimates regarding
industry economic factors and the future profitability of our business. Refer to Note 5 of these Notes to the
Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information. 
Intangible Assets and Other Long-Lived Assets
Intangible assets primarily represent rights acquired under technology licenses, patents, acquired intellectual property,
trademarks and customer relationships. We currently amortize our intangible assets with definitive lives over periods
ranging from three to ten years using a method that reflects the pattern in which the economic benefits of the intangible
asset are consumed or otherwise used up or, if that pattern cannot be reliably determined, using a straight-line
amortization method.
Long-lived assets, such as property and equipment and intangible assets subject to amortization are reviewed for
impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset or asset group
may not be recoverable. Recoverability of assets to be held and used is measured by a comparison of the carrying
amount of an asset or asset group to estimated undiscounted future cash flows expected to be generated by the asset,
or asset group. If the carrying amount of an asset or asset group exceeds its estimated future cash flows, an
impairment charge is recognized for the amount by which the carrying amount of the asset or asset group exceeds the
estimated fair value of the asset or asset group. Fair value is determined based on the estimated discounted future
cash flows expected to be generated by the asset or asset group. Assets and liabilities to be disposed of would be
separately presented in the
51
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
Consolidated Balance Sheet and the assets would be reported at the lower of the carrying amount or fair value less
costs to sell, and would no longer be depreciated.
Adoption of New and Recently Issued Accounting Pronouncements
Recently Adopted Accounting Pronouncements
The Financial Accounting Standards Board, or FASB, issued an accounting standards update that creates a single
source of revenue guidance under U.S. GAAP for all companies, in all industries. We adopted this guidance on January
29, 2018 using the modified retrospective approach. Refer to Note 2 of these Notes to the Consolidated Financial
Statements for additional information.
In January 2016, the FASB issued an accounting standards update to amend certain aspects of recognition,
measurement, presentation, and disclosure of financial instruments. We are now required to recognize changes in the
fair value of our equity investments through net income rather than other comprehensive income. We adopted this
guidance in the first quarter of fiscal year 2019 and applied it prospectively. The adoption of this guidance did not have
a significant impact on our Consolidated Financial Statements.
Recent Accounting Pronouncements Not Yet Adopted
The FASB issued an accounting standards update regarding the accounting for leases under which we will begin
recognizing lease assets and liabilities on the balance sheet for lease terms of more than 12 months. We will adopt this
guidance using the optional transition method at the beginning of fiscal year 2020 and will not restate comparative prior
periods. Additionally, we will elect the package of practical expedients as permitted by the guidance. We are in the
process of finalizing changes to our systems and processes in conjunction with our review of lease agreements and
currently expect the adoption of this accounting guidance to result in an increase in lease assets and a corresponding
increase in lease liabilities on our Consolidated Balance Sheet of approximately $500 million. 
In June 2016, the FASB issued a new accounting standard to replace the incurred loss impairment methodology under
current GAAP with a methodology that reflects expected credit losses and requires consideration of a broader range of
reasonable and supportable information to inform credit loss estimates. We will be required to use a forward-looking
expected credit loss model for accounts receivable and other financial instruments, including available-for-sale debt
securities. The standard will be effective for us beginning in the first quarter of fiscal year 2021, with early adoption
permitted. We are currently evaluating the impact of this standard on our Consolidated Financial Statements.
Note 2 - New Revenue Accounting Standard
Method and Impact of Adoption
On January 29, 2018, we adopted the new revenue accounting standard using the modified retrospective method and
applied it to contracts that were not completed as of that date. Upon adoption, we recognized the cumulative effect of
the new standard as a $7 million increase to opening retained earnings, net of tax. Comparative information for prior
periods has not been adjusted. The impact of the new standard on our consolidated financial statements for fiscal year
2019 was not significant.
Deferred Revenue and Performance Obligations
Deferred revenue is comprised mainly of customer advances and deferrals related to license and development
arrangements and PCS related to software licensing. The following table shows the changes in deferred revenue
during fiscal year 2019:
52
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
 January 27,
2019
 (in millions)
Balance as of January 28, 2018 $ 68
Adjustment to retained earnings upon adoption of new revenue standard (5)
Balance as of January 29, 2018 63
Deferred revenue added during the period 344
Revenue recognized during the period (269)
Balance as of January 27, 2019 $ 138
Revenue related to remaining performance obligations represents the amount of contracted license and development
arrangements and PCS that has not been recognized. As of January 27, 2019, the amount of our remaining
performance obligations that has not been recognized as revenue was $305 million, of which we expect to recognize
approximately 50% as revenue over the next twelve months and the remainder thereafter. This amount excludes the
value of remaining performance obligations for contracts with an original expected length of one year or less.
Refer to Note 16 of these Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information, including
disaggregated revenue disclosures.
Note 3 - Stock-Based Compensation
Our stock-based compensation expense is associated with restricted stock units, or RSUs, performance stock units
that are based on our corporate financial performance targets, or PSUs, performance stock units that are based on
market conditions, or market-based PSUs, and our ESPP.
Our Consolidated Statements of Income include stock-based compensation expense, net of amounts allocated to
inventory, as follows:
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018  January 29,
2017
 (In millions)
Cost of revenue $ 27 $ 21 $ 15
Research and development 336 219 134
Sales, general and administrative 194 151 98
Total $ 557 $ 391 $ 247
Stock-based compensation capitalized in inventories was not significant during fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017.
The following is a summary of equity awards granted under our equity incentive plans:
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018January 29,
2017
 (In millions, except per share data)
RSUs, PSUs and Market-based PSUs   
Awards granted 4 6 12
Estimated total grant-date fair value $ 1,109 $ 929$ 591
Weighted average grant-date fair value (per share) $ 258.26 $ 145.91$ 50.57
   
ESPP   
Shares purchased 1 5 4
Weighted average price (per share) $ 107.48 $ 21.24$ 18.51
Weighted average grant-date fair value (per share) $ 38.51 $ 7.12$ 5.80
53
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
Beginning fiscal year 2015, we shifted away from granting stock options and toward granting RSUs, PSUs and market-
based PSUs to reflect changing market trends for equity incentives at our peer companies. The number of PSUs that
will ultimately vest is contingent on the Company’s level of achievement versus the corporate financial performance
target established by our Compensation Committee in the beginning of each fiscal year.
Of the total fair value of equity awards, we estimated that the stock-based compensation expense related to the equity
awards that are not expected to vest for fiscal year 2019 was $88 million.
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018
 (In millions)
Aggregate unearned stock-based compensation expense $ 1,580$ 1,091
 
Estimated weighted average remaining amortization period (In years)
RSUs, PSUs and market-based PSUs 2.2 2.3
ESPP 0.8 0.7
The fair value of shares issued under our ESPP have been estimated with the following assumptions:
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018January 29,
2017
 (Using the Black-Scholes model)
ESPP    
Weighted average expected life (in years) 0.1-2.0 0.5-2.0 0.5-2.0
Risk-free interest rate 1.6%-2.8% 0.8%-1.4% 0.5%-0.9%
Volatility 24%-75% 40%-54% 30%-39%
Dividend yield 0.3%-0.4% 0.3%-0.5% 0.7%-1.4%
For ESPP shares, the expected term represents the average term from the first day of the offering period to the
purchase date. The risk-free interest rate assumption used to value ESPP shares is based upon observed interest
rates on Treasury bills appropriate for the expected term. Our expected stock price volatility assumption for ESPP is
estimated using historical volatility. For awards granted, we use the dividend yield at grant date. Our RSU, PSU, and
market-based PSU awards are not eligible for cash dividends prior to vesting; therefore, the fair values of RSUs, PSUs,
and market-based PSUs are discounted for the dividend yield.
Additionally, for RSU, PSU, and market-based PSU awards, we estimate forfeitures annually and revise the estimates
of forfeiture in subsequent periods if actual forfeitures differ from those estimates. Forfeitures are estimated based on
historical experience.
Equity Incentive Program
We grant or have granted stock options, RSUs, PSUs, market-based PSUs, and stock purchase rights under the
following equity incentive plans.
Amended and Restated 2007 Equity Incentive Plan
In 2007, our shareholders approved the NVIDIA Corporation 2007 Equity Incentive Plan, as most recently amended
and restated, the 2007 Plan.
The 2007 Plan authorizes the issuance of incentive stock options, non-statutory stock options, restricted stock,
restricted stock units, stock appreciation rights, performance stock awards, performance cash awards, and other stock-
based awards to employees, directors and consultants. Only our employees may receive incentive stock options. Up to
230 million shares of our common stock may be issued pursuant to stock awards granted under the 2007
Plan. Currently, we grant RSUs, PSUs and market-based PSUs under the 2007 Plan, under which, as of January 27,
2019, there were 35 million shares available for future issuance.
54
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
Stock options previously granted to employees, subject to certain exceptions, vest over a four-year period, subject to
continued service, with 25% vesting on the anniversary of the hire date in the case of new hires or the anniversary of
the date of grant in the case of grants to existing employees and 6.25% vesting quarterly thereafter. These stock
options generally expire ten years from the date of grant.
Subject to certain exceptions, RSUs and PSUs granted to employees vest over a four-year period, subject to continued
service, with 25% vesting on a pre-determined date that is close to the anniversary of the date of grant and (i) for grants
made prior to May 18, 2016, 12.5% vesting semi-annually thereafter, and (ii) for grants made on or after May 18, 2016,
6.25% vesting quarterly thereafter. Market-based PSUs vest 100% on approximately the three-year anniversary of the
date of grant. However, the number of shares subject to both PSUs and market-based PSUs that are eligible to vest is
generally determined by the Compensation Committee based on achievement of pre-determined criteria.
Unless terminated sooner, the 2007 Plan is scheduled to terminate on March 21, 2022. Our Board may suspend or
terminate the 2007 Plan at any time. No awards may be granted under the 2007 Plan while the 2007 Plan is suspended
or after it is terminated. The Board may also amend the 2007 Plan at any time. However, if legal, regulatory or listing
requirements require shareholder approval, the amendment will not go into effect until the shareholders have approved
the amendment.
Amended and Restated 2012 Employee Stock Purchase Plan
In 2012, our shareholders approved the 2012 Employee Stock Purchase Plan, as most recently amended and restated,
the 2012 Plan, as the successor to the 1998 Employee Stock Purchase Plan.
Up to 89 million shares of our common stock may be issued pursuant to purchases under the 2012 Plan. As of
January 27, 2019, we had issued 29 million shares and reserved 60 million shares for future issuance under the 2012
Plan.
The 2012 Plan is intended to qualify as an “employee stock purchase plan” under Section 423 of the Internal Revenue
Code. Under the current offerings adopted pursuant to the 2012 Plan, each offering period is approximately 24 months,
which is generally divided into four purchase periods of six months.
Employees are eligible to participate if they are employed by us or an affiliate of us as designated by the Board.
Employees who participate in an offering may have up to 10% of their earnings withheld up to certain limitations and
applied on specified dates determined by the Board to the purchase of shares of common stock. The Board may
increase this percentage at its discretion, up to 15%. The price of common stock purchased under our 2012 Plan will be
equal to 85% of the lower of the fair market value of the common stock on the commencement date of each offering
period and the fair market value on each purchase date within the offering. Employees may end their participation in
the 2012 Plan at any time during the offering period, and participation ends automatically on termination of employment
with us. In each case, the employee’s contributions are refunded.
The following is a summary of our equity award transactions under our equity incentive plans: 
 RSUs, PSUs and Market-based PSUs Outstanding
 Number of SharesWeighted Average Grant-
Date Fair V alue
 (In millions, except years and per share data)
Balances, January 28, 2018 22$ 66.72
Granted (1)(2) 4$ 258.26
Vested restricted stock (10)$ 52.56
Canceled and forfeited — $ —
Balances, January 27, 2019 16$ 129.92
Vested and expected to vest after January 27, 2019 13$ 129.44
(1)Includes PSUs that will be issued and eligible to vest based on the corporate financial performance level achieved for fiscal year 2019.
(2)Includes market-based PSUs that will be issued and eligible to vest if the maximum target for total shareholder return, or TSR, over the 3-year
measurement period is achieved. Depending on the ranking of our TSR compared to the respective TSRs of the companies comprising the
Standard & Poor’s 500 Index during that period, the market-based PSUs issued could be up to 45 thousand shares.
As of January 27, 2019 and January 28, 2018, there were 35 million and 16 million shares, respectively, of common
stock reserved for future issuance under our equity incentive plans. 
55
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
The total intrinsic value of options exercised was $180 million, $318 million, and $246 million for fiscal
years 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. Upon exercise of an option, we issue new shares of stock.
Note 4 - Net Income Per Share
The following is a reconciliation of the denominator of the basic and diluted net income per share computations for the
periods presented:
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018January 29,
2017
 (In millions, except per share data)
Numerator:    
Net income $ 4,141$ 3,047$ 1,666
Denominator:    
Basic weighted average shares 608 599 541
Dilutive impact of outstanding securities:    
  Equity awards 17 24 26
  1.00% Convertible Senior Notes — 5 44
  Warrants issued with the 1.00% Convertible Senior Notes — 4 38
Diluted weighted average shares 625 632 649
Net income per share:    
Basic (1) $ 6.81$ 5.09$ 3.08
Diluted (2) $ 6.63$ 4.82$ 2.57
Equity awards excluded from diluted net income per share because
their effect would have been anti-dilutive5 4 8
(1)Calculated as net income divided by basic weighted average shares.
(2)Calculated as net income divided by diluted weighted average shares.
The 1.00% Convertible Senior Notes Due 2018, or the Convertible Notes, were included in the calculation of diluted net
income per share. The Convertible Notes had a dilutive impact on net income per share if our average stock price for
the reporting period exceeded the adjusted conversion price of $20.02 per share. The warrants associated with our
Convertible Notes, or the Warrants, outstanding were also included in the calculation of diluted net income per share.
As of January 27, 2019, there were no Convertible Notes or Warrants outstanding.
Refer to Note 11 of these Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional discussion regarding the
Convertible Notes, Note Hedges, and Warrants.
Note 5 - Goodwill
The carrying amount of goodwill was $618 million, and the amount of goodwill allocated to our GPU and Tegra
Processor reporting units was $210 million and $408 million, respectively, as of both January 27, 2019 and January 28,
2018. There were no changes to the carrying amount of goodwill during fiscal years 2019 and 2018. During the fourth
quarters of fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017, we completed our annual impairment tests and concluded that goodwill
was not impaired in any of these years.
56
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
Note 6 - Amortizable Intangible Assets
The components of our amortizable intangible assets are as follows:
 January 27, 2019  January 28, 2018
 Gross 
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationNet 
Carrying
Amount Gross 
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
Amortization Net 
Carrying
Amount
 (In millions)  (In millions)
Acquisition-related
intangible assets $ 195$ (188)$ 7 $ 195$ (180) $ 15
Patents and licensed
technology 491 (453) 38 469 (432) 37
Total intangible
assets $ 686$ (641)$ 45 $ 664$ (612) $ 52
The increase in gross carrying amount of intangible assets is due to purchases of licensed technology during
fiscal year 2019. Amortization expense associated with intangible assets for fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017 was $29
million, $55 million, and $68 million, respectively. Future amortization expense related to the net carrying amount of
intangible assets as of January 27, 2019 is estimated to be $21 million in fiscal year 2020, $12 million in fiscal year
2021, $5 million in fiscal year 2022, and $5 million in fiscal year 2023, and $2 million in fiscal year 2024.
Note 7 - Marketable Securities
Our cash equivalents and marketable securities are classified as “available-for-sale” debt securities.
The following is a summary of cash equivalents and marketable securities as of January 27, 2019 and January 28,
2018:
 January 27, 2019
 
Amortized
Cost 
Unrealized
Gain 
Unrealized
LossEstimated
Fair Value Reported as
    Cash
Equivalents Marketable
Securities
 (In millions)
Corporate debt securities$ 2,626 $ — $ (6)$ 2,620 $ 25 $ 2,595
Debt securities of United
States government
agencies 2,284 — (4) 2,280 — 2,280
Debt securities issued by
the United States Treasury 1,493 — (1) 1,492 176 1,316
Money market funds 483 — — 483 483 —
Foreign government bonds 209 — — 209 — 209
Asset-backed securities 152 — (1) 151 — 151
Mortgage-backed securities
issued by United States
government-sponsored
enterprises 88 1 — 89 — 89
Total $ 7,335 $ 1 $ (12)$ 7,324 $ 684 $ 6,640
57
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
 January 28, 2018
 
Amortized
CostUnrealized
Gain 
Unrealized
Loss 
Estimated
Fair Value Reported as
    Cash
EquivalentsMarketable
Securities
 (In millions)
Money market funds $ 3,789$ — $ —  $ 3,789 $ 3,789$ —
Corporate debt securities 1,304 — (9) 1,295 — 1,295
Debt securities of United
States government
agencies 822 — (7) 815 — 815
Debt securities issued by
the United States Treasury 577 — (4) 573 — 573
Asset-backed securities 254 — (2) 252 — 252
Mortgage backed securities
issued by United States
government-sponsored
enterprises 128 2 —  130 — 130
Foreign government bonds 42 — (1) 41 — 41
Total $ 6,916$ 2 $ (23) $ 6,895 $ 3,789$ 3,106
The following table provides the breakdown of unrealized losses as of January 27, 2019, aggregated by investment
category and length of time that individual securities have been in a continuous loss position:
 Less than 12 Months 12 Months or Greater Total
 Estimated
Fair Value Gross
Unrealized
LossesEstimated
Fair Value Gross
Unrealized
LossesEstimated
Fair Value Gross
Unrealized
Losses
 (In millions)
Debt securities issued by
United States government
agencies $ 1,674 $ (1)$ 401 $ (3)$ 2,075 $ (4)
Corporate debt securities 915 (3) 649 (3) 1,564 (6)
Debt securities issued by
the United States Treasury 1,015 — 161 (1) 1,176 (1)
Asset-backed securities — — 151 (1) 151 (1)
Total $ 3,604 $ (4)$ 1,362 $ (8)$ 4,966 $ (12)
The gross unrealized losses are related to fixed income securities, temporary in nature, and driven primarily by
changes in interest rates. We have the intent and ability to hold our investments until maturity. For fiscal years 2019,
2018, and 2017, there were no other-than-temporary impairment losses and net realized gains were not significant.
The amortized cost and estimated fair value of cash equivalents and marketable securities as of January 27, 2019 and
January 28, 2018 are shown below by contractual maturity.
 January 27, 2019 January 28, 2018
 Amortized
CostEstimated
Fair ValueAmortized
CostEstimated
Fair Value
 (In millions)
Less than one year $ 5,042$ 5,034$ 5,381$ 5,375
Due in 1 - 5 years 2,271 2,268 1,500 1,485
Mortgage-backed securities issued by United States
government-sponsored enterprises not due at a single
maturity date 22 22 35 35
Total $ 7,335$ 7,324$ 6,916$ 6,895
58
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
Note 8 - Fair Value of Financial Assets and Liabilities
The fair values of our financial assets and liabilities are determined using quoted market prices of identical assets or
quoted market prices of similar assets from active markets. We review fair value hierarchy classification on a quarterly
basis. There were no significant transfers between Levels 1 and 2 financial assets and liabilities for fiscal year 2019.
Level 3 financial assets and liabilities are based on unobservable inputs to the valuation methodology and include our
own data about assumptions market participants would use in pricing the asset or liability based on the best information
available under the circumstances.
  Fair Value at
 Pricing Category January 27, 2019 January 28, 2018
   (In millions)
Assets    
Cash equivalents and marketable securities:    
Corporate debt securities Level 2  $ 2,620$ 1,295
Debt securities of United States government
agencies Level 2  $ 2,280$ 815
Debt securities issued by the United States
Treasury Level 2  $ 1,492$ 573
Money market funds Level 1  $ 483$ 3,789
Foreign government bonds Level 2  $ 209$ 41
Asset-backed securities Level 2  $ 151$ 252
Mortgage-backed securities issued by United
States government-sponsored enterprises Level 2  $ 89$ 130
    
Liabilities    
Current liability:    
1.00% Convertible Senior Notes (1) Level 2  $ — $ 189
Other noncurrent liabilities:    
2.20% Notes Due 2021 (1) Level 2  $ 978$ 982
3.20% Notes Due 2026 (1) Level 2  $ 961$ 986
(1)These liabilities are carried on our Consolidated Balance Sheets at their original issuance value, net of unamortized debt discount and issuance
costs, and are not marked to fair value each period. Refer to Note 11 of these Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional
information.
Note 9 - Balance Sheet Components
Certain balance sheet components are as follows:
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018
 (In millions)
Inventories:  
Raw materials $ 613$ 227
Work in-process 238 192
Finished goods 724 377
Total inventories $ 1,575$ 796
59
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018Estimated
Useful Life
 (In millions) (In years)
Property and Equipment:    
Land $ 218 $ 218 (A)
Building 339 348 25-30
Test equipment 516 462 3-5
Computer equipment 522 285 3-5
Leasehold improvements 263 198 (B)
Software and licenses 109 88 3-5
Office furniture and equipment 69 79 5
Capital leases 28 28 (B)
Construction in process 107 31 (C)
Total property and equipment, gross 2,171 1,737 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (767) (740) 
Total property and equipment, net $ 1,404 $ 997 
(A)Land is a non-depreciable asset.
(B)Leasehold improvements and capital leases are amortized based on the lesser of either the asset’s estimated useful life or the remaining
expected lease term.
(C)Construction in process represents assets that are not available for their intended use as of the balance sheet date.
Depreciation expense for fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017 was $233 million, $144 million, and $118 million,
respectively.
Accumulated amortization of leasehold improvements and capital leases was $189 million and $178 million as of
January 27, 2019 and January 28, 2018, respectively.
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018
 (In millions)
Accrued and Other Current Liabilities:  
Customer program accruals $ 302$ 181
Accrued payroll and related expenses 186 172
Deferred revenue (1) 92 53
Taxes payable 91 33
Accrued legal settlement costs 24 —
Coupon interest on debt obligations 20 20
Warranty accrual (2) 18 15
Professional service fees 14 15
Accrued royalties 10 17
Other 61 36
Total accrued and other current liabilities $ 818$ 542
(1)Deferred revenue primarily includes customer advances and deferrals related to license and development arrangements and PCS.
(2)Refer to Note 12 of these Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements for a discussion regarding warranties.
60
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018
 (In millions)
Other Long-Term Liabilities:  
Income tax payable (1) $ 513$ 559
Deferred revenue (2) 46 15
Deferred rent 21 9
Employee benefits liability 20 12
Deferred income tax liability 19 18
Other 14 19
Total other long-term liabilities $ 633$ 632
(1)As of January 27, 2019, represents the long-term portion of the one-time transition tax payable of $350 million, as well as unrecognized tax
benefits of $142 million and related interest and penalties of $21 million.
(2)Deferred revenue primarily includes deferrals related to license and development arrangements and PCS.
Note 10 - Derivative Financial Instruments
We enter into foreign currency forward contracts to mitigate the impact of foreign currency exchange rate movements
on our operating expenses. We designate these contracts as cash flow hedges and assess the effectiveness of the
hedge relationships on a spot to spot basis. Gains or losses on the contracts are recorded in accumulated other
comprehensive income or loss and reclassified to operating expense when the related operating expenses are
recognized in earnings or ineffectiveness should occur. The fair value of the contracts was not significant as
of January 27, 2019 and January 28, 2018.
We also enter into foreign currency forward contracts to mitigate the impact of foreign currency movements on
monetary assets and liabilities that are denominated in currencies other than U.S. dollar. These forward contracts were
not designated for hedge accounting treatment. Therefore, the change in fair value of these contracts is recorded in
other income or expense and offsets the change in fair value of the hedged foreign currency denominated monetary
assets and liabilities, which is also recorded in other income or expense.
The table below presents the notional value of our foreign currency forward contracts outstanding as of January 27,
2019 and January 28, 2018:
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018
 (In millions)
Designated as cash flow hedges $ 408$ 104
Not designated for hedge accounting $ 241$ 94
As of January 27, 2019, all designated foreign currency forward contracts mature within eighteen months. The
expected realized gains and losses deferred into accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) related to foreign
currency forward contracts within the next twelve months was not significant.
During fiscal years 2019 and 2018, the impact of derivative financial instruments designated for hedge accounting
treatment on other comprehensive income or loss was not significant and all such instruments were determined to be
highly effective. Therefore, there were no gains or losses associated with ineffectiveness.
Note 11 - Debt
Long-Term Debt
2.20% Notes Due 2021 and 3.20% Notes Due 2026
In fiscal year 2017, we issued $1.00 billion of the 2.20% Notes Due 2021, and $1.00 billion of the 3.20% Notes Due
2026, or collectively, the Notes. Interest on the Notes is payable on March 16 and September 16 of each year,
beginning on March 16, 2017. Upon 30 days' notice to holders of the Notes, we may redeem the Notes for cash prior to
maturity, at redemption
61
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
prices that include accrued and unpaid interest, if any, and a make-whole premium. However, no make-whole premium
will be paid for redemptions of the Notes Due 2021 on or after August 16, 2021, or for redemptions of the Notes Due
2026 on or after June 16, 2026. The net proceeds from the Notes were $1.98 billion, after deducting debt discount and
issuance costs.
The Notes are our unsecured senior obligations and rank equally in right of payment with all existing and future
unsecured and unsubordinated indebtedness. The Notes are structurally subordinated to the liabilities of our
subsidiaries and are effectively subordinated to any secured indebtedness to the extent of the value of the assets
securing such indebtedness. All existing and future liabilities of our subsidiaries will be effectively senior to the Notes.
The carrying value of the Notes and the associated interest rates were as follows:
  Expected
Remaining Term
(years)  Effective
Interest
Rate January 27,
2019January 28,
2018
      (In millions)
2.20% Notes Due 2021  2.6  2.38% $ 1,000$ 1,000
3.20% Notes Due 2026  7.6  3.31% 1,000 1,000
Unamortized debt discount and issuance costs      (12) (15)
Net carrying amount      $ 1,988$ 1,985
Convertible Debt
1.00% Convertible Senior Notes Due 2018
In fiscal year 2014, we issued $1.50 billion of Convertible Notes. During fiscal year 2019, we paid cash to settle an
aggregate of $16 million in principal amount of the Convertible Notes and issued 714 thousand shares of our common
stock for the excess conversion value. The related loss on early conversions was not significant. As of January 27,
2019, there were no Convertible Notes outstanding.
Note Hedges
Concurrently with the issuance of the Convertible Notes, we entered into the Note Hedges. Through January 27, 2019,
we had received 57 million shares of our common stock from the exercise of a portion of the Note Hedges related to
the settlement of $1.50 billion in principal amount of the Convertible Notes. As of January 27, 2019, there were no Note
Hedges outstanding.
Revolving Credit Facility
We have a Credit Agreement under which we may borrow up to $575 million for general corporate purposes and can
obtain revolving loan commitments up to $425 million. As of January 27, 2019, we had not borrowed any amounts
under this agreement.
Commercial Paper
We have a $575 million commercial paper program to support general corporate purposes. As of January 27, 2019, we
had not issued any commercial paper.
Note 12 - Commitments and Contingencies
Inventory Purchase Obligations
As of January 27, 2019, we had outstanding inventory purchase obligations totaling $912 million.
Capital Purchase Obligations
As of January 27, 2019, we had outstanding capital purchase obligations totaling $258 million.
62
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
Lease Obligations
Our headquarters complex is located in Santa Clara, California and includes ten buildings that are leased properties.
Future minimum lease payments related to headquarters operating leases total $326 million over the remaining terms
of the leases, including predetermined rent escalations, and are included in the future minimum lease payment
schedule below.
Additionally, we have other domestic and international office facilities, including datacenter space, under operating
leases expiring through fiscal year 2035.
Future minimum lease payments under our non-cancelable operating leases as of January 27, 2019, are as follows:   
 Future Minimum
Lease Obligations
 (In millions)
Fiscal Year:  
2020 $ 100
2021 97
2022 90
2023 77
2024 54
2025 and thereafter 265
Total $ 683
Rent expense for fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017 was $80 million, $54 million, and $46 million, respectively.
Accrual for Product Warranty Liabilities
The estimated amount of product returns and warranty liabilities was $18 million and $15 million as of January 27, 2019
and January 28, 2018, respectively.
In connection with certain agreements that we have entered in the past, we have provided indemnities to cover the
indemnified party for matters such as tax, product, and employee liabilities. We have included intellectual property
indemnification provisions in our technology related agreements with third parties. Maximum potential future payments
cannot be estimated because many of these agreements do not have a maximum stated liability. We have not recorded
any liability in our Consolidated Financial Statements for such indemnifications.  
Litigation
Polaris Innovations Limited
On May 16, 2016, Polaris Innovations Limited, or Polaris, a non-practicing entity and wholly-owned subsidiary of
Quarterhill Inc. (formerly WiLAN Inc.), filed a complaint against NVIDIA for patent infringement in the United States
District Court for the Western District of Texas. Polaris alleges that NVIDIA has infringed and is continuing to infringe six
U.S. patents relating to the control of dynamic random-access memory, or DRAM. The complaint seeks unspecified
monetary damages, enhanced damages, interest, fees, expenses, and costs against NVIDIA. On September 14, 2016,
NVIDIA answered the Polaris Complaint and asserted various defenses including non-infringement and invalidity of the
six Polaris patents.
On December 5, 2016, the Texas Court granted NVIDIA’s motion to transfer and ordered the case transferred to the
Northern District of California.
Between December 7, 2016 and July 25, 2017, NVIDIA filed multiple petitions for inter partes review, or IPR, at the
United States Patent and Trademark Office, or USPTO, challenging the validity of each of the patents asserted by
Polaris in the U.S. litigation. The USPTO instituted IPRs for four U.S. patents and declined to institute IPRs on two U.S.
patents. On June 19, 2018, the USPTO issued a Final Written Decision on one IPR, finding claims 1-23 and 28
unpatentable but that claims 24-27 were not proved unpatentable. On November 20, 2018, the USPTO issued Final
Written Decisions on two IPRs, finding claims 1, 4, 8-12, 16, 18, 43, 45, and 48-51 unpatentable but that claims 2-3, 5,
14, 17, 19-23, 26-31, and 44 were not proved unpatentable. On December 4, 2018, the USPTO issued a Final Written
Decision on one IPR, finding all claims unpatentable. On December 19, 2018, the USPTO issued a Final Written
Decision on one IPR, finding claims 1-14 unpatentable.
63
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
On June 15, 2017, the California Court granted NVIDIA’s motion to stay the district court litigation pending resolution of
the petitions for IPR. The California Court has not set a trial date.
On December 30, 2016, Polaris filed a complaint against NVIDIA for patent infringement in the Regional Court of
Düsseldorf, Germany. Polaris alleges that NVIDIA has infringed and is continuing to infringe three patents relating to
control of DRAM. On July 14, 2017, NVIDIA filed defenses to the infringement allegations including non-infringement
with respect to each of the three asserted patents. On September 3, 2018, NVIDIA filed a rejoinder with additional
noninfringement arguments. On December 4, 2018, NVIDIA filed a further rejoinder with additional noninfringement,
nullity, and FRAND arguments.
An oral hearing is scheduled for February 21, 2019.
Between March 31, 2017 and June 12, 2017, NVIDIA filed nullity actions with the German Patent Court challenging the
validity of each of the patents asserted by Polaris in the German litigation.
ZiiLabs 1 Patents Lawsuit
On October 2, 2017, ZiiLabs Inc., Ltd., or ZiiLabs, a non-practicing entity, filed a complaint in the United States District
Court for the District of Delaware alleging that NVIDIA has infringed and is continuing to infringe four U.S. patents
relating to GPUs, or the ZiiLabs 1 Patents. ZiiLabs is a Bermuda corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Creative
Technology Asia Limited, a Hong Kong company which is itself is a wholly-owned subsidiary of Creative Technology
Ltd., a publicly traded Singapore company. The complaint seeks unspecified monetary damages, enhanced damages,
interest, costs, and fees against NVIDIA and an injunction against further direct or indirect infringement of the ZiiLabs 1
Patents. On November 27, 2017, NVIDIA answered the ZiiLabs complaint and asserted various defenses including
non-infringement and invalidity of the ZiiLabs 1 Patents.
On January 10, 2018, ZiiLabs filed a first amended complaint asserting infringement of a fifth U.S. patent.
On February 22, 2018, the Delaware Court stayed the ZiiLabs 1 case pending the resolution of the U.S. International
Trade Commission, or USITC, investigation over the ZiiLabs 2 patents.
On February 1, 2019, NVIDIA entered into an immaterial agreement in which it receives a license to the ZiiLabs patents
and a dismissal of the ZiiLabs 1 and 2 Patent Lawsuits. The ZiiLabs 1 and 2 district court cases were dismissed
pursuant to a stipulation of dismissal filed on February 8, 2019. The Administrative Law Judge issued an Initial
Determination on February 12, 2019, granting the motion to terminate the USITC investigation addressing the ZiiLabs 2
patents.
ZiiLabs 2 Patents Lawsuits
On December 27, 2017, ZiiLabs filed a second complaint in the United States District Court for the District of Delaware
alleging that NVIDIA has infringed four additional U.S. patents, or the ZiiLabs 2 Patents. The second complaint also
seeks unspecified monetary damages, enhanced damages, interest, costs, and fees against NVIDIA and an injunction
against further direct or indirect infringement of the ZiiLabs 2 Patents.
On February 22, 2018, the Delaware Court stayed the district court action on the ZiiLabs 2 patents pending the
resolution of the USITC Investigation over the ZiiLabs 2 patents.
On December 29, 2017, ZiiLabs filed a request with the USITC to commence an Investigation pursuant to Section 337
of the Tariff Act of 1930 relating to the unlawful importation of certain graphics processors and products containing the
same. ZiiLabs alleges that the unlawful importation results from the infringement of the ZiiLabs 2 Patents by products
from respondents NVIDIA, ASUSTeK Computer Inc., ASUS Computer International, EVGA Corporation, Gigabyte
Technology Co., Ltd., G.B.T. Inc., Micro-Star International Co., Ltd., MSI Computer Corp., Nintendo Co., Ltd., Nintendo
of America Inc., PNY Technologies Inc., Zotac International (MCO) Ltd., and Zotac USA Inc.
On February 28, 2018, NVIDIA and the other respondents answered the USITC complaint and asserted various
defenses including non-infringement and invalidity of the four asserted ZiiLabs 2 patents.
On May 10, 2018, the Administrative Law Judge then presiding over the investigation issued an Initial Determination
terminating the investigation with respect to one of the patents. On July 17, 2018, the USITC affirmed this decision on
modified grounds.
64
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
On October 18, 2018, the Administrative Law Judge currently presiding over the investigation issued an order
construing certain claims of the three remaining patents in the investigation.
The hearing in the investigation is currently scheduled to begin on April 8, 2019. The target date for completion of the
investigation is September 9, 2019.
On February 1, 2019, NVIDIA entered into an immaterial agreement in which it receives a license to the ZiiLabs patents
and a dismissal of the ZiiLabs 1 and 2 Patent Lawsuits. The ZiiLabs 1 and 2 district court cases were dismissed
pursuant to a stipulation of dismissal filed on February 8, 2019. The Administrative Law Judge issued an Initial
Determination on February 12, 2019, granting the motion to terminate the USITC investigation addressing the ZiiLabs 2
patents.
Securities Class Action and Derivative Lawsuits
On December 21, 2018, a purported securities class action lawsuit was filed in the United States District Court for the
Northern District of California, captioned Iron Workers Joint Funds v. Nvidia Corporation, et al. (Case No. 18-cv-7669),
naming as defendants NVIDIA and certain of NVIDIA’s officers. The complaint asserts that the defendants violated
Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or the Exchange Act, and SEC Rule 10b-5, by
making materially false or misleading statements related to channel inventory and the impact of cryptocurrency mining
on GPU demand between August 10, 2017 and November 15, 2018. The plaintiff also alleges that the NVIDIA officers
who they named as defendants violated Section 20(a) of the Exchange Act. The plaintiff seeks class certification, an
award of unspecified compensatory damages, an award of equitable/injunctive or other further relief as the Court may
deem just and proper. On December 28, 2018, a substantially similar purported securities class action was commenced
in the Northern District of California, captioned Oto v. Nvidia Corporation, et al. (Case No. 18-cv-07783), naming the
same defendants, and seeking substantially similar relief. The two cases have been related and are before the same
judge. A stipulation to consolidate the Iron Workers and Oto actions is pending before the Court. On February 19, 2019,
a number of shareholders filed motions to consolidate the two cases and to be appointed lead plaintiff and for their
respective counsel to be appointed lead counsel.
On January 18, 2019, a shareholder, purporting to act on the behalf of NVIDIA, filed a derivative lawsuit in the Northern
District of California, captioned Han v. Huang, et al. (Case No. 19-cv-00341), seeking to assert claims on behalf of
NVIDIA against the members of NVIDIA’s board of directors and certain officers. The lawsuit asserts claims for breach
of fiduciary duty, unjust enrichment, waste of corporate assets, and violations of Sections 14(a), 10(b), and 20(a) of the
Exchange Act based on the dissemination of allegedly false and misleading statements related to channel inventory
and the impact of cryptocurrency mining on GPU demand. The plaintiff is seeking unspecified damages and other
relief, including reforms and improvements to NVIDIA’s corporate governance and internal procedures. On February
12, 2019, a substantially similar derivative lawsuit was filed in the Northern District of California captioned Yang v.
Huang, et. al. (Case No. 19-cv-00766), naming the same named defendants, and seeking the same relief. On February
19, 2019, a third substantially similar derivative lawsuit was filed in the Northern District of California captioned The
Booth Family Trust v. Huang, et. al. (Case No. 3:19-cv-00876), naming the same named defendants, and seeking
substantially the same relief.
It is possible that additional suits will be filed, or allegations received from shareholders, with respect to these same or
other matters, naming us and/or our officers and directors as defendants.
Accounting for Loss Contingencies
We are engaged in legal actions not described above arising in the ordinary course of business and, while there can be
no assurance of favorable outcomes, we believe that the ultimate outcome of these actions will not have a material
adverse effect on our operating results, liquidity or financial position. As of January 27, 2019, with the exception of
immaterial amounts, we have not recorded any accrual for contingent liabilities associated with the legal proceedings
described above based on our belief that liabilities, while possible, are not probable. Further, except as specifically
described above, any possible loss or range of loss in these matters cannot be reasonably estimated at this time.
65
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
Note 13 - Income Taxes
The income tax expense (benefit) applicable to income before income taxes consists of the following:
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018  January 29,
2017
 (In millions)
Current income taxes:      
Federal $ 1 $ 464 $ 7
State — 1 1
Foreign 69 43 34
Total current 70 508 42
Deferred taxes:      
Federal (315) (376) 199
State — — —
Foreign — 17 (2)
Total deferred (315) (359) 197
Income tax expense (benefit) $ (245) $ 149 $ 239
Income before income tax consists of the following:
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018January 29,
2017
 (In millions)
Domestic (1) $ 1,843$ 1,600$ 600
Foreign 2,053 1,596 1,305
Income before income tax $ 3,896$ 3,196$ 1,905
(1)The increase in domestic income is primarily due to jurisdictional allocation of stock-based compensation charges.
The income tax expense (benefit) differs from the amount computed by applying the U.S. federal statutory rate of 21%,
33.9%, and 35% for fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively, to income before income taxes as follows:
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018January 29,
2017
 (In millions)
Tax expense computed at federal statutory rate $ 818$ 1,084$ 667
Expense (benefit) resulting from:   
State income taxes, net of federal tax effect 23 10 4
Foreign tax rate differential (412) (545) (315)
Stock-based compensation (191) (181) (70)
Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (368) (133) —
U.S. federal R&D tax credit (141) (87) (52)
Other 26 1 5
Income tax expense (benefit) $ (245)$ 149$ 239
66
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
The tax effect of temporary differences that gives rise to significant portions of the deferred tax assets and liabilities are
presented below: 
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018
 (In millions)
Deferred tax assets:  
Net operating loss carryforwards $ 70 $ 67
Accruals and reserves, not currently deductible for tax purposes 41 24
Property, equipment and intangible assets 2 32
Research and other tax credit carryforwards 626 579
Stock-based compensation 25 24
GILTI deferred tax assets 376 —
Gross deferred tax assets 1,140 726
Less valuation allowance (562) (469)
Total deferred tax assets 578 257
Deferred tax liabilities:    
Acquired intangibles (2) (4)
Unremitted earnings of foreign subsidiaries (35) (26)
Gross deferred tax liabilities (37) (30)
Net deferred tax asset (1) $ 541 $ 227
(1) Net deferred tax asset includes long-term deferred tax assets of $560 million and $245 million and long-term deferred tax liabilities of $19 million
and $18 million for fiscal years 2019 and 2018, respectively. Long-term deferred tax assets are included in Other assets and long-term deferred tax
liabilities are included in Other long-term liabilities on our Consolidated Balance Sheets.
We recognized an income tax benefit of $245 million for fiscal year 2019, and income tax expense of $149 million and
$239 million for fiscal years 2018, and 2017, respectively. Our annual effective tax rate was (6.3)%, 4.7%, and 12.5%
for fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively.
In December 2017, the TCJA was enacted into law. The TCJA significantly changed U.S. tax law, including a reduction
of the U.S. federal corporate income tax rate from 35% to 21%, a requirement for companies to pay a one-time
transition tax on the earnings of certain foreign subsidiaries that were previously tax deferred and the creation of new
taxes (global intangible low-taxed income, or GILTI) on certain foreign-source earnings. As a fiscal year-end taxpayer,
certain provisions of the TCJA began to impact us in the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2018, while other provisions
impacted us beginning in fiscal year 2019.
In fiscal year 2018 and the first nine months of fiscal year 2019, we recorded provisional amounts for certain
enactment-date effects of the TCJA by applying the SEC guidance in SAB 118 because we had not yet completed our
accounting for these effects. As of January 27, 2019, we completed our accounting for all of the enactment-date income
tax effects of the TCJA and recognized a reduction of $368 million to the provisional amount recorded at January 28,
2018 as a component of income tax expense (benefit). This adjustment primarily relates to the effects of electing to
account for GILTI in deferred taxes, as described below. Our final tax benefit from the TCJA was $501 million.
The one-time transition tax is based on the post-1986 earnings and profits, or E&P, of our foreign subsidiaries. We had
previously accrued deferred taxes on a portion of these same earnings. We recorded a provisional one-time transition
tax liability of $971 million at January 28, 2018. Upon further analysis of the TCJA and Notices and regulations issued
by the US Department of the Treasury and Internal Revenue Service, we finalized our calculations of the transition tax
liability during fiscal year 2019. For fiscal year 2019, we increased our transition tax provisional amount by $33 million.
As a result of the reduction of the corporate income tax rate to 21%, companies were required to remeasure their
deferred tax assets and liabilities as of the date of enactment. As a result, at January 28, 2018 we had recorded a
provisional income tax expense of $43 million on the write-down of our deferred tax balance. Upon further analysis of
certain aspects of the TJCA, including immediate expensing of qualified capital expenditures and refinement of our
calculations, we reduced our provisional tax expense amount by $20 million.
67
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
The TCJA subjects a U.S. corporation to tax on its GILTI. Under U.S. GAAP, we can make an accounting policy election
to either treat taxes due on the GILTI as a current period expense or factor such amounts into our measurement of
deferred taxes. Because we were still evaluating the GILTI provisions as of January 28, 2018, we recorded no GILTI-
related deferred balances. After further evaluation, we elected to account for GILTI deferred taxes. In fiscal year 2019,
we recorded additional deferred tax assets as a net $370 million income tax benefit related to GILTI in deferred taxes.
The decrease in the effective tax rate in fiscal year 2019 as compared to fiscal years 2018 and 2017 was primarily due
to a decrease in the U.S. statutory tax rate from 33.9% to 21%, the finalization of the enactment-date income tax effects
of the TCJA, higher U.S federal research tax credits and excess tax benefits related to stock-based compensation in
fiscal year 2019.
The decrease in the effective tax rate in fiscal year 2018 as compared to fiscal year 2017 was primarily due to the
provisional impact of the tax law changes and recognition of excess tax benefits related to stock-based compensation.
Our effective tax rate for fiscal year 2019 was lower than the U.S. federal statutory rate of 21% due primarily to income
earned in jurisdictions, including British Virgin Islands, Hong Kong, China, Taiwan and United Kingdom, where the tax
rate was lower than the U.S. federal statutory tax rates, the finalization of the enactment-date income tax effects of the
TCJA, favorable recognition of the U.S. federal research tax credits, and excess tax benefits related to stock-based
compensation.
Our effective tax rate for fiscal years 2018 and 2017 was lower than the blended U.S. federal statutory rate of 33.9% for
fiscal year 2018 and 35% for fiscal year 2017 due primarily to income earned in jurisdictions, including British Virgin
Islands, Hong Kong, China, Taiwan and United Kingdom, where the tax rate was lower than the U.S. federal statutory
tax rates, favorable recognition of U.S. federal research tax credits, the provisional impact of the tax law changes in
2018, and excess tax benefits related to stock-based compensation.
As of January 27, 2019 and January 28, 2018, we had a valuation allowance of $562 million and $469 million,
respectively, related to state and certain foreign deferred tax assets that management determined not likely to be
realized due, in part, to projections of future taxable income. To the extent realization of the deferred tax assets
becomes more-likely-than-not, we would recognize such deferred tax asset as an income tax benefit during the period.
As of January 27, 2019, we had federal, state and foreign net operating loss carryforwards of $72 million, $291 million
and $290 million, respectively. The federal and state carryforwards will expire beginning in fiscal year 2023 and 2020,
respectively. The foreign net operating loss carryforwards of $290 million may be carried forward indefinitely. As of
January 27, 2019, we had federal research tax credit carryforwards of $347 million that will begin to expire in fiscal year
2037. We have state research tax credit carryforwards of $718 million, of which $687 million is attributable to the State
of California and may be carried over indefinitely, and $31 million is attributable to various other states and will expire
beginning in fiscal year 2020. Our tax attributes, net operating loss and tax credit carryforwards, remain subject to audit
and may be adjusted for changes or modification in tax laws, other authoritative interpretations thereof, or other facts
and circumstances. Utilization of federal, state, and foreign net operating losses and tax credit carryforwards may also
be subject to limitations due to ownership changes and other limitations provided by the Internal Revenue Code and
similar state and foreign tax provisions. If any such limitations apply, the federal, states, or foreign net operating loss
and tax credit carryforwards, as applicable, may expire or be denied before utilization.
As of January 27, 2019, we had $477 million of gross unrecognized tax benefits, of which $432 million would affect our
effective tax rate if recognized. However, approximately $82 million of the unrecognized tax benefits were related to
state income tax positions taken, that, if recognized, would be in the form of a carryforward deferred tax asset that
would likely attract a full valuation allowance. The $432 million of unrecognized tax benefits as of January 27, 2019
consisted of $142 million recorded in non-current income taxes payable and $290 million reflected as a reduction to the
related deferred tax assets.
68
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
A reconciliation of gross unrecognized tax benefits is as follows:
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018January 29,
2017
 (In millions)
Balance at beginning of period $ 447 $ 224$ 230
Increases in tax positions for prior years 52 7 3
Decreases in tax positions for prior years (141) (1) —
Increases in tax positions for current year 129 222 46
Settlements — — (48)
Lapse in statute of limitations (10) (5) (7)
Balance at end of period $ 477 $ 447$ 224
We classify an unrecognized tax benefit as a current liability, or amount refundable, to the extent that we anticipate
payment or receipt of cash for income taxes within one year. The amount is classified as a long-term liability, or
reduction of long-term deferred tax assets or amount refundable if we anticipate payment or receipt of cash for income
taxes during a period beyond a year.
Our policy is to include interest and penalties related to unrecognized tax benefits as a component of income tax
expense. As of January 27, 2019, January 28, 2018, and January 29, 2017, we had accrued $21 million, $15 million,
and $13 million, respectively, for the payment of interest and penalties related to unrecognized tax benefits, which is not
included as a component of our unrecognized tax benefits. As of January 27, 2019, unrecognized tax benefits of $142
million and the related interest and penalties of $21 million are included in non-current income taxes payable.
While we believe that we have adequately provided for all tax positions, amounts asserted by tax authorities could be
greater or less than our accrued position. Accordingly, our provisions on federal, state and foreign tax-related matters to
be recorded in the future may change as revised estimates are made or the underlying matters are settled or otherwise
resolved. As of January 27, 2019, we do not believe that our estimates, as otherwise provided for, on such tax positions
will significantly increase or decrease within the next twelve months.
We are subject to taxation by a number of taxing authorities both in the United States and throughout the world. As of
January 27, 2019, the significant tax jurisdictions that may be subject to examination include the United States, Hong
Kong, Taiwan, China, United Kingdom, Germany, and India for fiscal years 2003 through 2018. As of January 27, 2019,
the significant tax jurisdictions for which we are currently under examination include India, Taiwan, China and UK for
fiscal years 2003 through 2018.
Note 14 - Shareholders’ Equity
Capital Return Program
Beginning August 2004, our Board of Directors authorized us to repurchase our stock.
During fiscal year 2019, we repurchased a total of 9 million shares for $1.58 billion and also paid $371 million in cash
dividends to our shareholders.
Through January 27, 2019, we have repurchased an aggregate of 260 million shares under our share repurchase
program for a total cost of $7.08 billion. All shares delivered from these repurchases have been placed into treasury
stock. In November 2018, our board of directors authorized an additional $7.00 billion under our share repurchase
program. As of January 27, 2019, we were authorized, subject to certain specifications, to repurchase additional shares
of our common stock up to $7.24 billion through December 2022.
Preferred Stock
As of January 27, 2019 and January 28, 2018, there were no shares of preferred stock outstanding.
Common Stock
We are authorized to issue up to 2.00 billion shares of our common stock at $0.001 per share par value.
69
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
Note 15 - Employee Retirement Plans
We have a 401(k) retirement plan covering substantially all of our U.S. employees. Under the plan, participating
employees may defer up to 80% of their pre-tax earnings, subject to the Internal Revenue Service annual contribution
limits and we match a portion of the employee contributions. Our contribution expense for fiscal years 2019, 2018, and
2017 was $39 million, $23 million, and $12 million, respectively. We also have defined contribution retirement plans
outside of the United States to which we contributed $31 million, $25 million, and $23 million for fiscal years 2019,
2018, and 2017, respectively.
Note 16 - Segment Information 
Our Chief Executive Officer, who is considered to be our chief operating decision maker, or CODM, reviews financial
information presented on an operating segment basis for purposes of making operating decisions and assessing
financial performance. Our operating segments are equivalent to our reportable segments.
We report our business in two primary reportable segments - the GPU business and the Tegra Processor business -
based on a single underlying graphics architecture.
Our GPU product brands are aimed at specialized markets including GeForce for gamers; Quadro for designers; Tesla
and DGX for AI data scientists and big data researchers; and GRID for cloud-based visual computing users. Our Tegra
brand integrates an entire computer onto a single chip, and incorporates GPUs and multi-core CPUs to drive
supercomputing for autonomous robots, drones, and cars, as well as for game consoles and mobile gaming and
entertainment devices.
Under the single unifying architecture for our GPU and Tegra Processors, we leverage our visual computing expertise
by charging the operating expenses of certain core engineering functions to the GPU business, while charging the
Tegra Processor business for the incremental cost of the teams working directly for that business. In instances where
the operating expenses of certain functions benefit both reportable segments, our CODM assigns 100% of those
expenses to the reportable segment that benefits the most.
The “All Other” category presented below represents the revenue and expenses that our CODM does not assign to
either the GPU business or the Tegra Processor business for purposes of making operating decisions or assessing
financial performance. The revenue includes primarily patent licensing revenue and the expenses include stock-based
compensation expense, corporate infrastructure and support costs, acquisition-related costs, legal settlement costs,
contributions, restructuring and other charges, product warranty charge, and other non-recurring charges and benefits
that our CODM deems to be enterprise in nature.
Our CODM does not review any information regarding total assets on a reportable segment basis. Reportable
segments do not record intersegment revenue, and, accordingly, there is none to be reported. The accounting policies
for segment reporting are the same as for our consolidated financial statements. The table below presents details of
our reportable segments and the “All Other” category.
70
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
 GPUTegra
Processor All Other Consolidated
 (In millions)
Year Ended January 27, 2019:     
Revenue $ 10,175$ 1,541$ — $ 11,716
Depreciation and amortization expense $ 197$ 47$ 18$ 262
Operating income (loss) $ 4,443$ 241$ (880)$ 3,804
    
Year Ended January 28, 2018:     
Revenue $ 8,137$ 1,534$ 43$ 9,714
Depreciation and amortization expense $ 123$ 37$ 39$ 199
Operating income (loss) $ 3,507$ 303$ (600)$ 3,210
    
Year Ended January 29, 2017:     
Revenue $ 5,822$ 824$ 264$ 6,910
Depreciation and amortization expense $ 116$ 29$ 42$ 187
Operating income (loss) $ 2,180$ (9)$ (237)$ 1,934
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019  January 28,
2018  January 29,
2017
 (In millions)
Reconciling items included in "All Other" category:   
Unallocated revenue $ — $ 43 $ 264
Stock-based compensation expense (557) (391) (247)
Unallocated cost of revenue and operating expenses (277) (237) (215)
Legal settlement costs (44) — (16)
Acquisition-related and other costs (2) (15) (23)
Total $ (880) $ (600) $ (237)
Revenue by geographic region is allocated to individual countries based on the location to which the products are
initially billed even if our customers’ revenue is attributable to end customers that are located in a different location. The
following table summarizes information pertaining to our revenue from customers based on the invoicing address by
geographic regions: 
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018  January 29,
2017
Revenue: (In millions)
Taiwan $ 3,360$ 2,991 $ 2,546
China (including Hong Kong) 2,801 1,896 1,305
Other Asia Pacific 2,368 2,066 1,010
United States 1,506 1,274 904
Europe 914 768 659
Other countries 767 719 486
Total revenue $ 11,716$ 9,714 $ 6,910
71
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
The following table summarizes information pertaining to our revenue by each of the specialized markets we serve:
 Year Ended
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018  January 29,
2017
Revenue: (In millions)
Gaming $ 6,246$ 5,513 $ 4,060
Professional Visualization 1,130 934 835
Datacenter 2,932 1,932 830
Automotive 641 558 487
OEM & IP 767 777 698
Total revenue $ 11,716$ 9,714 $ 6,910
The following table presents summarized information for long-lived assets by geographic region. Long-lived assets
consist of property and equipment and deposits and other assets, and exclude goodwill and intangible assets.
 January 27,
2019January 28,
2018
Long-lived assets: (In millions)
United States $ 1,266$ 928
Taiwan 137 58
India 44 40
China (including Hong Kong) 38 33
Europe 26 11
Other Asia Pacific 1 1
Total long-lived assets $ 1,512$ 1,071
No customer represented 10% or more of total revenue for fiscal years 2019 and 2018. In fiscal year 2017, we had one
customer that represented 12% of our total revenue. The revenue was attributable to the GPU business.
Accounts receivable from significant customers, those representing 10% or more of total accounts receivable,
aggregated approximately 19% of our accounts receivable balance from one customer as of January 27, 2019, and
approximately 28% of our accounts receivable balance from two customers as of January 28, 2018.
72
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(Continued)
Note 17 - Quarterly Summary (Unaudited)
The following table sets forth our unaudited consolidated financial results, for the last eight fiscal quarters:
 Fiscal Year 2019
Quarters Ended
 January 27,
2019  October 28,
2018  July 29,
2018  April 29,
2018
 (In millions, except per share data)
Statements of Income Data:        
Revenue $ 2,205 $ 3,181 $ 3,123 $ 3,207
Cost of revenue $ 998 $ 1,260 $ 1,148 $ 1,139
Gross profit $ 1,207 $ 1,921 $ 1,975 $ 2,068
Net income (1) $ 567 $ 1,230 $ 1,101 $ 1,244
Net income per share (1):    
Basic $ 0.93 $ 2.02 $ 1.81 $ 2.05
Diluted $ 0.92 $ 1.97 $ 1.76 $ 1.98
(1)In the third and fourth quarters of fiscal year 2019, we recorded U.S. tax reform benefits of $138 million and $230 million, respectively, associated
with the completion of our accounting for the enactment-date income tax effects of the TCJA. Refer to Note 13 of these Notes to the
Consolidated Financial Statements for a discussion regarding the U.S. tax reform.
 Fiscal Year 2018
Quarters Ended
 January 28,
2018  October 28,
2017  July 29,
2017  April 29,
2017
 (In millions, except per share data)
Statements of Income Data:        
Revenue $ 2,911 $ 2,636 $ 2,230 $ 1,937
Cost of revenue $ 1,110 $ 1,067 $ 928 $ 787
Gross profit $ 1,801 $ 1,569 $ 1,302 $ 1,150
Net income (1) $ 1,118 $ 838 $ 583 $ 507
Net income per share (1):    
Basic $ 1.84 $ 1.39 $ 0.98 $ 0.86
Diluted $ 1.78 $ 1.33 $ 0.92 $ 0.79
(1)In the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2018, we recorded a U.S. tax reform provisional net tax benefit of $133 million associated with the one-time
transition tax on our historical foreign earnings and the adjustment of deferred tax balances to the lower corporate tax rate. Refer to Note 13 of
these Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements for a discussion regarding the U.S. tax reform.
73
Table of Contents
NVIDIA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
SCHEDULE II – VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
Description  Balance at
Beginning of
Period  Additions  Deductions Balance at
End of Period
  (In millions)
Fiscal year 2019         
Allowance for doubtful accounts  $ 4 $ —(1)$ (2)(1)$ 2
Sales return allowance  $ 9 $ 21(2)$ (22)(4)$ 8
Deferred tax valuation allowance  $ 469 $ 93(3)$ — $ 562
Fiscal year 2018         
Allowance for doubtful accounts  $ 3 $ 1(1)$ —(1)$ 4
Sales return allowance  $ 10 $ 15(2)$ (16)(4)$ 9
Deferred tax valuation allowance  $ 353 $ 116(3)$ — $ 469
Fiscal year 2017         
Allowance for doubtful accounts  $ 2$ 1(1)$ —(1)$ 3
Sales return allowance  $ 9$ 9(2)$ (8)(4)$ 10
Deferred tax valuation allowance  $ 272$ 81(3)$ — $ 353
(1)Additions represent allowance for doubtful accounts charged to expense and deductions represent amounts recorded as reduction to expense
upon reassessment of allowance for doubtful accounts at period end.
(2)Represents allowance for sales returns estimated at the time revenue is recognized primarily based on historical return rates and is charged as
a reduction to revenue.
(3)Represents change in valuation allowance primarily related to state and certain foreign deferred tax assets that management has determined
not likely to be realized due, in part, to projections of future taxable income of the respective jurisdictions. Refer to Note 13 of the Notes to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Part IV, Item 15 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
(4)Represents sales returns.
74
Table of Contents
EXHIBIT INDEX
 Incorporated by Reference  
Exhibit
No. Exhibit Description Schedule/Form File
Number Exhibit  Filing Date
3.1 Amended and Restated Certificate of
IncorporationS-8
 333-74905
 4.1
 3/23/1999
3.2 Certificate of Amendment of Amended
and Restated Certificate of Incorporation10-Q
 0-23985
 3.1
 8/21/2008
3.3 Certificate of Amendment of Amended
and Restated Certificate of Incorporation8-K
 0-23985
 3.1
 5/24/2011
3.4 Bylaws of NVIDIA Corporation, Amended
and Restated as of November 29, 20168-K
 0-23985
 3.1
 12/1/2016
4.1 Reference is made to Exhibits 3.1, 3.2,
3.3 and 3.4     
4.2 Specimen Stock Certificate S-1/A  333-47495 4.2  4/24/1998
4.3 Indenture (including the form of Notes)
dated December 2, 2013 between
NVIDIA Corporation and Wells Fargo
Bank, National Association8-K
 0-23985
 4.1
 12/2/2013
4.4 Form of 1.00% Convertible Senior Note
due 20188-K
 0-23985
 Exhibit A to
Exhibit 4.1 12/2/2013
4.5 Indenture, dated as of September 16,
2016, by and between the Company and
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association,
as Trustee8-K
 0-23985
 4.1
 9/16/2016
4.6 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of
September 16, 20168-K
 0-23985
 4.2
 9/16/2016
4.7 Form of 2021 Note 8-K
 0-23985
 Annex A to
Exhibit 4.2 9/16/2016
4.8 Form of 2026 Note 8-K
 0-23985
 Annex B to
Exhibit 4.2 9/16/2016
10.1 Form of Indemnity Agreement between
NVIDIA Corporation and each of its
directors and officers8-K
 0-23985
 10.1
 3/7/2006
10.2+ Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan8-K
 0-23985
 10.1
 5/21/2018
10.3+ 2007 Equity Incentive Plan - Non-
Statutory Stock Option (Annual Grant -
Board Service (2011))10-Q
 0-23985
 10.41
 5/27/2011
10.4+ 2007 Equity Incentive Plan - Non-
Statutory Stock Option (Initial Grant -
Board Service (2011))8-K
 0-23985
 10.1
 12/14/2011
10.5+ Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan - Non-Employee Director
Stock Option Grant (2012 Annual Board
Retainer)10-Q
 0-23985
 10.4
 5/23/2012
10.6+ 2007 Equity Incentive Plan - Non
Statutory Stock Option8-K
 0-23985
 10.2
 9/13/2010
10.7+ 2007 Equity Incentive Plan - Incentive
Stock Option8-K
 0-23985
 10.21
 9/13/2010
10.8+ Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan - Non Statutory Stock
Option10-Q
 0-23985
 10.1
 8/22/2012
10.9+ Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan - Incentive Stock Option10-Q
 0-23985
 10.2
 8/22/2012
75
Table of Contents
10.10+
 Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan - Restricted Stock Unit Grant
Notice and Restricted Stock Unit Purchase
Agreement  10-Q 0-23985 10.3
 8/22/2012
10.11+
 Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan - Non-Employee Director
Restricted Stock Unit (with deferral option) 10-Q 0-23985 10.3
 5/23/2012
10.12+
 Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan - Non Statutory Stock Option
(Initial Grant - Board Service)  8-K 0-23985 10.1
 7/23/2013
10.13+
 Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan - Non-Employee Director
Deferred Restricted Stock Unit Grant Notice
and Deferred Restricted Stock Unit
Agreement (2015)  10-K 0-23985 10.25
 3/12/2015
10.14+
 Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan - Non-Employee Director
Deferred Restricted Stock Unit Grant Notice
and Deferred Restricted Stock Unit
Agreement (2016)  10-K 0-23985 10.26
 3/12/2015
10.15+
 Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan - Non-Employee Director
Restricted Stock Unit Grant Notice and
Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (2016)  10-K 0-23985 10.27
 3/12/2015
10.16+
 Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan - Non-Employee Director
Restricted Stock Unit (Initial Grant - with
deferral options)  10-Q 0-23985 10.1
 5/20/2015
10.17+
 Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan - Restricted Stock Unit Grant
Notice and Restricted Stock Unit Agreement
& Performance-Based Restricted Stock Unit
Grant Notice and Performance-Based
Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (2015)  10-Q 0-23985 10.2
 5/20/2015
10.18+
 Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan - Restricted Stock Unit Grant
Notice and Restricted Stock Unit Agreement
& Performance-Based Restricted Stock Unit
Grant Notice and Performance-Based
Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (2018)  10-Q 0-23985 10.2
 5/22/2018
10.19+*
 Amended and Restated 2007 Equity
Incentive Plan - Global Restricted Stock Unit
Grant Notice and Global Restricted Stock
Unit Agreement (2019)    
10.20+
 Amended and Restated 2012 Employee
Stock Purchase Plan  10-Q 0-23985 10.2
 5/21/2018
10.21+
 Fiscal Year 2018 Variable Compensation
Plan  8-K 0-23985 10.1
 3/13/2017
10.22+
 Fiscal Year 2019 Variable Compensation
Plan  8-K 0-23985 10.1
 3/13/2018
10.23+
 Offer Letter between NVIDIA Corporation
and Colette Kress, dated September 13,
2013  8-K 0-23985 10.1
 9/16/2013
10.24+
 Offer Letter between NVIDIA Corporation
and Tim Teter, dated December 16, 2016  8-K 0-23985 10.1
 1/19/2017
10.25
 Base Convertible Note Hedge Transaction
Confirmation  8-K 0-23985 99.1
 12/2/2013
10.26
 Additional Convertible Note Hedge
Transaction Confirmation  8-K 0-23985 99.3
 12/2/2013
76
Table of Contents
10.27
 Credit Agreement, dated as of October 7,
2016 by and among NVIDIA Corporation,
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
administrative agent, and the lenders party
thereto8-K
 0-23985
 1.1 10/13/2016
10.28
 Form of Commercial Paper Dealer
Agreement between NVIDIA Corporation,
as Issuer, and the Dealer party thereto8-K
 0-23985
 10.1 12/15/2017
21.1* List of Registrant's Subsidiaries
23.1* Consent of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
24.1* Power of Attorney (included in signature page)
31.1*
 Certification of Chief Executive Officer as required by Rule 13a-14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934
31.2*
 Certification of Chief Financial Officer as required by Rule 13a-14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934
32.1#*
 Certification of Chief Executive Officer as required by Rule 13a-14(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934
32.2#*
 Certification of Chief Financial Officer as required by Rule 13a-14(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934
101.INS*  XBRL Instance Document
101.SCH*  XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document
101.CAL*  XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document
101.DEF*  XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document
101.LAB*  XBRL Taxonomy Extension Labels Linkbase Document
101.PRE* XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document
*  Filed herewith.
+  Management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement.
#  In accordance with Item 601(b)(32)(ii) of Regulation S-K and SEC Release Nos. 33-8238 and 34-47986, Final Rule:
Management's Reports on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting and Certification of Disclosure in Exchange Act
Periodic Reports, the certifications furnished in Exhibits 32.1 and 32.2 hereto are deemed to accompany this Annual
Report on Form 10-K and will not be deemed “filed” for purpose of Section 18 of the Exchange Act. Such
certifications will not be deemed to be incorporated by reference into any filing under the Securities Act or the
Exchange Act, except to the extent that the registrant specifically incorporates it by reference.
Copies of above exhibits not contained herein are available to any shareholder upon written request to:
Investor Relations: NVIDIA Corporation, 2788 San Tomas Expressway, Santa Clara, CA 95051
77
Table of Contents
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has
duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized, on
February 21, 2019.
NVIDIA Corporation
By:/s/  Jen-Hsun Huang 
 Jen-Hsun Huang
 President and Chief Executive Officer
POWER OF ATTORNEY
KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that each person whose signature appears below constitutes
and appoints Jen-Hsun Huang and Colette M. Kress, and each or any one of them, his true and lawful attorney-
in-fact and agent, with full power of substitution and resubstitution, for him and in his name, place and stead,
in any and all capacities, to sign any and all amendments to this report, and to file the same, with all exhibits
thereto, and other documents in connection therewith, with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
granting unto said attorneys-in-facts and agents, and each of them, full power and authority to do and perform
each and every act and thing requisite and necessary to be done in connection therewith, as fully to all intents
and purposes as he might or could do in person, hereby ratifying and confirming all that said attorneys-in-fact
and agents, or any of them, or their or his substitutes or substitutes, may lawfully do or cause to be done by
virtue hereof.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
78
Table of Contents
Signature Title Date
/s/ JEN-HSUN HUANG President, Chief Executive Officer and Director
(Principal Executive Officer) February 21, 2019
Jen-Hsun Huang   
/s/ COLETTE M. KRESS Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer) February 21, 2019
Colette M. Kress   
/s/ MICHAEL J. BYRON Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer
(Principal Accounting Officer) February 21, 2019
Michael J. Byron  
 Director February 21, 2019
Robert Burgess 
/s/ TENCH COXE  Director February 21, 2019
Tench Coxe   
/s/ PERSIS DRELL Director February 21, 2019
Persis Drell  
/s/ JAMES C. GAITHER Director February 21, 2019
James C. Gaither   
/s/ DAWN HUDSON Director February 21, 2019
Dawn Hudson 
/s/ HARVEY C. JONES Director February 21, 2019
Harvey C. Jones   
/s/ MICHAEL MCCAFFERY Director February 21, 2019
Michael McCaffery  
/s/ MARK L. PERRY Director February 21, 2019
Mark L. Perry   
/s/ A. BROOKE SEAWELL Director February 21, 2019
A. Brooke Seawell  
 Director February 21, 2019
Mark Stevens   
79
